A 58-year-old African-American woman presents to the ER with episodic pressing/burning anterior chest pain that began two days earlier for the first time in her life. The pain started while she was walking, radiates to the back, and is accompanied by nausea, diaphoresis and mild dyspnea, but is not increased on inspiration. The latest episode of pain ended half an hour prior to her arrival. She is known to have hypertension and obesity. She denies smoking, diabetes, hypercholesterolemia, or a family history of heart disease. She currently takes no medications. Physical examination is normal. The EKG shows nonspecific changes. 58-year-old woman with hypertension and obesity presents with exercise-related episodic chest pain radiating to the back.
An 8-year-old male presents in March to the ER with fever up to 39 C, dyspnea and cough for 2 days. He has just returned from a 5 day vacation in Colorado. Parents report that prior to the onset of fever and cough, he had loose stools. He denies upper respiratory tract symptoms. On examination he is in respiratory distress and has bronchial respiratory sounds on the left. A chest x-ray shows bilateral lung infiltrates. 8-year-old boy with 2 days of loose stools, fever, and cough after returning from a trip to Colorado. Chest x-ray shows bilateral lung infiltrates.
A 58-year-old nonsmoker white female with mild exertional dyspnea and occasional cough is found to have a left lung mass on chest x-ray. She is otherwise asymptomatic. A neurologic examination is unremarkable, but a CT scan of the head shows a solitary mass in the right frontal lobe. 58-year-old female non-smoker with left lung mass on x-ray. Head CT shows a solitary right frontal lobe mass.
A 2-year-old boy is brought to the emergency department by his parents for 5 days of high fever and irritability. The physical exam reveals conjunctivitis, strawberry tongue, inflammation of the hands and feet, desquamation of the skin of the fingers and toes, and cervical lymphadenopathy with the smallest node at 1.5 cm. The abdominal exam demonstrates tenderness and enlarged liver. Laboratory tests report elevated alanine aminotransferase, white blood cell count of 17,580/mm, albumin 2.1 g/dL, C-reactive protein 4.5 mg, erythrocyte sedimentation rate 60 mm/h, mild normochromic, normocytic anemia, and leukocytes in urine of 20/mL with no bacteria identified. The echocardiogram shows moderate dilation of the coronary arteries with possible coronary artery aneurysm. 2-year-old boy with fever and irritability for 5 days. Physical exam findings include conjunctivitis, strawberry tongue, and desquamation of the fingers and toes. Lab results include low albumin, elevated white blood cell count and C-reactive protein, and urine leukocytes. Echo shows moderate dilation of the coronary arteries.
A 56-year-old female on 20th day post-left mastectomy presents to the emergency department complaining of shortness of breath and malaise. The patient says that she has remained in bed for the last two weeks. The physical examination reveals tenderness on the left upper thoracic wall and right calf. The surgical incision shows no bleeding or signs of infection. Pulmonary auscultation is significant for bilateral decreased breath sounds, especially at the right base. Laboratory tests reveal an elevated D-dimer. 56-year-old woman presents with shortness of breath 3 weeks after surgical mastectomy. Physical exam is significant for right calf tenderness and decreased breath sounds at the right base. Her D-dimer level is elevated.
64-year-old obese female with diagnosis of diabetes mellitus and persistently elevated HbA1c. She is reluctant to see a nutritionist and is not compliant with her diabetes medication or exercise. She complains of a painful skin lesion on the left lower leg. She has tried using topical lotions and creams but the lesion has increased in size and is now oozing. 64-year-old woman with uncontrolled diabetes, now with an oozing, painful skin lesion on her left lower leg.
A 26-year-old obese woman with a history of bipolar disorder complains that her recent struggles with her weight and eating have caused her to feel depressed. She states that she has recently had difficulty sleeping and feels excessively anxious and agitated. She also states that she has had thoughts of suicide. She often finds herself fidgety and unable to sit still for extended periods of time. Her family tells her that she is increasingly irritable. Her current medications include lithium carbonate and zolpidem. 26-year-old obese woman with bipolar disorder, on zolpidem and lithium, with recent difficulty sleeping, agitation, suicidal ideation, and irritability.
A 62-year-old man sees a neurologist for progressive memory loss and jerking movements of the lower extremities. Neurologic examination confirms severe cognitive deficits and memory dysfunction. An electroencephalogram shows generalized periodic sharp waves. Neuroimaging studies show moderately advanced cerebral atrophy. A cortical biopsy shows diffuse vacuolar changes of the gray matter with reactive astrocytosis but no inflammatory infiltration. 62-year-old man with progressive memory loss and involuntary leg movements. Brain MRI reveals cortical atrophy, and cortical biopsy shows vacuolar gray matter changes with reactive astrocytosis.
A 43-year-old woman visits her dermatologist for lesions on her neck. On examination, multiple lesions are seen. Each lesion is small soft, and pedunculated. The largest lesion is about 4 mm in diameter. The color of different lesions varies from flesh colored to slightly hyperpigmented. 43-year-old woman with soft, flesh-colored, pedunculated lesions on her neck.
A physician is called to see a 67-year-old woman who underwent cardiac catheterization via the right femoral artery earlier in the morning. She is now complaining of a cool right foot. Upon examination she has a pulsatile mass in her right groin with loss of distal pulses, and auscultation reveals a bruit over the point at which the right femoral artery was entered. 67-year-old woman status post cardiac catheterization via right femoral artery, now with a cool, pulseless right foot and right femoral bruit.
A 40-year-old woman with no past medical history presents to the ER with excruciating pain in her right arm that had started 1 hour prior to her admission. She denies trauma. On examination she is pale and in moderate discomfort, as well as tachypneic and tachycardic. Her body temperature is normal and her blood pressure is 80/60. Her right arm has no discoloration or movement limitation. 40-year-old woman with severe right arm pain and hypotension. She has no history of trauma and right arm exam reveals no significant findings.
A 25-year-old woman presents to the clinic complaining of prolonged fatigue. She denies difficulty sleeping and sleeps an average of 8 hours a night. She also notes hair loss, a change in her voice and weight gain during the previous 6 months. She complains of cold intolerance. On examination she has a prominent, soft, uniform anterior cervical mass at the midline. 25-year-old woman with fatigue, hair loss, weight gain, and cold intolerance for 6 months.
A 30-year-old generally healthy woman presents with shortness of breath that had started 2 hours before admission. She has had no health problems in the past besides 2 natural abortions. She had given birth to a healthy child 3 weeks before. On examination, she is apprehensive, tachypneic and tachycardic, her blood pressure is 110/70 and her oxygen saturation 92%. Otherwise, physical examination is unremarkable. Her chest x-ray and CBC are normal. 30-year-old woman who is 3 weeks post-partum, presents with shortness of breath, tachypnea, and hypoxia.
An 85-year-old man is brought to the ER because of gradual decrease in his level of consciousness. In the last 3 days he stopped walking and eating by himself. He has had no fever, cough, rash or diarrhea. His daughter recalls that he had been involved in a car accident 3 weeks prior to his admission and had a normal head CT at that time. 85-year-old man who was in a car accident 3 weeks ago, now with 3 days of progressively decreasing level of consciousness and impaired ability to perform activities of daily living.
A 36-year-old woman presents to the emergency department with 12 weeks of amenorrhea, vaginal spotting that has increased since yesterday, lower abdominal tenderness, nausea and vomiting. The physical exam reveals overall tender abdomen, 18-week sized uterus, and cervical dilation of 2 cm. The complete blood count and biochemical profile are normal. Point of care pregnancy test with cut-off sensitivity of 25 mIU/ml Beta-HCG is negative. The ultrasound reports enlarged uterus (12 cm x 9 cm x 7 cms) with multiple cystic areas in the interior. The differential diagnosis includes vesicular mole vs fibroid degeneration. 36-year-old woman with amenorrhea, abdominal tenderness, enlarged uterus, and cervical dilation. Urine pregnancy test is negative. Ultrasound reveals an enlarged uterus with multiple cystic areas, which could be consistent with vesicular mole and fibroid degeneration.
A 28-year-old female with neck and shoulder pain and left hand and arm paresthesias three weeks after returning from a trip to California where she attended a stray animal recovery campaign. Her physical exam was unremarkable except for slight tremors and almost imperceptible spasticity. She was prescribed NSAIDS and a topical muscle relaxant. She was brought in to the ER three days later with spastic arm movements, sweating, increasing agitation and anxiety, malaise, difficultly swallowing and marked hydrophobia, and was immediately hospitalized. 28-year-old female with neck pain and left arm numbness 3 weeks after working with stray animals. Physical exam initially remarkable for slight left arm tremor and spasticity. Three days later she presented with significant arm spasticity, diaphoresis, agitation, difficulty swallowing, and hydrophobia.
A 48-year-old white male with history of common variable immunodeficiency (CVID) with acute abdominal pain, fever, dehydration, HR of 132 bpm, BP 80/40. The physical examination is remarkable for tenderness and positive Murphy sign. Abdominal ultrasound shows hepatomegaly and abundant free intraperitoneal fluid. Exploratory laparotomy reveals a ruptured liver abscess, which is then surgically drained. After surgery, the patient is taken to the ICU. 48-year-old man with common variable immunodeficiency presents with abdominal pain and fever. Ultrasound reveals hepatomegaly and free intraperitoneal fluid. A ruptured liver abscess is found and drained during exploratory laparotomy.
A 6-month-old male infant has a urine output of less than 0.2 mL/kg/hr shortly after undergoing major surgery. On examination, he has generalized edema. His blood pressure is 115/80 mm Hg, his pulse is 141/min, and his respirations are 18/min. His blood urea nitrogen is 33 mg/dL, and his serum creatinine is 1.3 mg/dL. Initial urinalysis shows specific gravity of 1.017. Microscopic examination of the urine sample reveals 1 WBC per high-power field (HPF), 18 RBCs per HPF, and 5 granular casts per HPF. His fractional excretion of sodium is 3.3%. 6-month-old male with decreased urine output and edema several hours after surgery. He is hypertensive and tachycardic, has a high BUN and creatinine, and urine microscopy reveals red blood cells and granular casts.
A 52-year-old African American man with a history of heavy smoking and drinking, describes progressive dysphagia that began several months ago. He first noticed difficulty swallowing meat. His trouble swallowing then progressed to include other solid foods, soft foods, and then liquids. He is able to locate the point where food is obstructed at the lower end of his sternum. He has lost a total of 25 pounds. 52-year-old man with history of smoking and heavy drinking, now with progressive dysphagia and 25-pound weight loss.
A 32-year-old woman is admitted to the ER following a car accident. She has sustained multiple injuries including upper and lower extremity fractures. She is fully awake and alert, and she reports that she was not wearing a seat belt. Her blood pressure is 134/74 mm Hg, and her pulse is 87/min. Physical examination reveals a tender abdomen with guarding and rebound in all four quadrants. She has no bowel sounds. 32-year-old unbelted driver status post car accident. Has multiple extremity fractures and severe abdominal pain with rebound and guarding.
A 21-year-old female is evaluated for progressive arthralgias and malaise. On examination she is found to have alopecia, a rash mainly distributed on the bridge of her nose and her cheeks, a delicate non-palpable purpura on her calves, and swelling and tenderness of her wrists and ankles. Her lab shows normocytic anemia, thrombocytopenia, a 4/4 positive ANA and anti-dsDNA. Her urine is positive for protein and RBC casts. 21-year-old female with progressive arthralgias, fatigue, and butterfly-shaped facial rash. Labs are significant for positive ANA and anti-double-stranded DNA, as well as proteinuria and RBC casts.
A 15-year-old girl presents to the ER with abdominal pain. The pain appeared gradually and was periumbilical at first, localizing to the right lower quadrant over hours. She has had no appetite since yesterday but denies diarrhea. She has had no sexual partners and her menses are regular. On examination, she has localized rebound tenderness over the right lower quadrant. On an abdominal ultrasound, a markedly edematous appendix is seen. 15-year-old girl with right lower quadrant abdominal pain, decreased appetite, and enlarged appendix on abdominal ultrasound.
A 63-year-old man presents with cough and shortness of breath. His past medical history is notable for heavy smoking, spinal stenosis, diabetes, hypothyroidism and mild psoriasis. He also has a family history of early onset dementia. His symptoms began about a week prior to his admission, with productive cough, purulent sputum and difficulty breathing, requiring him to use his home oxygen for the past 24 hours. He denies fever. On examination he is cyanotic, tachypneic, with a barrel shaped chest and diffuse rales over his lungs. A chest x-ray is notable for hyperinflation with no consolidation. 63-year-old heavy smoker with productive cough, shortness of breath, tachypnea, and oxygen requirement. Chest x-ray shows hyperinflation with no consolidation.
A 33-year-old male athlete presented to the ER with acute abdominal pain. Family member says the patient fell off his bike a week earlier and suffered blunt trauma to the left hemi-abdomen, and he has had mild abdominal pain since that day. The patient's history is negative for smoking, drugs, and alcohol. BP: 60/30 mmHg, HR: 140/min. The patient is pale, the physical examination of the abdomen revealed muscle contraction and resistance. Emergency ultrasound and CT scan of the abdomen reveal extended intraperitoneal hemorrhage due to spleen rupture. 33-year-old male presents with severe abdominal pain one week after a bike accident in which he sustained abdominal trauma. He is hypotensive and tachycardic, and imaging reveals a ruptured spleen and intraperitoneal hemorrhage.
An 8-year-old boy fell from his bike striking his left temple on the pavement. There was no immediate loss of consciousness, and a brief examination at the scene noted his pupils were symmetrical, reactive to the light, and he was moving all four limbs. Half an hour after the fall the child became drowsy, pale, and vomited. He was transferred to the emergency department. Upon arrival the heart rate was 52/min, blood pressure of 155/98. The Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS) was 6/15, the pupils were asymmetrical and movement of the right upper and lower extremities was impaired. The neurosurgical team advised deferring the CT scan in favor of initiating immediate treatment. 8-year-old boy with decreased level of consciousness 30 minutes after falling from his bike and hitting his head. He was not wearing a helmet. In the ER he was bradycardic and hypertensive, and the neurosurgeon strongly advised immediate treatment.
A group of 14 humanitarian service workers is preparing a trip to the Amazon Rainforest region in Brazil. All the members of the group have traveled on multiple occasions and have up-to-date vaccine certificates. Malaria Chemoprophylaxis is indicated but three of the women are in different stages of pregnancy. Group traveling to the Amazon rainforest, including 3 pregnant women. All members' immunizations are up-to-date but they require malaria prophylaxis.
A 21-year-old college student undergoes colonoscopy due to family history of multiple polyps in his older siblings. His brother underwent total proctocolectomy at age 22, and his sister underwent a total proctocolectomy at age 28, after both were found to have hundreds of colonic adenomas on colonoscopy. Both siblings are currently well without any findings of neoplasms. The patient undergoes sigmoidoscopy and is found to have dozens of small colonic polyps within rectosigmoid. Several of these are biopsied and are all benign adenomas. 21-year-old male with dozens of small polyps found on colonoscopy. Family history significant for both older siblings having total colectomies after colonoscopy revealed hundreds of adenomas.
A 31-year-old woman is seen in clinic with amenorrhea. She had menarche at age 14 and has had normal periods since then. However, her last menstrual period was 7 months ago. She also complains of an occasional milky nipple discharge. She is currently taking no mediations and would like to become pregnant soon. Examination shows a whitish nipple discharge bilaterally, but the rest of the examination is normal. Urine human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) is negative, thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH) is normal, but prolactin is elevated. 31-year-old female with amenorrhea, milky nipple discharge, negative urine pregnancy test, and elevated prolactin level.
A 51-year-old woman is seen in clinic for advice on osteoporosis. She has a past medical history of significant hypertension and diet-controlled diabetes mellitus. She currently smokes 1 pack of cigarettes per day. She was documented by previous LH and FSH levels to be in menopause within the last year. She is concerned about breaking her hip as she gets older and is seeking advice on osteoporosis prevention. 51-year-old smoker with hypertension and diabetes, in menopause, needs recommendations for preventing osteoporosis.
A 72-year-old man complains of increasing calf pain when walking uphill. The symptoms have gradually increased over the past 3 months. The patient had an uncomplicated myocardial infarction 2 years earlier and a transient ischemic attack 6 months ago. Over the past month, his blood pressure has worsened despite previous control with diltiazem, hydrochlorothiazide, and propranolol. His is currently taking isosorbide dinitrate, hydrochlorothiazide, and aspirin. On physical examination, his blood pressure is 151/91 mm Hg, and his pulse is 67/min. There is a right carotid bruit. His lower extremities are slightly cool to the touch and have diminished pulses at the dorsalis pedis. 72-year-old man with calf pain while walking uphill. History of ischemic heart disease and worsening hypertension despite medication compliance. On physical exam he has a right carotid bruit and his lower extremities are cool, with diminished dorsalis pedis pulses.
A 44 yo male is brought to the emergency room after multiple bouts of vomiting that has a "coffee ground" appearance. His heart rate is 135 bpm and blood pressure is 70/40 mmHg. Physical exam findings include decreased mental status and cool extremities. He receives a rapid infusion of crystalloid solution followed by packed red blood cell transfusion and is admitted to the ICU for further care. A 44-year-old man with coffee-ground emesis, tachycardia, hypoxia, hypotension and cool, clammy extremities.
A 62 yo male presents with four days of non-productive cough and one day of fever. He is on immunosuppressive medications, including prednisone. He is admitted to the hospital, and his work-up includes bronchoscopy with bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL). BAL fluid examination reveals owl's eye inclusion bodies in the nuclei of infection cells. A 62-year-old immunosuppressed male with fever, cough and intranuclear inclusion bodies in bronchoalveolar lavage
A 65 yo male with no significant history of cardiovascular disease presents to the emergency room with acute onset of shortness of breath, tachypnea, and left-sided chest pain that worsens with inspiration. Of note, he underwent a right total hip replacement two weeks prior to presentation and was unable to begin physical therapy and rehabilitation for several days following the surgery due to poor pain management. Relevant physical exam findings include a respiratory rate of 35 and right calf pain. A 65-year-old male presents with dyspnea, tachypnea, chest pain on inspiration, and swelling and pain in the right calf.
An 82-year-old woman comes to the emergency department because of chest pain and shortness of breath after being awakened in the morning by stabbing substernal chest pain radiating to the left shoulder and jaw. The patient had hypertension, renal-artery stenosis with chronic renal insufficiency, hypercholesterolemia, osteoporosis and dementia. Blood pressure was 199/108 mm Hg, respiratory rate 18 bpm, oxygen saturation 98% on ambient air. The heart sounds were rapid and with no murmurs. CK-MB was 10.9 ng/ml, CK was 89 U/l, CK index was 12.2% and Troponin T was 0.40 ng/ml. An EKG showed sinus regular tachycardia of 119 bpm, with ST-segment elevations up to 3 mm in V1, V2, and V3. A chest radiograph showed low lung volumes and right basilar subsegmental atelectasis. Coronary angiography showed no stenosis or clinically significant disease. Left ventriculography revealed akinesis of the anterior wall, hypokinesis of the apical and distal inferior walls, and compensatory hyperkinesis of the basal anterior and basal inferior walls. A transthoracic echocardiogram showed severe segmental left ventricular dysfunction involving the septum, anteroseptal territory, and apex. The overall left ventricular systolic function was mildly impaired and there was mild mitral regurgitation. 82-year-old woman awakened by acute stabbing chest pain, with ST-segment elevation, hypertension, sinus tachycardia, no diseases on coronary angiography and left ventricular dysfunction on ventriculography.
A 31-year-old woman with no previous medical problems comes to the emergency room with a history of 2 weeks of joint pain and fatigue. Initially she had right ankle swelling and difficulty standing up and walking, all of which resolved after a few days. For the past several days she has had pain, swelling and stiffness in her knees, hips and right elbow. She also reports intermittent fevers ranging from 38.2 to 39.4 degrees Celsius and chest pain. Young adult woman with 2 weeks of fever and migrating joint inflammation.
A 46-year-old woman presents with a 9 month history of weight loss (20 lb), sweating, insomnia and diarrhea. She reports to have been eating more than normal and that her heart sometimes races for no reason. On physical examination her hands are warm and sweaty, her pulse is irregular at 110bpm and there is hyperreflexia and mild exophthalmia. A 46-year-old woman with sweaty hands, exophthalmia, and weight loss despite increased eating.
A 20 yo female college student with no significant past medical history presents with a chief complaint of fatigue. She reports increased sleep and appetite over the past few months as well as difficulty concentrating on her schoolwork. She no longer enjoys spending time with her friends and feels guilty for not spending more time with her family. Her physical exam and laboratory tests, including hemoglobin, hematocrit and thyroid stimulating hormone, are within normal limits. A 22 year old female presents with changes in appetite and sleeping, fatigue, diminished ability to think or concentrate, anhedonia and feelings of guilt.
A 10 yo boy with nighttime snoring, pauses in breathing, and restlessness with nighttime awakenings. No history of headache or night terrors. The boy's teacher recently contacted his parents because she was concerned about his declining grades, lack of attention, and excessive sleepiness during class. A 10-year-old boy with difficulty concentrating, daytime sleepiness, and failure to thrive. The boy sleeps restlessly, snores, sweats, breathes heavily through his mouth and gasps in his sleep.
A 10 year old child is brought to the emergency room complaining of myalgia, cough, and shortness of breath. Two weeks ago the patient was seen by his pediatrician for low-grade fever, abdominal pain, and diarrhea, diagnosed with a viral illness, and prescribed OTC medications. Three weeks ago the family returned home after a stay with relatives on a farm that raises domestic pigs for consumption. Vital signs: T: 39.5 C, BP: 90/60 HR: 120/min RR: 40/min. Physical exam findings include cyanosis, slight stiffness of the neck, and marked periorbital edema. Lab results include WBC 25,000, with 25% Eosinophils, and an unremarkable urinalysis. A 10 year old child with recent history of pork consumption presents with fever, myalgia, facial edema and eosinophilia
A 38 year old woman complains of severe premenstrual and menstrual pelvic pain, heavy, irregular periods and occasional spotting between periods. Past medical history remarkable for two years of infertility treatment and an ectopic pregnancy at age 26. A 38 year old woman with severe dysmenorrhea, menorrhagia, and menometrorrhagia. PMH of infertility treatment and ectopic pregnancy
A 56-year old Caucasian female complains of being markedly more sensitive to the cold than most people. She also gets tired easily, has decreased appetite, and has recently tried home remedies for her constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin. She moves and talks slowly. A 56-year old Caucasian female presents with sensitivity to cold, fatigue, and constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin. Hypothyroidism
A 44-year-old man was recently in an automobile accident where he sustained a skull fracture. In the emergency room, he noted clear fluid dripping from his nose. The following day he started complaining of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination. A 44-year-old man complains of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination. Bacterial Meningitis
A 5-year-old boy presents to the emergency department with complaints of progressively worsening dysphagia, drooling, fever and vocal changes. He is toxic-appearing, and leans forward while sitting on his mother's lap. He is drooling and speaks with a muffled "hot potato" voice. The parents deny the possibility of foreign body ingestion or trauma, and they report that they are delaying some of his vaccines. A 5-year-old boy presents with difficulty in breathing, stridor, drooling, fever, dysphagia and voice change. Epiglottitis
A 27-year-old woman at 11 weeks gestation in her second pregnancy is found to have a hemoglobin (Hb) of 9.0 g/dL, white blood cell count 6.3 x 109/L, platelet count 119 x 109/L, mean corpuscular volume 109 fL. Further investigations reveal mild iron deficiency. She already receives iron supplementation. The obstetrician repeats the complete blood cell count 2 weeks later. The Hb is 8.9 g/dL, WBC count 7.1 x 109/L, and platelets 108 x 109/L. She describes difficulty swallowing. A reticulocyte count is performed and found elevated at 180 x 109/L. The obstetrician requests a hematology consult. The following additional results were found: Negative DAT, normal clotting screen, elevated LDH (2000 IU/L), normal urea and electrolytes, normal alanine aminotransferase (ALT), anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, no fragments, no agglutination, polychromasia and presence of hemosiderin in the urine. A young woman in her second gestation presenting with anemia resistant to improvement by iron supplementation, elevated LDH, anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, hemosiderinuria and normal clotting screen. Paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria
Karen is a 72-year-old woman with hypertension and type 2 diabetes, who was hospitalized for cryptogenic stroke two weeks ago. At the time, computed tomography was negative for brain hemorrhage and she was given thrombolytic therapy with resolution of her symptoms. Transesophageal echocardiogram and magnetic resonance angiogram of brain and great vessels found no evidence of abnormalities. She presents currently with a blood pressure of 120/70 mm Hg, normal glucose, and normal sinus rhythm on a 12-lead electrocardiogram. She reports history of occasional palpitations, shortness of breath and chest pain lasting for a few minutes and then stopping on their own. A 72-year-old woman with history of hypertension, type 2 diabetes, cryptogenic stroke, normal EKG, normal echocardiogram, normal angiograms, and complaints of occasional shortness of breath and palpitations. Paroxysmal atrial fibrillation
A 4 year old boy presents to the emergency room with wheezing. He has had a history of allergic rhinitis, but no history of wheezing. His mother reports that 5 hours ago patient was playing in the backyard sandbox when she heard him suddenly start coughing. The coughing lasted only moments, but he has been audibly wheezing since. Mother was concerned, because his breathing has not returned to normal, so she brought him to the ED. On exam, the child is playful and well appearing. Wheezing is heard in the mid-right chest area. O2 sats are 100% on room air. A 4 year old boy presents with wheezing after playing in the backyard unobserved. Foreign Body Aspiration
A 32 year old female with no previous medical history presents to clinic to discuss lab results from her most recent pap smear. She reports no complaints and is in general good health. The results of her PAP were cytology negative, HPV positive. A 32 year old female with screening that was positive for human papilloma virus with normal Pap smears. Cervical Cancer precursor
A 65 yo African-American male with shortness of breath related to exertion that has been worsening over the past three weeks. He also has difficulty breathing when lying flat and has started using two to three extra pillows at night. Significant physical exam findings include bibasilar lung crackles, pitting ankle edema and jugular venous distension. A 65-year-old African-American male with progressive dyspnea on exertion and while lying flat; bilateral pitting lower-extremity edema. The lungs revealed bilateral basilar crackles. Congestive Heart Failure
A 66yo female with significant smoking history and chronic cough for the past two years presents with recent, progressive shortness of breath. She is in moderate respiratory distress after walking from the waiting room to the examination room. Physical exam reveals mildly distended neck veins, a barrel-shaped chest, and moderate inspiratory and expiratory wheezes. She has smoked 1 to 2 packs per days for the past 47 years. A 66-year-old female smoker presents with worsening dyspnea, productive chronic cough, moderate respiratory distress and unintentional weight loss. Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease
An 89-year-old man was brought to the emergency department by his wife and son after six months of progressive changes in cognition and personality. He began to have poor memory, difficulty expressing himself, and exhibited unusual behaviors, such as pouring milk onto the table and undressing immediately after getting dressed. He is unable to dress, bathe, use the toilet, or walk independently. On examination the patient's temperature was 36.5°C (97.7°F), the heart rate 61 bpm in an irregular rhythm, the blood pressure 144/78 mm Hg, and the respiratory rate 18 bpm. The patient was alert and oriented to self and city but not year. He frequently interrupted the examiner. He repeatedly reached out to grab things in front of him, including the examiner's tie and face. He could not spell the word "world" backward, could not follow commands involving multiple steps and was unable to perform simple calculations. His speech was fluent, but he often used similar-sounding word substitutions. He could immediately recall three out of three words but recalled none of them after 5 minutes. Examination of the cranial nerves revealed clinically significant paratonic rigidity. Myoclonic jerks were seen in the arms, with symmetrically brisk reflexes. The reflexes in the legs were normal. An 89-year-old man with progressive change in personality, poor memory, and myoclonic jerks. Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease
A 32-year-old male presents to your office complaining of diarrhea, abdominal cramping and flatulence. Stools are greasy and foul-smelling. He also has loss of appetite and malaise. He recently returned home from a hiking trip in the mountains where he drank water from natural sources. An iodine-stained stool smear revealed ellipsoidal cysts with smooth, well-defined walls and 2+ nuclei. A 32-year-old male presents with diarrhea and foul-smelling stools. Stool smear reveals protozoan parasites. Giardiasis
A 65-year-old male with a history of tuberculosis has started to complain of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his left upper lobe. The spherical mass moved in the cavity during supine and prone CT imaging. Culture of the sputum revealed an organism with septated, low-angle branching hyphae that had straight, parallel walls. A 65-year-old male complains of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his lung. Culture of the sputum revealed fungal elements. Aspergillosis / Aspergilloma
An 18-year-old male returning from a recent vacation in Asia presents to the ER with a sudden onset of high fever, chills, facial flushing, epistaxis and severe headache and joint pain. His complete blood count reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit concentration and thrombocytopenia. An 18-year-old male returned from Asia a week ago. He presents with high fever, severe headache and joint pain. His blood analysis reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit and thrombocytopenia. Dengue
A 31 yo male with no significant past medical history presents with productive cough and chest pain. He reports developing cold symptoms one week ago that were improving until two days ago, when he developed a new fever, chills, and worsening cough. He has right-sided chest pain that is aggravated by coughing. His wife also had cold symptoms a week ago but is now feeling well. Vitals signs include temperature 103.4, pulse 105, blood pressure 120/80, and respiratory rate 15. Lung exam reveals expiratory wheezing, decreased breath sounds, and egophany in the left lower lung field. A 31 year old male presents with productive cough, chest pain, fever and chills. On exam he has audible wheezing with decreased breath sounds and dullness to percussion. Community Acquired Pneumonia (CAP)
A 10-year-old boy comes to the emergency department for evaluation of right knee pain. The child's guardians stated that he had been complaining of knee pain for the past 4 days and it had been getting progressively worse. There was no history of trauma. The day before the visit the boy developed a fever, and over the past day he has become increasingly lethargic. On physical examination blood pressure was 117/75 mm Hg, HR 138 bpm, temperature 38.1 C (100.5 F), respiration 28 bpm, oxygen saturation 97%. There was edema and tenderness of the right thigh and knee, as well as effusion and extremely limited range of motion. Sensation and motor tone were normal. Plain radiography and CT showed an osteolytic lesion. 10-year-old boy with progressive right knee and left leg pain and edema, lethargy and an osteolytic lesion. No history of trauma, fever, tachycardia, or urinary incontinence. osteomyelitis
A 28 yo female G1P0A0 is admitted to the Ob/Gyn service for non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy. Past medical history is remarkable for obesity, a non-complicated appendectomy at age 8, infertility treatment for the past 3 years, and pelvic laparoscopy during which minor right Fallopian tube adhesions were cauterized. Her LMP was 8 weeks prior to admission. Beta HCG is 100 mIU. The attending physician usually treats unruptured ecoptic pregnancies laparoscopically but is concerned about the patient's obesity and history of adhesions. An obese 28 yo female with non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy and history of adhesions. ectopic pregnancy
A 15 yo girl accompanied by her mother is referred for evaluation by the school. The girl has more than expected absences in the last three month, appears to be constantly tired and sleepy in class. Her mother assures the girl is well fed, and getting the proper sleep at night but admits the girls tires easily when they go out on weekend hikes. Physical examination: BP: 90/60. HR 130/min the only remarkable findings are extremely pale skin and mucosae. Grade 3/6 systolic murmur. Lab tests report Hb: 4.2 g/dL, MCV 61.8 fL, serum iron < 1.8 umol/L and ferritin of 2 ng/mL. Fecal occult blood is negative. A 15 yo girl with fatigue, pale skin, low hemoglobin and ferritin. Iron-Deficiency Anemia
A previously healthy 8-year-old boy presents with a complaint of right lower extremity pain and fever. He reports limping for the past two days. The parents report no previous trauma, but do remember a tick bite during a summer visit to Maryland several months ago. They do not remember observing erythema migrans. On examination, the right knee is tender and swollen. Peripheral WBC count and SRP are slightly elevated. An 8-year-old boy presents with a swollen right knee, lower extremity pain and fever. The parents report no history of trauma. The parents noticed a tick bite several months earlier. Lyme arthritis
A 4-year-old girl presents with persistent fever for the past week. The parents report a spike at 104°F. The parents brought the child to the emergency room when they noticed erythematous rash on the girl's trunk. Physical examination reveals strawberry red tongue, red and cracked lips, and swollen red hands. The whites of both eyes are red with no discharge. A 4-year-old girl with persistent high fever, skin rash, strawberry tongue, swollen red hands, and bilateral nonexudative conjunctivitis. Kawasaki disease
A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain and bruising on the inside and outside of the elbow, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. On the x-ray, the ulna has dislocated posteriorly from the trochlea of the humerus. The radius has dislocated from the capitulum of the humerus. A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. The x-ray, shows posterior elbow dislocation. elbow dislocation
A 44 yo male is brought to the emergency room after multiple bouts of vomiting that has a "coffee ground" appearance. His heart rate is 135 bpm and blood pressure is 70/40 mmHg. Physical exam findings include decreased mental status and cool extremities. He receives a rapid infusion of crystalloid solution followed by packed red blood cell transfusion and is admitted to the ICU for further care. A 44-year-old man with coffee-ground emesis, tachycardia, hypoxia, hypotension and cool, clammy extremities.
A 62 yo male presents with four days of non-productive cough and one day of fever. He is on immunosuppressive medications, including prednisone. He is admitted to the hospital, and his work-up includes bronchoscopy with bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL). BAL fluid examination reveals owl's eye inclusion bodies in the nuclei of infection cells. A 62-year-old immunosuppressed male with fever, cough and intranuclear inclusion bodies in bronchoalveolar lavage
A 65 yo male with no significant history of cardiovascular disease presents to the emergency room with acute onset of shortness of breath, tachypnea, and left-sided chest pain that worsens with inspiration. Of note, he underwent a right total hip replacement two weeks prior to presentation and was unable to begin physical therapy and rehabilitation for several days following the surgery due to poor pain management. Relevant physical exam findings include a respiratory rate of 35 and right calf pain. A 65-year-old male presents with dyspnea, tachypnea, chest pain on inspiration, and swelling and pain in the right calf.
An 82-year-old woman comes to the emergency department because of chest pain and shortness of breath after being awakened in the morning by stabbing substernal chest pain radiating to the left shoulder and jaw. The patient had hypertension, renal-artery stenosis with chronic renal insufficiency, hypercholesterolemia, osteoporosis and dementia. Blood pressure was 199/108 mm Hg, respiratory rate 18 bpm, oxygen saturation 98% on ambient air. The heart sounds were rapid and with no murmurs. CK-MB was 10.9 ng/ml, CK was 89 U/l, CK index was 12.2% and Troponin T was 0.40 ng/ml. An EKG showed sinus regular tachycardia of 119 bpm, with ST-segment elevations up to 3 mm in V1, V2, and V3. A chest radiograph showed low lung volumes and right basilar subsegmental atelectasis. Coronary angiography showed no stenosis or clinically significant disease. Left ventriculography revealed akinesis of the anterior wall, hypokinesis of the apical and distal inferior walls, and compensatory hyperkinesis of the basal anterior and basal inferior walls. A transthoracic echocardiogram showed severe segmental left ventricular dysfunction involving the septum, anteroseptal territory, and apex. The overall left ventricular systolic function was mildly impaired and there was mild mitral regurgitation. 82-year-old woman awakened by acute stabbing chest pain, with ST-segment elevation, hypertension, sinus tachycardia, no diseases on coronary angiography and left ventricular dysfunction on ventriculography.
A 31-year-old woman with no previous medical problems comes to the emergency room with a history of 2 weeks of joint pain and fatigue. Initially she had right ankle swelling and difficulty standing up and walking, all of which resolved after a few days. For the past several days she has had pain, swelling and stiffness in her knees, hips and right elbow. She also reports intermittent fevers ranging from 38.2 to 39.4 degrees Celsius and chest pain. Young adult woman with 2 weeks of fever and migrating joint inflammation.
A 46-year-old woman presents with a 9 month history of weight loss (20 lb), sweating, insomnia and diarrhea. She reports to have been eating more than normal and that her heart sometimes races for no reason. On physical examination her hands are warm and sweaty, her pulse is irregular at 110bpm and there is hyperreflexia and mild exophthalmia. A 46-year-old woman with sweaty hands, exophthalmia, and weight loss despite increased eating.
A 20 yo female college student with no significant past medical history presents with a chief complaint of fatigue. She reports increased sleep and appetite over the past few months as well as difficulty concentrating on her schoolwork. She no longer enjoys spending time with her friends and feels guilty for not spending more time with her family. Her physical exam and laboratory tests, including hemoglobin, hematocrit and thyroid stimulating hormone, are within normal limits. A 22 year old female presents with changes in appetite and sleeping, fatigue, diminished ability to think or concentrate, anhedonia and feelings of guilt.
A 10 yo boy with nighttime snoring, pauses in breathing, and restlessness with nighttime awakenings. No history of headache or night terrors. The boy's teacher recently contacted his parents because she was concerned about his declining grades, lack of attention, and excessive sleepiness during class. A 10-year-old boy with difficulty concentrating, daytime sleepiness, and failure to thrive. The boy sleeps restlessly, snores, sweats, breathes heavily through his mouth and gasps in his sleep.
A 10 year old child is brought to the emergency room complaining of myalgia, cough, and shortness of breath. Two weeks ago the patient was seen by his pediatrician for low-grade fever, abdominal pain, and diarrhea, diagnosed with a viral illness, and prescribed OTC medications. Three weeks ago the family returned home after a stay with relatives on a farm that raises domestic pigs for consumption. Vital signs: T: 39.5 C, BP: 90/60 HR: 120/min RR: 40/min. Physical exam findings include cyanosis, slight stiffness of the neck, and marked periorbital edema. Lab results include WBC 25,000, with 25% Eosinophils, and an unremarkable urinalysis. A 10 year old child with recent history of pork consumption presents with fever, myalgia, facial edema and eosinophilia
A 38 year old woman complains of severe premenstrual and menstrual pelvic pain, heavy, irregular periods and occasional spotting between periods. Past medical history remarkable for two years of infertility treatment and an ectopic pregnancy at age 26. A 38 year old woman with severe dysmenorrhea, menorrhagia, and menometrorrhagia. PMH of infertility treatment and ectopic pregnancy
A 56-year old Caucasian female complains of being markedly more sensitive to the cold than most people. She also gets tired easily, has decreased appetite, and has recently tried home remedies for her constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin. She moves and talks slowly. A 56-year old Caucasian female presents with sensitivity to cold, fatigue, and constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin.
A 44-year-old man was recently in an automobile accident where he sustained a skull fracture. In the emergency room, he noted clear fluid dripping from his nose. The following day he started complaining of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination. A 44-year-old man complains of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination.
A 5-year-old boy presents to the emergency department with complaints of progressively worsening dysphagia, drooling, fever and vocal changes. He is toxic-appearing, and leans forward while sitting on his mother's lap. He is drooling and speaks with a muffled "hot potato" voice. The parents deny the possibility of foreign body ingestion or trauma, and they report that they are delaying some of his vaccines. A 5-year-old boy presents with difficulty in breathing, stridor, drooling, fever, dysphagia and voice change.
A 27-year-old woman at 11 weeks gestation in her second pregnancy is found to have a hemoglobin (Hb) of 9.0 g/dL, white blood cell count 6.3 x 109/L, platelet count 119 x 109/L, mean corpuscular volume 109 fL. Further investigations reveal mild iron deficiency. She already receives iron supplementation. The obstetrician repeats the complete blood cell count 2 weeks later. The Hb is 8.9 g/dL, WBC count 7.1 x 109/L, and platelets 108 x 109/L. She describes difficulty swallowing. A reticulocyte count is performed and found elevated at 180 x 109/L. The obstetrician requests a hematology consult. The following additional results were found: Negative DAT, normal clotting screen, elevated LDH (2000 IU/L), normal urea and electrolytes, normal alanine aminotransferase (ALT), anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, no fragments, no agglutination, polychromasia and presence of hemosiderin in the urine. A young woman in her second gestation presenting with anemia resistant to improvement by iron supplementation, elevated LDH, anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, hemosiderinuria and normal clotting screen.
Karen is a 72-year-old woman with hypertension and type 2 diabetes, who was hospitalized for cryptogenic stroke two weeks ago. At the time, computed tomography was negative for brain hemorrhage and she was given thrombolytic therapy with resolution of her symptoms. Transesophageal echocardiogram and magnetic resonance angiogram of brain and great vessels found no evidence of abnormalities. She presents currently with a blood pressure of 120/70 mm Hg, normal glucose, and normal sinus rhythm on a 12-lead electrocardiogram. She reports history of occasional palpitations, shortness of breath and chest pain lasting for a few minutes and then stopping on their own. A 72-year-old woman with history of hypertension, type 2 diabetes, cryptogenic stroke, normal EKG, normal echocardiogram, normal angiograms, and complaints of occasional shortness of breath and palpitations.
A 4 year old boy presents to the emergency room with wheezing. He has had a history of allergic rhinitis, but no history of wheezing. His mother reports that 5 hours ago patient was playing in the backyard sandbox when she heard him suddenly start coughing. The coughing lasted only moments, but he has been audibly wheezing since. Mother was concerned, because his breathing has not returned to normal, so she brought him to the ED. On exam, the child is playful and well appearing. Wheezing is heard in the mid-right chest area. O2 sats are 100% on room air. A 4 year old boy presents with wheezing after playing in the backyard unobserved.
A 32 year old female with no previous medical history presents to clinic to discuss lab results from her most recent pap smear. She reports no complaints and is in general good health. The results of her PAP were cytology negative, HPV positive. A 32 year old female with screening that was positive for human papilloma virus with normal Pap smears.
A 65 yo African-American male with shortness of breath related to exertion that has been worsening over the past three weeks. He also has difficulty breathing when lying flat and has started using two to three extra pillows at night. Significant physical exam findings include bibasilar lung crackles, pitting ankle edema and jugular venous distension. A 65-year-old African-American male with progressive dyspnea on exertion and while lying flat; bilateral pitting lower-extremity edema. The lungs revealed bilateral basilar crackles.
A 66yo female with significant smoking history and chronic cough for the past two years presents with recent, progressive shortness of breath. She is in moderate respiratory distress after walking from the waiting room to the examination room. Physical exam reveals mildly distended neck veins, a barrel-shaped chest, and moderate inspiratory and expiratory wheezes. She has smoked 1 to 2 packs per days for the past 47 years. A 66-year-old female smoker presents with worsening dyspnea, productive chronic cough, moderate respiratory distress and unintentional weight loss.
An 89-year-old man was brought to the emergency department by his wife and son after six months of progressive changes in cognition and personality. He began to have poor memory, difficulty expressing himself, and exhibited unusual behaviors, such as pouring milk onto the table and undressing immediately after getting dressed. He is unable to dress, bathe, use the toilet, or walk independently. On examination the patient's temperature was 36.5°C (97.7°F), the heart rate 61 bpm in an irregular rhythm, the blood pressure 144/78 mm Hg, and the respiratory rate 18 bpm. The patient was alert and oriented to self and city but not year. He frequently interrupted the examiner. He repeatedly reached out to grab things in front of him, including the examiner's tie and face. He could not spell the word "world" backward, could not follow commands involving multiple steps and was unable to perform simple calculations. His speech was fluent, but he often used similar-sounding word substitutions. He could immediately recall three out of three words but recalled none of them after 5 minutes. Examination of the cranial nerves revealed clinically significant paratonic rigidity. Myoclonic jerks were seen in the arms, with symmetrically brisk reflexes. The reflexes in the legs were normal. An 89-year-old man with progressive change in personality, poor memory, and myoclonic jerks.
A 32-year-old male presents to your office complaining of diarrhea, abdominal cramping and flatulence. Stools are greasy and foul-smelling. He also has loss of appetite and malaise. He recently returned home from a hiking trip in the mountains where he drank water from natural sources. An iodine-stained stool smear revealed ellipsoidal cysts with smooth, well-defined walls and 2+ nuclei. A 32-year-old male presents with diarrhea and foul-smelling stools. Stool smear reveals protozoan parasites.
A 65-year-old male with a history of tuberculosis has started to complain of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his left upper lobe. The spherical mass moved in the cavity during supine and prone CT imaging. Culture of the sputum revealed an organism with septated, low-angle branching hyphae that had straight, parallel walls. A 65-year-old male complains of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his lung. Culture of the sputum revealed fungal elements.
An 18-year-old male returning from a recent vacation in Asia presents to the ER with a sudden onset of high fever, chills, facial flushing, epistaxis and severe headache and joint pain. His complete blood count reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit concentration and thrombocytopenia. An 18-year-old male returned from Asia a week ago. He presents with high fever, severe headache and joint pain. His blood analysis reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit and thrombocytopenia.
A 31 yo male with no significant past medical history presents with productive cough and chest pain. He reports developing cold symptoms one week ago that were improving until two days ago, when he developed a new fever, chills, and worsening cough. He has right-sided chest pain that is aggravated by coughing. His wife also had cold symptoms a week ago but is now feeling well. Vitals signs include temperature 103.4, pulse 105, blood pressure 120/80, and respiratory rate 15. Lung exam reveals expiratory wheezing, decreased breath sounds, and egophany in the left lower lung field. A 31 year old male presents with productive cough, chest pain, fever and chills. On exam he has audible wheezing with decreased breath sounds and dullness to percussion.
A 10-year-old boy comes to the emergency department for evaluation of right knee pain. The child's guardians stated that he had been complaining of knee pain for the past 4 days and it had been getting progressively worse. There was no history of trauma. The day before the visit the boy developed a fever, and over the past day he has become increasingly lethargic. On physical examination blood pressure was 117/75 mm Hg, HR 138 bpm, temperature 38.1 C (100.5 F), respiration 28 bpm, oxygen saturation 97%. There was edema and tenderness of the right thigh and knee, as well as effusion and extremely limited range of motion. Sensation and motor tone were normal. Plain radiography and CT showed an osteolytic lesion. 10-year-old boy with progressive right knee and left leg pain and edema, lethargy and an osteolytic lesion. No history of trauma, fever, tachycardia, or urinary incontinence.
A 28 yo female G1P0A0 is admitted to the Ob/Gyn service for non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy. Past medical history is remarkable for obesity, a non-complicated appendectomy at age 8, infertility treatment for the past 3 years, and pelvic laparoscopy during which minor right Fallopian tube adhesions were cauterized. Her LMP was 8 weeks prior to admission. Beta HCG is 100 mIU. The attending physician usually treats unruptured ecoptic pregnancies laparoscopically but is concerned about the patient's obesity and history of adhesions. An obese 28 yo female with non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy and history of adhesions.
A 15 yo girl accompanied by her mother is referred for evaluation by the school. The girl has more than expected absences in the last three month, appears to be constantly tired and sleepy in class. Her mother assures the girl is well fed, and getting the proper sleep at night but admits the girls tires easily when they go out on weekend hikes. Physical examination: BP: 90/60. HR 130/min the only remarkable findings are extremely pale skin and mucosae. Grade 3/6 systolic murmur. Lab tests report Hb: 4.2 g/dL, MCV 61.8 fL, serum iron < 1.8 umol/L and ferritin of 2 ng/mL. Fecal occult blood is negative. A 15 yo girl with fatigue, pale skin, low hemoglobin and ferritin.
A previously healthy 8-year-old boy presents with a complaint of right lower extremity pain and fever. He reports limping for the past two days. The parents report no previous trauma, but do remember a tick bite during a summer visit to Maryland several months ago. They do not remember observing erythema migrans. On examination, the right knee is tender and swollen. Peripheral WBC count and SRP are slightly elevated. An 8-year-old boy presents with a swollen right knee, lower extremity pain and fever. The parents report no history of trauma. The parents noticed a tick bite several months earlier.
A 4-year-old girl presents with persistent fever for the past week. The parents report a spike at 104°F. The parents brought the child to the emergency room when they noticed erythematous rash on the girl's trunk. Physical examination reveals strawberry red tongue, red and cracked lips, and swollen red hands. The whites of both eyes are red with no discharge. A 4-year-old girl with persistent high fever, skin rash, strawberry tongue, swollen red hands, and bilateral nonexudative conjunctivitis.
A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain and bruising on the inside and outside of the elbow, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. On the x-ray, the ulna has dislocated posteriorly from the trochlea of the humerus. The radius has dislocated from the capitulum of the humerus. A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. The x-ray, shows posterior elbow dislocation.
78 M transferred to nursing home for rehab after CABG. Reportedly readmitted with a small NQWMI. Yesterday, he was noted to have a melanotic stool and then today he had approximately 9 loose BM w/ some melena and some frank blood just prior to transfer, unclear quantity. A 78 year old male presents with frequent stools and melena. 78 M w/ pmh of CABG in early [**Month (only) 3**] at [**Hospital6 4406**] (transferred to nursing home for rehab on [**12-8**] after several falls out of bed.) He was then readmitted to [**Hospital6 1749**] on [**3120-12-11**] after developing acute pulmonary edema/CHF/unresponsiveness?. There was a question whether he had a small MI; he reportedly had a small NQWMI. He improved with diuresis and was not intubated. . Yesterday, he was noted to have a melanotic stool earlier this evening and then approximately 9 loose BM w/ some melena and some frank blood just prior to transfer, unclear quantity.
An elderly female with past medical history of hypertension, severe aortic stenosis, hyperlipidemia, and right hip arthroplasty. Presents after feeling a snap of her right leg and falling to the ground. No head trauma or loss of consciousness. An elderly female with past medical history of right hip arthroplasty presents after feeling a snap of her right leg and falling to the ground. Ms [**Known patient lastname 241**] is a [**Age over 90 2398**] year old woman with past medical history significant for hypertension, severe aortic stenosis, hyperlipidemia, arthroplasty. . Per the patient, she was standing and felt a snap of her right leg and fell to the ground. No head trauma or LOC. She was evaluated by orthopedics and transferred to medicine for optimization of her cardiac status. Review of systems: Ear, Nose, Throat: Dry mouth Cardiovascular: Edema, Orthopnea Respiratory: Dyspnea Flowsheet Data as of [**3294-3-6**] 10:33 PM Vital Signs Hemodynamic monitoring Fluid Balance 24 hours Since [**96**] AM Tmax: 37.5 C (99.5) Tcurrent: 37.5 C (99.5) HR: 102 (93 - 102) bpm BP: 117/54(70) {117/54(70) - 117/54(70)} mmHg RR: 24 (15 - 24) insp/min SpO2: 100% Heart rhythm: ST (Sinus Tachycardia) . -- Clarify She appears comfortable with adequate pain control with prn morphine. Given her tight valvular stenosis, she is high risk for general anesthesia. - would start standing tylenol 1g q8 - continue morphine IV prn for breakthrough - plan for OR tomorrow am per ortho pending optimization of her cardiac function, and improvement in renal function . # CAD: No clear documentation, however given age calcific atherosclerosis is highly likely -- continue statin -- Hold beta blocker for now -- hold aspirin in perioperative period . # ATRIAL FIBRILLATION: In setting of acute pain and peri-op. Will need to monitor as pt with high CHADS score, however in periop period would not be able to have systemic anticoagulation -- Rate control with beta blocker once stable -- If unstable, would use esmolol first, cardiovert last option. . # HTN: Better controlled on floor. Good BP control essential for preventing flash pulmonary edema in setting of AS. - continue metoprolol, as above - continue to monitor BP and consider adding another [**Doctor Last Name **] such as amlodipine 5mg daily if BP sustains above SBP 150s . # Hyperlipidemia - continue simvastatin 40mg PO daily . # FEN/GI: Low sodium diet, replete lytes PRN . # CODE: Confirmed DNR/DNI
A 75F with a PMHx significant for severe PVD, CAD, DM, and CKD presented after being found down unresponsive at home. She was found to be hypoglycemic to 29 with hypotension and bradycardia. Her hypotension and confusion improved with hydration. She had a positive UA which eventually grew klebsiella. She had temp 96.3, respiratory rate 22, BP 102/26, a leukocytosis to 18 and a creatinine of 6 (baseline 2). Pt has blood cultures positive for group A streptococcus. On the day of transfer her blood pressure dropped to the 60s. She was anuric throughout the day. She received 80mg IV solumedrol this morning in the setting of low BPs and rare eos in urine. On arrival to the MICU pt was awake but drowsy. On ROS, pt denies pain, lightheadedness, headache, neck pain, sore throat, recent illness or sick contacts, cough, shortness of breath, chest discomfort, heartburn, abd pain, n/v, diarrhea, constipation, dysuria. Is a poor historian regarding how long she has had a rash on her legs. A 75F found to be hypoglycemic with hypotension and bradycardia. She had UA positive for klebsiella. She had a leukocytosis to 18 and a creatinine of 6. Pt has blood cultures positive for group A streptococcus. On the day of transfer her blood pressure dropped to the 60s. She was anuric throughout the day, awake but drowsy. This morning she had temp 96.3, respiratory rate 22, BP 102/26. Pt is a 75F with a PMHx significant for severe PVD, CAD, DM, and CKD who presented to [**Hospital1 **]-[**Location (un) 1375**] on [**6-25**] after being found down unresponsive at home. She was found to be hypoglycemic to 29 with hypotension and bradycardia. Her hypotension and confusion improved with hydration. She had a positive UA which eventually grew klebsiella, treated initially with levofloxacin. She had a leukocytosis to 18 and a creatinine of 6 up from presumed prior baseline of ~2. On morning of transfer, pt had blood cultures result 3/3 bottles positive for GAS, her antibiotics were switched to vancomycin which was then changed to ceftriaxone. Her blood pressure dropped to the 60s. She was given a bolus of bicarb and transfered to their ICU. After an additional bolus of 500cc she was started on levophed. She was anuric throughout the day. She had a midline placed on right side. She received 80mg IV solumedrol this morning in the setting of low BPs and rare eos in urine. On arrival to the MICU pt was awake but drowsy. She was receiving levophed throughout her transfer. Arrival VS: 96.3 68 102/26 22 97% 2L NC on 0.04mcg/kg/min levophed. On ROS, pt denies pain, lightheadedness, headache, neck pain, sore throat, recent illness or sick contacts, cough, shortness of breath, chest discomfort, heartburn, abd pain, n/v, diarrhea, constipation, dysuria. Is a poor historian regarding how long she has had a rash on her legs. States she has not felt ill and she was brought to the hospital because her daughter came home and found her sleeping. Does complain of feeling very thirsty."
An 87 yo woman with h/o osteoporosis, multiple recent falls, CAD, who presents from nursing home with C2 fracture. The patient was in her usual state of health at her nursing home until yesterday morning when she sustained a fall when trying to get up to go to the bathroom. The fall was not witnessed, but the patient reportedly did not lose consciousness. The patient complained of neck and rib pain. She was taken to OSH, where she was found to have a comminuted fracture of C2. In the ED, the patient's VS were T 99.1, BP 106/42, P 101, R 24. She had an ECG which showed sinus tachycardia and ST depressions in V3 and V4. CT head was negative for ICH. An 87 yo woman with h/o osteoporosis, DM2, dementia, depression, and anxiety presents s/p fall with evidence of C2 fracture, chest pain, tachycardia, tachypnea, and low blood pressure. The patient is an 87 yo woman with h/o osteoporosis, multiple recent falls, CAD, who presents from nursing home with C2 fracture and evidence of pulmonary emoblus. The patient was in her usual state of health at her nursing home until yesterday morning when she sustained a fall when trying to get up to go to the bathroom. The fall was not witnessed, but the patient reportedly did not lose consciousness. At 3:30 that afternoon, the patient complained of neck and rib pain. She was taken to OSH, where she was found to have a comminuted fracture of C2. She was transferred to [**Hospital1 1**] for further evaluation. Of note, the patient was recently treated for CDiff infection at her nursing facility, per discussion with her daughter. . In the ED, the patient's VS were T 99.1, BP 106/42, P 101, R 24. She had an ECG which showed sinus tachycardia and ST depressions in V3 and V4. CT head was negative for ICH. She was seen by Trauma surgery, who recommended stabalization with a cervical collar for the next six to eight weeks, but they deemed that she is not an operable candidate.
An 82 man with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, status-post bioprosthetic atrial valve replacement for atrial stenosis, atrial fibrillation with cardioversion, right nephrectomy for renal cell carcinoma, colon cancer status-post colectomy, presents with 9 day history of productive cough, fever and dyspnea. An 82 man with multiple chronic conditions and previous surgeries presents with 9 day history of productive cough, fever and dyspnea. An 82 M with COPD, s/p bioprosthetic AVR for AS, afib s/p CV, right nephrectomy for RCC, colon ca s/p colectomy who presents with 9 day hostory of productive cough and fevers.light of stairs baseline. dyspnea and productive cough of several weeks. Otherwise patient is without any complaints In the ED, initial vs were: 80, sbp 100, mid 90s on 6L/NC. Last vital signs prior to ER transfer were 98.1, 83, 116/40, 20, 95% on 3L/NC. Patient looked comnfortable. 90% room air, INR 8, ABG, ARF, 2 liters ivf. guiac + brown, got levo, ceftriaxone. Physical Examination General Appearance: No acute distress Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic Cardiovascular: (PMI Normal), (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal), (Murmur: Systolic) Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Present), (Left DP pulse: Present) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Crackles : RLL, Wheezes : diffuse) Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present Extremities: Right lower extremity edema: Absent, Left lower extremity edema: Absent Skin: Warm Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): x3, Movement: Purposeful, Tone: Normal
A 94 year old female with hx recent PE/DVT, atrial fibrillation, CAD presents with fever and abdominal pain. Earlier, she presented with back pain and shortness of breath. She was found to have bilateral PE's and new afib and started on coumadin. Her HCT dropped slightly, requiring blood transfusion, with guaic positive stools. She was discharged and returned with abdominal cramping and black stools. EGD showed a small gastric and duodenal ulcer (healing), esophageal stricture, no active bleeding. She also had an abdominal CT demonstrating a distended gallbladder with gallstones and biliary obstruction with several CBD stones. A 94 year old female with hx recent PE/DVT, atrial fibrillation, CAD presents with fever and abdominal pain. An abdominal CT demonstrates a distended gallbladder with gallstones and biliary obstruction with several CBD stones. This is a [**Age over 90 **] year old female with hx recent PE/DVT, atrial fibrillation, CAD who is transfered from [**Hospital3 915**] Hospital for ERCP. She has had multiple admissions to [**Hospital3 915**] this past month, most recently on [**2963-11-24**]. In early [**Month (only) 776**], she presented with back pain and shortness of breath. She was found to have bilateral PE's and new afib and started on coumadin. Her HCT dropped slightly, requiring blood transfusion, with guaic positive stools. She was discharged and returned with abdominal cramping and black stools. She was found to have a HCT drop from 32 to 21. She was given vit K, given a blood transfusion and started on protonix. She received an IVF filter and EGD. EGD showed a small gastric and duodenal ulcer (healing), esophageal stricture, no active bleeding. She also had an abdominal CT demonstrating a distended gallbladder with gallstones and biliary obstruction with several CBD stones. Since 12 AM Tmax: 38 C (100.4 Tcurrent: 37.4 C (99.4 HR: 92 (83 - 94) bpm BP: 89/32(54) {89/32(54) - 94/37(60)} mmHg RR: 23 (23 - 33) insp/min SpO2: 100% Heart rhythm: SR (Sinus Rhythm)
This is a 41-year-old male patient with medical history of alcohol abuse, cholelithiasis, hypertension, obesity who presented to his local hospital with hematemasis. On Friday evening he had several episodes of vomiting of bright and dark red material. In the emergency department, initial vs were: T 98.6 P66 BP145/89 R16 O2 sat 98% RA. He was started on a protonix gtt and octreotide gtt given his elevated liver function tests. Lab tests show elevated lipase, pancytopenia and coagulopathy. He had a right upper abdominal quadrant ultrasound which demonstrated gallstones and sludge and ascites. As such given new ascites and abdominal pain he was given levofloxacin 750mg IV and flagyl 500mg IV reportedly for spontaneous bacterial peritonitis prophylaxis. On the floor, he reports that he had two episodes of vomiting of dark red emesis. Per his nurse it was about 75ml and was gastrocult positive. He has right upper abdominal quadrant pain radiating to his back. He also reports slow increase in abdominal girth with more acute distention and lower extremity swelling over the two days prior to admission. The patient denies fever, chills, night sweats, headache, sinus tenderness, rhinorrhea or congestion. Denied cough, shortness of breath. He also denied chest pain or tightness. A 41-year-old male patient with medical history of alcohol abuse, cholelithiasis, hypertension, obesity who presented to his local hospital with hematemasis, abdominal pain radiating to the back and elevated lipase. Signs of ascites, pancytopenia and coagulopathy. Mr. [**Known patient lastname 7952**] is a 41 yo M with PMH ETOH abuse, cholelithiasis, HTN, obesity who presented to [**Hospital3 **] with hematemasis. He reports that for the past 6 years he has been drinking [**2-9**] of a 1.7L bottle of vodka daily. On Friday evening he had several episodes of vomiting of bright and dark red material for which he presented to [**Hospital1 **]. He had an NG tube which reportedly failed to clear with lavage and patient self d/c'd the NGT because he was vomiting around the tube. He was given 4mg IV morphine for abdominal pain, ativan 2mg IV for withdrawal, protonix 40mg IV, zofran 8mg IV, octreotide 50mcg IV, and 1 unit of platelets. In the ED, initial vs were: T 98.6 P66 BP145/89 R16 O2 sat 98% RA. He was started on a protonix gtt and octreotide gtt given his elevated LFT's. He was also given a bananna bag. He had a RUQ ultrasound which demonstrated gallstones and sludge and per ED resident report ascites. As such given new ascites and abdominal pain he was given levofloxacin 750mg IV and flagyl 500mg IV reportedly for SBP prophylaxis. He was evaluted by GI in the ED. . On the floor, he reports that he had two episodes of vomiting of dark red emesis. Per his nurse it was about 75ml and was gastrocult positive. He otherwise endorese RUQ pain radiating to his back. He also reports slow increase in abdominal girth with more acute distention and lower extremity swelling over the two days prior to admission. Physical Examination Vitals: BP:153/92 P:64 R: 20 O2: 97% RA General: Alert, oriented, no acute distress, no asterixis HEENT: Sclera icteric, dry mucous membranes Neck: supple, obese, JVP not elevated Lungs: bibasilar crackles, no wheezes CV: Regular rate and rhythm, [**3-16**] soft nonradiating systolic murmur Abdomen: obese/distended, RUQ and epigastric tenderness to palpation, normoactive bowel sounds, no rebound or guarding. Ext: warm, well perfused, 1+ pitting edema bilaterally, 2+ pulses Labs WBC 2.5 Hct 36.2 Plt 28 Cr 0.5 Glucose 111 Other labs: PT / PTT / INR:19.1/31.6/1.7, ALT / AST:37/165, Alk Phos / T Bili:130/6.9, Amylase / Lipase:145/288, Albumin:2.5 g/dL, LDH:278 IU/L, Ca++:7.9 mg/dL, Mg++:1.7 mg/dL, PO4:3.0 mg/dL
A G2P0010 26 yo F, now estimated to 10 weeks pregnant, with 4yr hx of IDDM. Last menstrual period is not known but was sometime three months ago. Five days ago, the patient began feeling achy and congested. She had received a flu shot about 1 week prior. She continued to feel poorly and developed hyperemesis. She was seen in the ED (but not admitted), where she was given IVF, Reglan and Tylenol and she was found to have a positive pregnancy test. Today, she returned to the ED with worsening of symptoms. She was admitted to the OB service and given IVF and Reglan. Of note, her labwork demonstrates a blood glucose of 160, bicarbonate of 11, beta-hCG of 3373 and ketones in her urine. Her family noted that she was breathing rapidly and was quite somnolent. She appears to be in respiratory distress. A 26 year-old diabetic woman, estimated to 10 weeks pregnant, presents with hyperemesis. Her labwork demonstrates a blood glucose of 160, bicarbonate of 11, beta-hCG of 3373 and ketones in her urine. Ms. [**Known patient lastname **] is a G2P0010 26 yo F, now estimated to 10 weeks pregnant. Pt has 4yr hx of IDDM. LMP is not known but was sometime in [**Month (only) **]. On [**3243-11-10**], the patient began feeling achy and congested. She had received a flu shot about 1 week prior. She continued to feel poorly on [**3243-11-11**], and developed hyperemesis. She was seen in the ED (but not admitted) at [**Hospital3 **], where she was given IVF, Reglan and Tylenol and she was found to have a positive pregnancy test. Today, she returned to the ED with worsening of symptoms. She was admitted to the OB service and given IVF and Reglan. Of note, her labwork demonstrates a blood glucose of 160, bicarbonate of 11, beta-hCG of 3373 and ketones in her urine. Her family noted that she was breathing rapidly and was quite somnolent. She appears to be in respiratory distress. . The falling beta-HCG and trans-abdominal ultrasound indicate intra-uterine fetal demise. Medications on Admission: Lantus 65 units qAM Novolog SSI Cortef 3mg qAM, 1mg qHS . Meds on Transfer: Levophed Dopamine Solumedrol 80mg IV Amiodarone load Insulin in D10
This is a 24 and 2/7 weeks, 678 gm male, born to a 34-year-old G2, P0 to 3 woman. Prenatal screens were O positive, antibody negative, hepatitis B surface antigen negative, RPR nonreactive, rubella immune, and GBS unknown. This was an IVF pregnancy, notable for bleeding in the first trimester. The mother presented to the Hospital on the morning of delivery with premature rupture of membranes. Betamethasone was given approximately 18 hours prior to delivery. The mother was also started on ampicillin, gentamycin, and magnesium sulfate. Mother's labor progressed despite magnesium and she developed fever and chills. Maximum temperature was 101.2 degrees. Because of progressive labor and concerns for chorioamnionitis, the decision was made to deliver the infants. Delivery was by cesarean section. The infant was intubated in the Delivery Room and Apgars were 5 at one and 8 at five minutes. Examination was notable for an extreme pre-term infant, intubated. Weight was 678 gm. Chest x-ray shows respiratory immaturity and diffuse bilateral opacities within the lungs, left greater than right, with increased lung volumes. Infant with respiratory distress syndrome and extreme prematurity. Chest x-ray shows diffuse bilateral opacities within the lungs, with increased lung volumes. Infant is a 24 [**1-31**] week, 678 gm male triplet II who was admitted to the NICU for management of extreme prematurity. Infant was born to a 34 y.o. G2P0 now 3 mother. Prenatal screens: O+, antibody negative, HBsAg negative, RPR NR, RI, GBS unknown. IVF pregnancy notable for bleeding in the first trimester, cerclage placement at 19 weeks, and premature rupture of membranes on [**3435-11-28**] am. Mother presented to [**Hospital1 53**]. Betamethasone given [**11-28**] at 0640. Also started on ampicillin, gentamicin, and magnesium sulfate. Mother's labor progressed despite magnesium and she developed chills and a fever (Tm 101.2). Due to progressive labor and concerns for infection, decision made to deliver infants. Delivery by Cesarean section. Infant intubated in the Delivery Room and Apgars were 5 at one and 8 at five minutes. Infant transported to NICU. Exam: VS per CareView, of note has required several boluses of NS for low BP. Exam notes recorded on newborn examination form. Growth measurements: Wt 678 = 25%. -- Resp: Infant placed on SIMV. Rec'd 1 dose of surfactant. CXR FINDINGS: There are diffuse bilateral opacities within the lungs, left greater than right, with increased lung volumes. No pleural effusion or pneumothorax. An endotracheal tube is seen with tip approximately one vertebral body above the carina. An umbilical vein catheter is seen with tip in the superior vena cava and an umbilical artery catheter is seen with tip in the mid-thoracic region. The imaged portions of the abdomen show a few [**Last Name (un) 36399**]-filled loops of bowel within the left abdomen. No abnormal soft tissue mass or calcifications. No free interperitoneal air. The imaged bony structures are unremarkable.
A 55y/o F with sarcoidosis, COPD, idiopathic cardiomyopathy with EF 40% and diastolic dysfunction, varices s/p TIPS and hypothyroidism presenting today with confusion. She was brought to the ED by her husband for evaluation after he noted worsening asterixis. While in the waiting room the pt became more combative and then unresponsive. In the ED: VS - Temp 97.9F, HR 115, BP 122/80, R 18, O2-sat 98% 2L NC. She was unresponsive but able to protect her airway and so not intubated. She vomited x1 and received Zofran as well as 1.5 L NS. Labs were significant for K 5.5, BUN 46, Cr 2.2 (up from baseline of 0.8), and ammonia of 280. Stool was Guaiac negative. A urinalysis and CXR were done and are pending, and a FAST revealed hepatosplenomegaly but no intraperitoneal fluid. A 55-year-old woman with sarcoidosis, presenting today with confusion and worsening asterixis. In the waiting room, the pt became more combative and then unresponsive. Ammonia level 280 on admission. The patient is a 55-year-old woman with hepatic sarcoidosis and regenerative hyperplasia s/p TIPS [**10/3245**] placed [**1-27**] variceal bleeding and portal hypertensive gastropathy s/p TIPS re-do with angioplasty and portal vein embolectomy, who was brought to the ED by her husband for evaluation after he noted worsening asterixis. While in the waiting room the pt became more combative and then unresponsive. In the ED: VS - Temp 97.9F, HR 115, BP 122/80, R 18, O2-sat 98% 2L NC. She was unresponsive but able to protect her airway and so not intubated. She vomited x1 and received Zofran as well as 1.5 L NS. Labs were significant for K 5.5, BUN 46, Cr 2.2 (up from baseline of 0.8), and ammonia of 280. Stool was Guaiac negative. A urinalysis and CXR were done and are pending, and a FAST revealed hepatosplenomegaly but no intraperitoneal fluid. On arrival to the ICU the pt had another episode of emesis. NGT was placed to suction and 1.5L bilious material was drained. Allergies: Cipro (Oral) (Ciprofloxacin Hcl) Hives; Doxycycline Hives; hallucin Paxil (Oral) (Paroxetine Hcl) hair loss; Quinine Rash; Compazine (Injection) (Prochlorperazine Edisylate) muscle spasm; Levaquin (Oral) (Levofloxacin) tendinitis of t Lithium Hives;
A 80yo male with dementia and past history of CABG, two caths this year patent LIMA, totally occluded SVG to RPDA, SVG to OM2, s/p BMS to LCX, presents with increasing chest pain and nausea over the past few days. The patient has history of repeated episodes of recurrent chest pain with relief with morphine. Pt is on ASA, Statins, Imdur, and Heparin. Last month’s cath showed patent BMS in LCX and no new lesions. According to the family, the patient has increasing episodes of chest pain with minimal exertion in the last two weeks. 80 yo male with demantia and past medical history of CABG with repeated episodes of chest pain. Admitted for severe chest pain episode. Mr. [**Name13 (STitle) 5827**] is an 80yo M with dementia, CAD s/p CABG in [**3420**] (LIMA-LAD, SVG to OM2, SVG to RPDA), then s/p CABG redo in [**3426**], then s/p 2 caths this year with patent LIMA, totally occluded SVG to RPDA, SVG to OM2, s/p BMS to LCX on [**1-26**] who presented to [**Hospital3 53**] Hospital with increasing chest pain and nausea over the past few days. . Per report, patient has presented several times since last cathed for recurrent angina. Admitted to [**Hospital3 **] on [**3436-4-2**] with recurrent chest pain. Ruled out for MI. Last episode of chest pressure was the morning of transfer, associated with dry heaves and belching relieved with morphine. Pt was continued on ASA, Plavix, Statin, BBker, Imdur and placed on Heparin gtt. Cath last [**Month (only) **] here at [**Hospital1 5**] showed a patent BMS in LCX and no new lesions. According to the family he usually has angina once every day or two, but for the past 2 weeks he has been having angina with any minimal exertion (eg putting on his shirt), and waking him several times per night.
66 yo female pedestrian struck by auto. Unconscious and unresponsive at scene. Multiple fractures and complication secondary to the primary injury. S/p embolization of the avulsed second branch of brachial artery, complicated by exp lap secondary to suspicion of abdominal compartment syndrome. Not much of the response after weaning the sedation with CT of the head showing extensive interparenchymal hemorrhages throughout. 66 yo female pedestrian struck by auto. Unconscious and unresponsive at scene. Multiple fractures and head CT showing extensive interparenchymal hemorrhages. 66 yo female pedestrian struck by auto. Unconscious and unresponsive at scene. Multiple fractures and complication secondary to the primary injury. S/p embolization of the avulsed second branch of brachial artery, complicated by exp lap secondary to suspicion of abdominal compartment syndrome. Not much of the response after weaning the sedation but with minimal improvement with CT of the head showing with extensive interparenchymal hemorrhages throughout Tmax: 34.4 C (93.9 T current: 34.4 C (93.9 HR: 71 (71 - 88) bpm BP: 171/82(120) {158/74(113) - 171/83(122)} mmHg RR: 24 (10 - 24) insp/min SPO2: 99% Heart rhythm: SR (Sinus Rhythm)
A 43 year old woman with history of transverse myelitis leading to paraplegia, depression, frequent pressure ulcers, presenting with chills and reporting she felt "as if dying". Upon presentation, she denied any shortness of breath, nausea, vomiting, but did report diarrhea with two loose bowel movements per day. Patient reported that she had a fallout with her VNA and has not had any professional wound care. Patient is agitated, with rigors, complaining of feeling cold and back pain. Patient rolled and found to have a stage IV decubitus ulcer on coccyx and buttocks, heels. Admission labs significant for thrombocytosis, elevated lactate, and prolonged PT. A 43 year old woman with history of transverse myelitis leading to paraplegia, depression, frequent pressure ulcers, presenting with chills, agitation, rigors, and back pain. Patient has stage IV decubitus ulcers on coccyx and buttocks, heels. Admission labs significant for thrombocytosis, elevated lactate, and prolonged PT. Ms [**Known patient lastname 21112**] is a 43 year old woman with history of transverse myelitis leading to paraplegia, depression, frequent pressure ulcers, presenting with chills and reporting she felt "as if dying". Upon presentation, she denied any shortness of breath, nausea, vomiting, but did report diarrhea with two loose bowel movements per day. Patient reported that she had a fallout with her VNA and has not had any professional wound care since early [**Month (only) 51**]. Patient has a long history of psychiatric and behavioral problems. [**Name (NI) **] [**Name2 (NI) **] review, patient was dismissed from the [**Company 110**] practice due to abusive behavior against staff. She does not have a primary care provider at this time. In the ED: Temp 98.9 HR: 90 BP: 109/62 RR: 16 O2 Sat: 97% RA. Patient initially thought to be agitated yelling her EMS transporters were "white devils". Patient kept in observation area, although with rigors, complaining of feeling cold and back pain. Patient rolled and found to have a stage IV decubitus ulcer on coccyx and buttocks, heels. ================== ADMISSION LABS ================== [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD WBC-10.3 RBC-4.98 Hgb-8.1* Hct-30.7* MCV-62* MCH-16.2*# MCHC-26.3* RDW-17.5* Plt Ct-914* [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD Neuts-89.0* Bands-0 Lymphs-9.9* Monos-0.8* Eos-0.3 Baso-0.1 [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD PT-15.6* PTT-32.8 INR(PT)-1.4* [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD Glucose-99 UreaN-10 Creat-0.6 Na-135 K-4.9 Cl-102 HCO3-18* AnGap-20 [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD Calcium-8.5 Phos-3.2 Mg-2.3 [**3266-8-26**] 04:00PM BLOOD Lipase-17 [**3266-8-26**] 01:56PM BLOOD Lactate-6.3* [**3266-8-26**] 04:12PM BLOOD Lactate-2.9* [**3266-8-26**] 06:17PM BLOOD Lactate-1.6
A 52 year-old woman with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease and breast cancer who presented to an outside hospital with shortness of breath and back pain for several weeks. Had been seen by primary care provider for the back pain and treated with pain medications. Subsequently developed rash that was thought to be zoster. In the last few days, oxygen requirement increased and she had cough, fevers and sore throat. Noted oxygen saturation of 79% with ambulation at home. At outside hospital she was diagnosed with "multi-focal pneumonia." In the process of obtaining a computerized tomography scan, contrast infiltrated her arm with skin blistering and swelling. She was treated with ceftriaxone and transferred to current hospital. A 52 year-old woman with history of COPD and breast cancer who presents with SOB, hypoxia, cough, fevers and sore throat for several weeks. A 52 year old woman with COPD and breast cancer who presented to an OSH with SOB and back pain for several weeks. Had been seen by PCP for the back pain and treated with pain meds. Subsequently developed rash that was thought to be zoster. In the last few days, increased O2 requirement (2 liters at baseline --> 4 liters), cough, fevers and sore throat. Noted sat of 79% with ambulation at home. At OSH, diagnosed with "multi-focal pneumonia." In the process of obtaining a CT scan, had contrast infiltrate her arm with skin blistering and swelling. Treated with ceftriaxone and transferred to [**Hospital1 1**]. Patient admitted from: Transfer from other hospital History obtained from Patient, Medical records Physical Examination General Appearance: Well nourished, No(t) Anxious, sleepy Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL, No(t) Sclera edema Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic Cardiovascular: (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal), No(t) S3, No(t) S4, (Murmur: No(t) Systolic) Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Not assessed), (Left DP pulse: Not assessed) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: No(t) Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Wheezes : expiratory, Diminished: ), scoliotic, can feel ribs on the back on the right move with breathing Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present Extremities: Right: Trace, Left: Trace, No(t) Cyanosis, Clubbing Musculoskeletal: No(t) Unable to stand Skin: Not assessed, No(t) Jaundice, resolving zoster rash on right lateral chest, right arm is wrapped Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): person/place/time but sleepy, Movement: Not assessed, Tone: Not assessed
A 67 y.o. M with end stage COPD on home oxygen, tracheobronchomalacia s/p Y-stent, h/o RUL resection for squamous cell carcinoma with Cyberknife treatment. Patient had Y-stent placed complicated by cough and copious secretions requiring multiple therapeutic aspirations. Last bronchoscopy was at OSH, where patient had copious secretions that were aspirated. Pt reports compliance with Mucomyst nebs and Mucinex. Patient reports decreaed appetitie, 50 lb wt loss in 6 months. Decreased activity tolerance. Smokes 5 cig/day. PET scan revealed FDG avid soft tissue mass adjacent to lung resection site with some FDG avid nodes concerning for recurrence. On arrival, vitals were T98.6 HR86 BP106/78 O289. Pt denied chest pain, palpitations, trauma, F/C, N/V/D. Pt. presents with worsening SOB with R shoulder pain and weakness. 67 y.o. male smoker with end stage COPD on home oxygen, tracheobronchomalacia, s/p RUL resection for squamous cell carcinoma. Y-stent placement was complicated by cough and copious secretions requiring multiple therapeutic aspirations. Patient reports decreased appetite, 50 lb wt loss in 6 months. Decreased activity tolerance. PET scan revealed some FDG avid nodes concerning for recurrence. Pt. presents with worsening SOB with R shoulder pain and weakness. Mr. [**Known patient lastname 3887**] is a 67 y.o. M with end stage COPD on home O2 3 L NC, tracheobronchomalacia s/p Y-stent, s/p RUL resection for squamous cell carcinoma with Cyberknife treatment in [**2764**]. Patient had Y-stent placed in [**2769-1-1**] complicated by cough and copious secretions requiring multiple therapeutic aspirations. Last bronchoscopy was [**5-/2769**] at OSH, where patient had copious secretions that were aspirated. Pt reports compliance with Mucomyst nebs and Mucinex. He wears O2 "almost" 24 hours/day, but always at night. He does not wear his CPAP. Endorses inability to expectorate secretions and having "full feeling" for [**1-7**] weeks. Decreaed appetitie, 50 lb wt loss in 6 months. Decreased activity tolerance. Smokes 5 cig/day. PET scan in [**6-12**] revealed FDG avid soft tissue mass adjacent to RUL resection site with some FDG avid nodes concerning for recurrence. On arrival to [**Hospital1 17**], vitals were T98.6 HR86 BP106/78 O289. Pt denied chest pain, palpitations, trauma, F/C, N/V/D. R shoulder full PROM, limited abduction on active ROM.
A 90+ year old woman who was recently hospitalized for legionella PNA, and has been continuing her recovery at home with her son. She had been doing fairly well for the last few days except for some waxing and waning confusion, and perhaps intermittent dysarthria. The son was getting ready for work at 1:15am today, as per his usual routine. He looked in on the patient at that time; she appeared to be sleeping comfortably in bed, on her back. Soon thereafter, he heard her walking to the bathroom. At 1:40am, he heard a loud crash coming from the bathroom. He found the patient on the floor of the bathroom, making non-verbal utterances and with minimal movement of the right side. A 90+ year old woman who was recently hospitalized for legionella PNA, with confusion and dysarthria the last few days. Found down in the bathroom this morning, making non-verbal utterances and with minimal movement of the right side. The patient is a [**Age over 90 **] year old woman who was recently hospitalized for legionella PNA, and has been continuing her recovery at home with her son. She had been doing fairly well for the last few days except for some waxing and [**Doctor Last Name 279**] confusion, and perhaps intermittent dysarthria. The son was getting ready for work at 1:15am today, as per his usual routine. He looked in on the patient at that time; she appeared to be sleeping comfortably in bed, on her back. Soon thereafter, he heard her walking to the bathroom. At 1:40am, he heard a loud crash coming from the bathroom. He found the patient on the floor of the bathroom, making non-verbal utterances and with minimal movement of the right side. The glass holder which held the toothbrushes was shattered on the floor. The son called EMS. HEENT: Eyes closed, non-responsive to verbal stimuli, non-verbal, grimaces on sternal rub Cranial Nerves: Pupils equally round and reactive to light, 3 to 2 mm bilaterally. Eyes closed, left gaze preference, normal doll's, corneal intact, R facial weakness, tongue was midline Motor: spontaneous movement L side; triple flexion on R side. No anti-gravity movement. Sensation: Winces to noxious stimuli on the right. Withdraws to noxious stimuli on the left Upgoing toe on R Coordination: unable to test Gait: unable to test
This is a 76-year-old female with personal history of diastolic congestive heart failure, atrial fibrillation on Coumadin, presenting with low hematocrit and shortness of breath. Her hematocrit dropped from 28 to 16.9 over the past 6 weeks with progressive shortness of breath, worse with exertion over the past two weeks. She reports orthopnea. She denies fevers, chills, chest pain, palpitaitons, cough, abdominal pain, constipation or diahrrea, melena, blood in her stool, dysuria or rash. Her electrocardiogram present no significant change from previous. Her Guaiac was reported as being positive. 76-year-old female with personal history of diastolic congestive heart failure, atrial fibrillation on Coumadin, presenting with low hematocrit and dyspnea. This is a 76-year-old female with pmh of diastolic CHF, atrial fibrillation on coumadin, presenting with Hct 16.9 and shortness of breath. She had routine labs drawn yesterday at her PCP's office. Once her hematocrit came she was called and instructed to come to the ED. She is also reporting progressive shortness of breath worse with exertion over the past two weeks. She denies fevers, chills, chest pain, palpitaitons, cough, abdominal pain, constipation or diahrrea, melena, blood in her stool, dysuria, rash. She reports orthopnea. In the ED: vitals were 98.4 131/49, 60 24 100% 2L. ekg with NSR, twi in V1, no significant change from previous. Repeat CBC showed Hct 16.1 with haptoglobin < 20, and elevated LDH to 315. In addition, her guaiac was reported as being positive. Past medical history: Hypertension Atrial flutter/fibrillation, s/p cardioversion [**2797-1-27**] Diastolic heart failure Hysterectomy Bilateral hip replacements Social History: Married for 53 years with four children. She is retired from the airport. She does not smoke or drink. Occupation: retired from airport Drugs: denies Tobacco: denies any history Alcohol: denies
A 40-year-old woman with a history of alcoholism complicated by Delirium Tremens and seizures 2 years ago, polysubstance abuse ncluding IV heroin, cocaine, crack (last use 2 years ago), heroin inhalation (last use 2 days ago), hep C, presents for voluntary admission for detox. The patient would like to undergo detoxification so she can take care of her children. She also complains of abdominal pain in lower quadrants, radiating to the back since yesterday. She says the pain has worsened since yesterday and is not related to food intake. She also complains of nausea, vomitting (bilious but nonbloody), and diarrhea (no black or red stools). She stopped her methadone 1 week ago in an effort to quit drug abuse. She reports dyspnea on exertion, orthopnea. Also describes weight gain. Labs are significant for elevated lipase. A 40-year-old woman with a history of alcoholism complicated by Delirium Tremens and seizures 2 years ago, polysubstance abuse, hep C, presents with abdominal pain in lower quadrants, radiating to the back, nausea, vomitting and diarrhea. Labs are significant for elevated lipase. 40 year old woman with a h/o alcoholism c/b DTs/seizures 2 years ago, polysubstance abuse including IV heroin, cocaine, crack (last use 2 years ago), heroin inhalation (last use 2 days ago), hep C, presents for voluntary admission for detox. The patient would like to undergo detoxification so she can take care of her children. She also complains of abdominal pain, [**12-24**], lower quadrants, radiating to the back since yesterday. She cannot describe any relationship with food as she has not eaten anything. She says the pain has worsened since yesterday. She also complains of nausea, vomitting (bilious but nonbloody), and diarrhea (no black or red stools). Her last drink was 9am on [**3154-2-15**]. Recently stopped her methadone 1 week ago in an effort to quit drug abuse. . In the ED she was 98.6 101 149/96 20 96. She was [**Doctor Last Name 2062**] 16-25 on CIWA. ROS: (+) Reports DOE, orthopnea. Also describes weight gain since given birth to her child 17 months ago, she attributes this to her recent pregnancy. She complains of tremors and also complains of a moderate headache that's been stable. . (-) Denies CP, fevers, chills, or cough, palpitations, edema, joint pains, rashes, AVH, SI, or HI. Past Medical History: -Alcoholism (drinks baseline 1 pint of liquor/day, past week drinking 1 liter of vodka/day) -Polysubstance abuse - including cocaine, IV heroin, and crack 2 years ago, snorting heroin 2 days ago. -Hep C, never treated, unknown severity, genotype, etc -Infectious endocarditis in her 20s, 6 wks of abx no surgeries -No h/o STDs, HIV neg 3 weeks ago -Hep B immunized Family History: Alcoholism in mother, father, and sister. Father also used cocaine and sister also used ecstasy. Occupation: Formerly worked at Investment Firm Quality Control Dept Physical Examination Vitals: T: 99.6 BP: 152/96 P: 99 R: 27 O2: 99%RA General: Alert, oriented x3, anxious, labile with at times inappropriate laughter mixed with anxiety, obese woman. HEENT: Sclera anicteric, MMM, oropharynx clear Neck: supple, JVP difficult to assess given habitus Lungs: Clear to auscultation bilaterally, no wheezes, rales, ronchi CV: Tachycardic, regular rhythm, normal S1 + S2, no murmurs, rubs, gallops Abdomen: soft, diffuse tenderness to palpation, obese, non-distended, bowel sounds present, no rebound tenderness or guarding, no organomegaly. During the exam she complains of severe tenderness but a few minutes later is laughing and sitting comfortably in bed. Ext: warm, well perfused, 2+ pulses, no clubbing, cyanosis or edema Labs PT / PTT / INR:13.7/29.4/1.2, ALT / AST:106/249, Alk Phos / T Bili:145/3.0, Amylase / Lipase:135/221, Differential-Neuts:57.3 %, Lymph:34.1 %, Mono:7.0 %, Eos:0.8 %, Lactic Acid:1.8 mmol/L, Albumin:4.1 g/dL, LDH:329 IU/L, Ca++:8.2 mg/dL, Mg++:1.7 mg/dL, PO4:2.5 mg/dL
78 year old female with PMHx HTN, dCHF, Diabetes, CKD, Atrial fibrillation on coumadin, ischemic stroke, admitted after presenting to cardiology clinic today with confusion and Somnolence. Of note, she was recently discharged after presyncope/falls. At that time, lasix was stopped and atenolol was switched to metoprolol as there was concern that blunting of tachycardia could be contributing to falls. She was discharged to rehab (previously living at home). Per report from the ER, patient has had confusion at home for 3 weeks, though no family accompanies her to corroborate this story, and patient denies this. The patient is not sure why she is in the hospital. She saw her cardiologist today, who referred her to the ER after she appeared to be dehydrated, somnolent, and confused. The patient denies headache, blurry vision, numbness, tingling or weakness. No CP. +SOB, worsening DOE. No nausea, vomiting. 78 year old female with PMHx HTN, dCHF, Diabetes, CKD, Atrial fibrillation on coumadin, ischemic stroke, admitted after presenting with confusion and somnolence. She was recently discharged after presyncope/falls. Patient has had confusion at home for 3 weeks. The patient denies headache, blurry vision, numbness, tingling or weakness, nausea or vomiting. 78 year old female with PMHx HTN, dCHF, Diabetes, CKD, Atrial fibrillation on coumadin, ischemic stroke, admitted after presenting to cardiology clinic today with confusion and Somnolence. Of note, she was recently discharged at the beginning of [**2876-4-14**] after presyncope/falls. At that time, lasix was stopped and atenolol was switched to metoprolol as there was concern that blunting of tachycardia could be contributing to falls. She was discharged to rehab (previously living at home). Per report from the ER, patient has had confusion at home x 3 weeks, though no family accompanies her to corroborate this story, and patient denies this. The patient is not sure why she is in the hospital. She saw her cardiologist today, who referred her to the ER after she appeared to be dehydrated, somnolent, and confused. The patient denies headache, blurry Vision, numbness, tingling or weakness. No CP. +SOB, worsening DOE. No nausea, vomiting. Physical Exam: GENERAL: Intubated, NAD HEENT: Normocephalic, atraumatic. No scleral icterus. MMM, OP clear. CARDIAC: irregularly irregular. Normal S1, S2. No murmurs, rubs or [**Last Name (un) 597**]. LUNGS: CTAB ABDOMEN: Soft, NT, ND. +BS EXTREMITIES: 1+ edema NEUROLOGIC: Mental status: Intubated, off sedation, minimal arousal to voice/stimulation. Not following commands. Cranial nerves: Pupils sluggishly reactive, both post-surgical, R 4->3, L 3.5->3. Gaze midline and conjugate, face appears symmetric. Motor: Withdraws LUE and LLE weakly, no response RUE, triple flexion RLE. Sensory: withdraws to noxious stimulation weakly as above, L>R Coordination: unable to assess Gait: unable to assess
A 87 year old female NH resident with a history of chronic atrial fibrillation, hypertension and hypothyroidism who presents wit abdominal pain. She had been in her usual state of health until 5 days ago when she suddenly began to have abdominal pain. Her abdominal pain was initially intermittent lasting for a few hours at at time. No clear correlation with food. Yesterday, she noticed that her pain was much more severe and more localized to the right. This was accompanied by nausea and vomitting. She vomitted twice, with clear liquid emesis and was sent to a hospital. At the hospital, she was noted to have elevated amylase/lipase to 538 and 516 with elevated bili to 4.1 and AST/ALT to 198/115 and was given ciprofloxacin, flagyl and 500cc NS and was transferred to the emergency department. At the emergency department her vital signs were TM 97.9 HR 83 BP 157/92 RR 18 sat 97% RA. A 87 yo female reports several days abdominal pain, worse yesterday, severe and more localized to the right, accompanied by nausea and vomitting. Labs show elevated bilirubin, transaminitis, amylase and lipase. This is a 87 year old female NH resident with a history of chronic atrial fibrillation, hypertension and hypothyroidism who presents to the [**Hospital Unit Name 10**]. She had been in her usual state of health until 5 days ago when she suddenly began to have abdominal pain. Her abdominal pain was initially intermittent lasting for a few hours at at time. No clear correlation with food. Yesterday, she noticed that her pain was much more severe, [**3301-9-5**] in severity and more localized to the right. This was accompanied by nausea and vomitting. She vomitted twice, with clear liquid emesis and was sent to [**Hospital3 **]. At [**Hospital1 **], she was noted to have elevated amylase/lipase to 538 and 516 with elevated bili to 4.1 and AST/ALT to 198/115 and was given ciprofloxacin, flagyl and 500cc NS and was transferred to the [**Hospital1 1**] emergency department. . At [**Hospital1 1**] EDVS 97.9 HR 83 157/92 RR 18 97% RA. Elderly F, oriented X 2, NAD, flat jvp, CTA decreased b/b, s1 s2 [**Last Name (un) **], decreased BS, + t at ruq, no edema
A 63 yo man with h/o biphenotypic ALL, now Day + 32 from allogeneic SCT, who presents with one week of worsening SOB and two days of a clear productive cough. The patient states his SOB occured when lying flat, but not with activity. Also admitted to chest pressure which would come and go in his left chest no related to the SOB. Sleeps with 3 pillows (no change from baseline), denies PND; admits to a slight increase in lower extremity edema. Admits to low grade fevers to the 99's and crampy abdominal pain. Denies chills, night sweats, vomiting, or diarrhea. Patient also has a history of CMV infection, aspergillus and Leggionare's disease and is on posaconazole. His CXR showed an opacification of the left basilar lobe and also right upper lobe concerning for pneumonia as well as a small loculated right pleural effusion. A 63 year-old male with biphenotypic ALL, Day +32 after BMT, h/o CMV infection, aspergillus and Leggionare's disease, presents with acute onset of hypoxia accompanied by fever and two days of productive cough. His CXR showed an opacification of the left basilar lobe and also right upper lobe concerning for pneumonia. Mr. [**Known patient lastname 4075**] is a 63 yo man with h/o biphenotypic ALL, now Day + 32 from allogeneic SCT, who presents to clinc with one week of worsening SOB and two days of a clear productive cough. The patient states his SOB occured when lying flat, but not with activity. Also admitted to chest pressure which would come and go in his left chest no related to the SOB. Sleeps with 3 pillows (no change from baseline), denies PND; admits to a slight increase in lower extremity edema. Admits to low grade fevers to the 99's and crampy abdominal pain. Denies chills, night sweats, vomiting, or diarrhea. Assessment and Plan Assesment: This is a 63 year-old male with a history of h/o biphenotypic ALL, now Day + 32 from allogeneic SCT, who presents with hypoxia, one week of worsening SOB, and two days of productive cough. Plan: # Hypoxia: The patient developed acute onset of hypoxia accompanied by fever and a one day cough with sputum production. Given that the patient is about 1 month s/p allogenic SCT the differential is broad and would include bacterial pneumonia, viral pneumonia (CMV, flu), and opportunistic infections including fungal infections. Patient also has a history of CMV infection, aspergillus and Leggionare's disease and is on posaconazole. His CXR showed an opacification of the left basilar lobe and also right upper lobe concerning for pneumonia as well as a small loculated right pleural effusion. Also in the differential is noninfectious causes such as PE, CHF, or MI. US were negative for clot and his first set of CE were negative.
94M with CAD s/p 4v-CABG, CHF, CRI presented with vfib arrest. Initial labs significant for K 2.7. EKG showed sinus rhythm, HR 80 with LAD, prolonged PR, TD 0.5 to 1mm in V4-V6. Echo showed Mildly depressed global left ventricular function, mild to moderate aortic regurgitation and mild mitral regurgitation. 94 M with CAD s/p 4v-CABG, CHF, CRI presented with vfib arrest. 94 M with CAD s/p 4V-CABG [**3420**] and CRI had been doing well until this AM when he was out walking with his wife. [**Name (NI) **] abruptly syncopized and a bystander started CPR quickly. The local fire department delivered two shocks without success. Then EMS came and gave two more shocks and he went back into sinus. It is unclear whether he regained consciousness. He was intubated then brought to [**Hospital1 5**] ED. . In the ED, his intial SBP was reported to be 110. Labs show K 2.7 and Hct 25. He was given 40mEq of KCL. On repeat labs, his K normalized and his Hct was 33 without any blood. It is unclear whether one of the labs was erroneous. the vitals were recorded as: T=34.8, HR 62, 132/74, 18, 100% on AC 18x500, FiO2 100%. EKG: Sinus at 80 BPM with LAD, prolonged PR, TD 0.5 to 1mm in V4-V6 . ECHO: The left atrium and right atrium are normal in cavity size. There is mild symmetric left ventricular hypertrophy with normal cavity size. There is mild global left ventricular hypokinesis (LVEF = 45-50 %). The right ventricular free wall is hypertrophied. Right ventricular chamber size is normal. with normal free wall contractility. The aortic root is mildly dilated at the sinus level. The ascending aorta is moderately dilated. The aortic valve leaflets (3) are mildly thickened but aortic stenosis is not present. Mild to moderate ([**1-13**]+) aortic regurgitation is seen. The mitral valve leaflets are mildly thickened. There is no mitral valve prolapse. Mild (1+) mitral regurgitation is seen. The tricuspid valve leaflets are mildly thickened. The estimated pulmonary artery systolic pressure is normal. There is a trivial/physiologic pericardial effusion. IMPRESSION: Mildly depressed global left ventricular function. Mild to moderate aortic regurgitation. Mild mitral regurgitation.
85M dementia, colon cancer and recent colectomy with primary reanastomosis p/w melena. HCT 30 to 23 but hemodynamically stable. NGL negative. Exam notable for Tm 99 BP 128/50 HR 70 RR 16 with sat 100 on RA. WD man, NAD. Chest clear, JVP 8cm. RR s1s2. Soft abdomen, well healed surgical scar. No edema or cord. Labs notable for WBC 7K, HCT 24, K+ 4.0, Cr 0.7. 85 yo M with PMH of colon CA s/p resection now presenting with black stools and HCT drop. 85y/o m w/ hx AD, diverticulosis, recently dx colon ca s.p hemicolectomy p/w dark stools and dropping Hct (30 -->26-->23). NG lavage was negative in ED, however, pt with duodenal ulcer on EGD [**7-2**]. Possibly recent PUD vs anastomotic site vs [**1-26**] colon ca vs diverticulosis. Review of systems: Constitutional: No(t) Fever Cardiovascular: No(t) Chest pain, No(t) Palpitations Respiratory: No(t) Cough, No(t) Dyspnea Gastrointestinal: No(t) Abdominal pain, No(t) Nausea, No(t) Emesis, No(t) Diarrhea, No(t) Constipation Since 12 AM Tmax: 37.3 C (99.2 Tcurrent: 37.3 C (99.2 HR: 69 (64 - 78) bpm BP: 150/73(91) {128/39(65) - 150/99(103)} mmHg RR: 16 (16 - 24) insp/min SpO2: 100% Heart rhythm: SR (Sinus Rhythm) O2 Delivery Device: None SpO2: 100% ABG: //// Physical Examination General Appearance: No acute distress, Thin Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL, No(t) Conjunctiva pale Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic Lymphatic: Cervical WNL, Supraclavicular WNL Cardiovascular: (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal), RRR Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Present), (Left DP pulse: Present) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Clear : ) Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present, No(t) Tender: , healing colectomy scar, no erythema, tenderness, bleeding, oozing. Extremities: Right: Absent, Left: Absent Skin: Not assessed Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): only new year and thought he was at [**Hospital1 947**], Alzheimer's: pt with baseline dementia. Pt oriented to self, but not time or place. Movement: Purposeful, Tone: Normal Labs / Radiology WBC 9.7 Hct 24.0 Plt 593 Other labs: PT / PTT / INR:14.4/27.2/1.3"
51 year-old man with multiple sclerosis, quadriparesis, hypertension, restrictive lung disease, chronic constipation and small bowel obstruction after ileostomy, multiple urinary tract infections (also after placement of suprapubic tube), presents with small bowel obstruction and urinary tract infection. Admitted today as his home health aide noticed his urine output was low, 75cc overnight when he usually has about 1 liter overnight. Over the past two weeks he has had mild earaches, a sorethroat as well as some rhinorrhea. He denies any abdominal pain, has not sujectively noticed any change in abdominal distention. In the Emergency Department, he was noted to be severely dehydrated on exam, and creatinine level was 1.4 up from 0.6. 51 years-old male with multiple sclerosis and quadriplegia who presents with small bowel obstruction and low urinary output. This is a 51 year-old M w/ a h/o MS, quadraparesis, HTN, restrictive lung disease, chronic constipation and SBOs s/p ileostomy, multiple UTIs (also s/p suprapubic tube) presents with SBO and UTI. Of note he was just recently discharged from the [**Hospital1 52**] on [**10-2**] for an admission for a UTI (negative cultures) treated with cipro, shingles treated w/ acyclovir and SBO evaluated by surgery but managed conservatively. He returns today as his home health aide had noticed his Urine output was low, 75cc overnight when he usually has about 1 liter of UOP overnight. His ostomy output has been high. He has not noticed any symptoms. Over the past two weeks he has had mild earaches, a sorethroat as well as some rhinorrhea. He has not noticed any watery / itchy eyes. He has not sure if he has had a change in his ostomy output or suprapubic output. He has not noticed any visual changes, he has not noticed any new neurologic si/sx. He denies any abdominal pain, has not sujectively noticed any change in abdominal distention. He denies any pain in regards to his zoster (now or when diagnosed). Denies CP, has an occasional cough that is not worsening. . In the ED, he was noted to be severely dehydrated on exam. His BP nadir was 79/43 and HR peak was 97. T 99 (he usually "runs low"), new ARF 1.4 up from 0.6.
A 64 yo female with with history of atrial fibrillation, Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease, hypertension, hyperlipidemia, repair of an atrial septum defect which was complicated by sternal wound infection and post-operative atrial fibrillation treated with amiodarone, was initially admitted through the Emergency Department with shortness of breath and back pain, and was noted to have atrial fibrillation with rapid ventricular response. A computed tomography angiography demonstrated diffuse left anterior descending artery and post-obstructive pneumonia concerning for malignancy. For her atrial fibrillation, she was started on diltiazem. For the pneumonia, she was treated with antibiotics. She was then transferred to the floor later that same night on metoprolol 50 mg tid. While on the floor, she had a bronchoscopy performed which showed external compression of her left mainstem bronchus, and she had a biopsy via fine-needle aspiration, which showed large cell carcinoma. She denies chest pain, shortness of breath and tachypnea. She does note some diaphoresis and occasional palpitations. An elderly female with history of atrial fibrillation, Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease, hypertension, hyperlipidemia and previous repair of atrial septum defect, presenting with shortness of breath and atrial fibrillation resistant to medication. A 64 yo F w/PMHx sx for AF, COPD, HTN, hyperlipidemia who initially had an open ASD repair c/b sternal wound infection and post-operative AF in [**11-15**] treated with amiodarone. On [**2-20**], she was initially admitted through the ED with SOB and back pain, and was noted to have atrial fibrillation with RVR. A CTA demonstrating diffuse LAD and post-obstructive PNA concerning for malignancy. For her atrial fibrillation, she was started on diltiazem gtt, for which she was transferred to the [**Hospital Unit Name 42**] for monitoring. The atrial fibrillation was thought to be in the setting of a post-obstructive pneumonia, for which she was treated with antibiotics. She was then transferred to the floor later that same night on metoprolol 50 mg tid. While on the floor, she had a bronchoscopy performed which showed external compression of her left mainstem bronchus, and she had a biopsy/FNA performed, which showed large cell carcinoma. She was then readmitted to the [**Hospital Unit Name 42**] yesterday with atrial fibrillation with HR 130s, and was started on a diltiazem gtt. . In the [**Hospital Unit Name 42**], she was started on po diltiazem, which was rapidly uptitrated to 60 mg qid. She was called out this morning. Tonight, at 8:30 pm, she was noted to have HR 160s, w/EKG c/w AF with RVR, for which she received metoprolol 5 mg IV x2, followed by diltiazem 10 mg IV x2 without conversion. She denies chest pain, SOB, tachypnea. She does note some diaphoresis and occasional palpitations.
The patient is a 79 yoF w/ a h/o CAD s/p RCA stenting, diastolic CHF, 1+ MR, HTN, Hyperlipidemia, previous smoking history, and atrial fibrillation who presents for direct admission from home for progressive shortness of breath. According to Pt, her primary complaint is not shortness of breath, but cough X 1 week which has been rarely productive of white sputum. She denies associated fevers, chills, nausea, vomiting, pleuritic pain, weight gain, or dietary indiscretion. She also reports a sore throat over the past 3 days. She recently underwent thoracentesis for a moderate size pleueral effusion. Cytology of the effusion was negative for malignant cells. Pt denies recent palpitations, and reports that she has been compliant with all medications. She admits to recent fatigue and 2 pillow orthopnea which has been present for months. Current etiology considerations include CHF vs intrinsic pulmonary disease (infiltrative) vs embolic disease. In order to optimize cardic function with atrial kick, pt underwent cardioversion and became hypotensive with a junctional rhythm requiring intubation. She was placed on dobutamine. Off of dobutamine, cardiac monitoring demonstrated a long QTc of 700 and an atrial escape rhythm. A 79 year old female wit history of CAD, diastolic CHF, HTN, Hyperlipidemia, previous smoking history, and atrial fibrillation who presents for direct admission from home for progressive shortness of breath. Patient denies recent palpitations, and reports that she has been compliant with all medications. She admits to recent fatigue and 2 pillow orthopnea which has been present for months. Patient underwent cardioversion and became hypotensive with a junctional rhythm requiring intubation. She was placed on dobutamine. Off of dobutamine, cardiac monitoring demonstrated a long QTc and an atrial escape rhythm. Briefly 79 yo F w/ a h/o CAD s/p RCA stenting BMS to mRCA [**3421**] and pLAD [**3423**], diastolic CHF (2 pillow orthopnea), 1+ MR, HTN, Hyperlipidemia, previous smoking history, and atrial fibrillation initially p/w cough, dyspnea. . Briefly, pt's symptoms began [**Month (only) 760**]. At that time pt was admitted with GI bleed, transfused and discharged without resolution of symptoms. Furthur workup noted bilateral atrial thrombi and anticoagulation was reinitiated. CTA did not show PE but was concern for small peripheral emboli as cause of dyspnea. Pt was had multiple PFTs, echos, CT scans and CXRs without definitive cause of dyspnea. Most recent PFTs on [**3432-12-27**] c/w restrictive ventilatory defect and low DLCO suspicious for interstitial pulmonary process (worsening). She has been followed by cardiology and pulmonology and is being treated for dCHF and reactive airway disease. . On current admission pt presented with cough, thought to be URI, rather than worsening of chronic dyspnea. Current etiology considerations include CHF vs intrinsic pulmonary disease (infiltrative) vs embolic disease. In order to optimize cardic function with atrial kick, pt was pretreated with Sotolol and underwent TEE and cardioversion of afib on [**3433-1-11**]. After cardioversion, patient developed junctional HR to 45bpm with SBPs in 80s. She was placed on dobutamine and HR increased to 80s (sinus vs antrial escape rhythm). Off of dobutamine, HR and BP decreased with EKG demonstrated QTc of 700.
A 96 y/o female found unresponsive on ground at nursing home. Pt was in dining room and found by staff. Unresponsive for 1 min after found. Pt cannot recollect events preceding fall but with some c/o HA and some neck/shoulder discomfort. NCHCT showed ~9mm L parietal SDH. C-spine negative. Imaging: CT head w/o contrast Acute left subdural hematoma measuring 1.5 cm maximal dimensions with leftward subfalcine herniation of 8 mm, downward transtentorial herniation with obliteration of the left suprasellar cistern, and uncal herniation. No fx, destructive infiltrative lesion involving the skull base. A 96 y/o female found unresponsive on ground at nursing home pressents with headache, herniation, and some neck/shoulder discomfort. CT head shows acute left subdural hematoma. 96F found unresponsive on ground at nursing home. Pt was in dining room and found by staff. Unresponsive for 1 min after found. Pt cannot recollect events preceding fall but with some c/o HA and some neck/shoulder discomfort. Taken to [**Hospital1 1218**] where NCHCT preformed at 18:32 showed ~9mm L parietal SDH. C-spine negative. Family / Social history: dementia, HTN, afib, CAD SURGICAL Hx: unknown . SOCIAL Hx: Daughter serves as HCP; Pt currently DNR/DNI except for elective procedure (****SEE CLARIFICATIOIN BELOW****). . ALLERGIES: NKDA Physical Examination General Appearance: No acute distress, Thin Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL, Conjunctiva pale Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic, Poor dentition Lymphatic: Cervical WNL, Supraclavicular WNL Cardiovascular: (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal) Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Diminished), (Left DP pulse: Diminished) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Clear : bialterally) Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present Extremities: Right: Absent, Left: Absent Skin: Warm Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): A+O x 2, Movement: Not assessed, Tone: Not assessed Imaging: CT head w/o contrast Acute left subdural hematoma measuring 1.5 cm maximal dimensions with leftward subfalcine herniation of 8 mm, downward transtentorial herniation with obliteration of the left suprasellar cistern, and uncal herniation. No fx, destructive infiltrative lesion involving the skull base
This 84-year-old man with a history of coronary artery disease presents with 2 days of melena and black colored emesis. Stools becoming less dark, but he had increased lethargy and presented to the emergency department today. Initial systolic blood pressure recorded in the 60s, but all in 110-120s after that. In the ED, he had gastric lavage with coffee ground emesis that cleared with 600 cc of flushing. During the lavage he had chest pressure with mild ST depression V3-V5 that resolved spontaneously. Patient is on ASPIRIN 81 mg Tablet by mouth daily. An 84-year-old man with a previous history of coronary artery disease, presenting with 2 days of melena and black colored emesis. 84 year-old man with CAD s/p CABG, DM, HTN, presented with 2 days of black stools and coffee ground emesis. Pt reports of woke up 2am on [**10-19**] and had black soft/loose BM, followed by nausea and and vomiting blackish liquid. He felt better but continued to have three more black stools over the next two days. He vomited a total of [**1-20**] times before presenting to the hospital. He has been feeling lethargic and lightheaded and called the ambulence at the advice of his son. His stools were lightening in color prior arriving. He has not been using any new medications and has not had a prior GIB. . In the ED, initial VS: 98.7 88 65/47 98%/RA. He was BIBEMS with SBPs 110-120s and has had similarly stable blood pressures since arrival. He had an NG lavage with coffee ground emesis that cleared with 600 cc of flushing. During the lavage he had chest pressure and an EKG showed STD in V2-4. He did not have radiation, pain, or diaphoresis. Home medications: ALLOPURINOL 300 mg Tablet by mouth daily GLIPIZIDE 5 mg Extended Rel by mouth daily LOSARTAN [COZAAR] 100 mg by mouth daily METFORMIN 500 mg by mouth daily METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 mg by mouth daily PIOGLITAZONE [ACTOS] 15 mg by mouth daily SIMVASTATIN 80 mg Tablet by mouth daily ASPIRIN 81 mg Tablet by mouth daily Past medical history: Coronary artery disease s/p triple-vessel coronary artery bypass in [**7-/2899**] Hypertension Peripheral arterial disease Hypercholesterolemia Diabetes Osteoarthritis Gout Anemia Baseline 32-35 with unrevealing w/u by heme Right hernia repair in [**2877**] Appendectomy in [**2841**] Prostate disease N/C Occupation: Retired trial lawyer Drugs: Denies Tobacco: Denies Alcohol: Occasional
This is a 54 year old male patient with an idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis, who called today with worsening dyspnea for 3 days. He had been in unusual state of good health at baseline respiratory status (using 4L nasal canula at rest and 6L with exertion) when 3 days prior to admission, he hugged his cousin who has rats for pets and also the heat came up from the basement of his house. He feels that with these two events, his breathing became acutely worse and he is concerned for allergen exposure. He denies any sick contacts, fevers, chills, rhinorrhea. He did receive flu and pneumovax vaccines. He has had a recent admission last month with progressive dyspnea on exertion. The computed tomography revealed increased ground glass opacity in lower lobes superimposed on pulmonary fibrosis with elevated eosinophils peripherally (12%). A bronchoalveolar lavage was also positive for eosinophils. He was started on high dose steroids (prednisone 60mg) with plan for close outpatient follow up for eosinophilic lung disease. He was discharged on 2-3L nasal canula. He then represented to the emergency department for spontaneous pneumomediastinum of unclear etiology. On day of current admission, the patient called his pulmonologist complaining of worsening shortness of breath since Saturday. Yesterday he was at pulmonary rehab and desaturated to the 70s on 6L with minimal exertion, and he is currently on 4L nasal canula at rest. No sick contacts recently. He was asked to go to ED. In the ED, initial vs were: 98.3, 96, 144/97, 24, 97% 6L NC. This is a 54 year old male patient with an idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis presenting an acute dyspnea on exertion, secondary to superimposed pneumonia on patient with no pulmonary reserve. Appears he has been experiencing worsening dyspnea with increased O2 requirement for the last several weeks. 54 y/o M w/IPF, called today with worsening dyspnea x 3 days. He had been in unusal state of health at baseline resp status (using 4L NC at rest and 6L NC with exertion) when 3 days PTA, he hugged his cousin who has rats for pets and also the heat came up from the basement of his house. He feels that with these two events, he breathing became acutely worse and is concerned for allergen exposure. He denies any sick contacts, fevers, chills, worsening [** 2169**]/productive [** 2169**], rhinorrhea. He did receive flu and pneumovax. . He has had a recent admissions in [**11-26**] with progressive DOE. CT revealed increased ground glass opacity in LL superimposed on pulmonary fibrosis with elevated eosinophils peripherally (12%). A BAL was also positive for eosinophils. He was started on high dose steroids (prednisone 60mg) [**2739-2-16**] with plan for close outpatient follow up for eosinophilic lung disease. He was discharged on [**2-20**] on 2-3L NC. He then represented to [**Hospital1 1**] on [**12-12**] for spontaneous pneumomediastinum of unclear etiology. . On day of admission, Pt called pulmonologist (Dr. [**First Name (STitle) **] c/o worsening shortness of breath since Saturday [**3-23**]. Yesterday he was at pulmonary rehab and desaturated to the 70s on 6L with minimal exertion, and he is currently on 4L NC at rest. No sick contacts recently and [**Name2 (NI) 2169**] has not changed. He was asked to go to ED given concern for either acute exacerbation of underlying IPF vs superimposed infection vs pneumothorax. . In the ED, initial vs were: 98.3, 96, 144/97, 24, 97% 6L NC.
85 y/o F with PMHx of HTN, HL, h/o breast CA and 3cm renal pelvis transitional cell tumor who presented for nephrectomy. Her post op course was complicated by agitation thought due to narcotics. Today, she was restarted on her home meds and while on telemetry, pt was noted to be bradycardic to 40s. Pt was triggered for SBP of 70 and HR of 40 during which she remained asymptomatic. She was given 1L IVF and her HR/BP trended back up to baseline. However, there was a second event an hour later when she sat up and became bradycardic in the 30s with associated hypotension. Second episode occurred with position change and again, pt developped junctional rhythm in 30s. An 85 year-old woman on verapamil presents with junctional heart rhythm in 30s with associated hypotension. 85 y/o F with PMHx of HTN, HL, h/o breast CA and 3cm renal pelvis transitional cell tumor who presented for nephrectomy on [**2575-8-15**]. Her post op course was complicated by agitation thought due to narcotics. Today, she was restarted on her home meds and while on telemetry, pt was noted to be bradycardic to 40s. Pt was triggered for SBP of 70 and HR of 40 during which she remained asymptomatic. She was given 1L IVF and her HR/BP trended back up to baseline. However, there was a second event an hour later when she sat up and became bradycardic in the 30s with associated hypotension. Second episode occurred with position change and again, pt developped junctional rhythm in 30s. home meds: Verapamil 240mg daily Lisinopril 5mg Rosuvastatin 10mg Meclizine 25 TID PRN Imipramine 25 QHS Colace 100mg Loratidine 10mg daily Physical Examination T: 98 BP: 111/47 P: 74 R: 16 O2: 98% on 2L NC General: oriented to person only, NAD, comfortable HEENT: Sclera anicteric, dry MM, oropharynx clear Neck: supple, unable to appreciate JVP due to habitus Lungs: poor effort but [**Month (only) 199**] BS at bases and some audible airway secretion in upper airways CV: Regular rate and rhythm, no m/r/g, diff to auscult [**2-13**] habitus Abdomen: diffusely tender, bowel sounds present, multiple surgical incisions, clean dry and intact, abd binder in place GU: foley in place Ext: cool, no edema, 1+ pulses, pneumoboots in place
A 58-year-old African-American woman presents to the ER with episodic pressing/burning anterior chest pain that began two days earlier for the first time in her life. The pain started while she was walking, radiates to the back, and is accompanied by nausea, diaphoresis and mild dyspnea, but is not increased on inspiration. The latest episode of pain ended half an hour prior to her arrival. She is known to have hypertension and obesity. She denies smoking, diabetes, hypercholesterolemia, or a family history of heart disease. She currently takes no medications. Physical examination is normal. The EKG shows nonspecific changes. 58-year-old woman with hypertension and obesity presents with exercise-related episodic chest pain radiating to the back.
An 8-year-old male presents in March to the ER with fever up to 39 C, dyspnea and cough for 2 days. He has just returned from a 5 day vacation in Colorado. Parents report that prior to the onset of fever and cough, he had loose stools. He denies upper respiratory tract symptoms. On examination he is in respiratory distress and has bronchial respiratory sounds on the left. A chest x-ray shows bilateral lung infiltrates. 8-year-old boy with 2 days of loose stools, fever, and cough after returning from a trip to Colorado. Chest x-ray shows bilateral lung infiltrates.
A 58-year-old nonsmoker white female with mild exertional dyspnea and occasional cough is found to have a left lung mass on chest x-ray. She is otherwise asymptomatic. A neurologic examination is unremarkable, but a CT scan of the head shows a solitary mass in the right frontal lobe. 58-year-old female non-smoker with left lung mass on x-ray. Head CT shows a solitary right frontal lobe mass.
A 2-year-old boy is brought to the emergency department by his parents for 5 days of high fever and irritability. The physical exam reveals conjunctivitis, strawberry tongue, inflammation of the hands and feet, desquamation of the skin of the fingers and toes, and cervical lymphadenopathy with the smallest node at 1.5 cm. The abdominal exam demonstrates tenderness and enlarged liver. Laboratory tests report elevated alanine aminotransferase, white blood cell count of 17,580/mm, albumin 2.1 g/dL, C-reactive protein 4.5 mg, erythrocyte sedimentation rate 60 mm/h, mild normochromic, normocytic anemia, and leukocytes in urine of 20/mL with no bacteria identified. The echocardiogram shows moderate dilation of the coronary arteries with possible coronary artery aneurysm. 2-year-old boy with fever and irritability for 5 days. Physical exam findings include conjunctivitis, strawberry tongue, and desquamation of the fingers and toes. Lab results include low albumin, elevated white blood cell count and C-reactive protein, and urine leukocytes. Echo shows moderate dilation of the coronary arteries.
A 56-year-old female on 20th day post-left mastectomy presents to the emergency department complaining of shortness of breath and malaise. The patient says that she has remained in bed for the last two weeks. The physical examination reveals tenderness on the left upper thoracic wall and right calf. The surgical incision shows no bleeding or signs of infection. Pulmonary auscultation is significant for bilateral decreased breath sounds, especially at the right base. Laboratory tests reveal an elevated D-dimer. 56-year-old woman presents with shortness of breath 3 weeks after surgical mastectomy. Physical exam is significant for right calf tenderness and decreased breath sounds at the right base. Her D-dimer level is elevated.
64-year-old obese female with diagnosis of diabetes mellitus and persistently elevated HbA1c. She is reluctant to see a nutritionist and is not compliant with her diabetes medication or exercise. She complains of a painful skin lesion on the left lower leg. She has tried using topical lotions and creams but the lesion has increased in size and is now oozing. 64-year-old woman with uncontrolled diabetes, now with an oozing, painful skin lesion on her left lower leg.
A 26-year-old obese woman with a history of bipolar disorder complains that her recent struggles with her weight and eating have caused her to feel depressed. She states that she has recently had difficulty sleeping and feels excessively anxious and agitated. She also states that she has had thoughts of suicide. She often finds herself fidgety and unable to sit still for extended periods of time. Her family tells her that she is increasingly irritable. Her current medications include lithium carbonate and zolpidem. 26-year-old obese woman with bipolar disorder, on zolpidem and lithium, with recent difficulty sleeping, agitation, suicidal ideation, and irritability.
A 62-year-old man sees a neurologist for progressive memory loss and jerking movements of the lower extremities. Neurologic examination confirms severe cognitive deficits and memory dysfunction. An electroencephalogram shows generalized periodic sharp waves. Neuroimaging studies show moderately advanced cerebral atrophy. A cortical biopsy shows diffuse vacuolar changes of the gray matter with reactive astrocytosis but no inflammatory infiltration. 62-year-old man with progressive memory loss and involuntary leg movements. Brain MRI reveals cortical atrophy, and cortical biopsy shows vacuolar gray matter changes with reactive astrocytosis.
A 43-year-old woman visits her dermatologist for lesions on her neck. On examination, multiple lesions are seen. Each lesion is small soft, and pedunculated. The largest lesion is about 4 mm in diameter. The color of different lesions varies from flesh colored to slightly hyperpigmented. 43-year-old woman with soft, flesh-colored, pedunculated lesions on her neck.
A physician is called to see a 67-year-old woman who underwent cardiac catheterization via the right femoral artery earlier in the morning. She is now complaining of a cool right foot. Upon examination she has a pulsatile mass in her right groin with loss of distal pulses, and auscultation reveals a bruit over the point at which the right femoral artery was entered. 67-year-old woman status post cardiac catheterization via right femoral artery, now with a cool, pulseless right foot and right femoral bruit.
A 40-year-old woman with no past medical history presents to the ER with excruciating pain in her right arm that had started 1 hour prior to her admission. She denies trauma. On examination she is pale and in moderate discomfort, as well as tachypneic and tachycardic. Her body temperature is normal and her blood pressure is 80/60. Her right arm has no discoloration or movement limitation. 40-year-old woman with severe right arm pain and hypotension. She has no history of trauma and right arm exam reveals no significant findings.
A 25-year-old woman presents to the clinic complaining of prolonged fatigue. She denies difficulty sleeping and sleeps an average of 8 hours a night. She also notes hair loss, a change in her voice and weight gain during the previous 6 months. She complains of cold intolerance. On examination she has a prominent, soft, uniform anterior cervical mass at the midline. 25-year-old woman with fatigue, hair loss, weight gain, and cold intolerance for 6 months.
A 30-year-old generally healthy woman presents with shortness of breath that had started 2 hours before admission. She has had no health problems in the past besides 2 natural abortions. She had given birth to a healthy child 3 weeks before. On examination, she is apprehensive, tachypneic and tachycardic, her blood pressure is 110/70 and her oxygen saturation 92%. Otherwise, physical examination is unremarkable. Her chest x-ray and CBC are normal. 30-year-old woman who is 3 weeks post-partum, presents with shortness of breath, tachypnea, and hypoxia.
An 85-year-old man is brought to the ER because of gradual decrease in his level of consciousness. In the last 3 days he stopped walking and eating by himself. He has had no fever, cough, rash or diarrhea. His daughter recalls that he had been involved in a car accident 3 weeks prior to his admission and had a normal head CT at that time. 85-year-old man who was in a car accident 3 weeks ago, now with 3 days of progressively decreasing level of consciousness and impaired ability to perform activities of daily living.
A 36-year-old woman presents to the emergency department with 12 weeks of amenorrhea, vaginal spotting that has increased since yesterday, lower abdominal tenderness, nausea and vomiting. The physical exam reveals overall tender abdomen, 18-week sized uterus, and cervical dilation of 2 cm. The complete blood count and biochemical profile are normal. Point of care pregnancy test with cut-off sensitivity of 25 mIU/ml Beta-HCG is negative. The ultrasound reports enlarged uterus (12 cm x 9 cm x 7 cms) with multiple cystic areas in the interior. The differential diagnosis includes vesicular mole vs fibroid degeneration. 36-year-old woman with amenorrhea, abdominal tenderness, enlarged uterus, and cervical dilation. Urine pregnancy test is negative. Ultrasound reveals an enlarged uterus with multiple cystic areas, which could be consistent with vesicular mole and fibroid degeneration.
A 28-year-old female with neck and shoulder pain and left hand and arm paresthesias three weeks after returning from a trip to California where she attended a stray animal recovery campaign. Her physical exam was unremarkable except for slight tremors and almost imperceptible spasticity. She was prescribed NSAIDS and a topical muscle relaxant. She was brought in to the ER three days later with spastic arm movements, sweating, increasing agitation and anxiety, malaise, difficultly swallowing and marked hydrophobia, and was immediately hospitalized. 28-year-old female with neck pain and left arm numbness 3 weeks after working with stray animals. Physical exam initially remarkable for slight left arm tremor and spasticity. Three days later she presented with significant arm spasticity, diaphoresis, agitation, difficulty swallowing, and hydrophobia.
A 48-year-old white male with history of common variable immunodeficiency (CVID) with acute abdominal pain, fever, dehydration, HR of 132 bpm, BP 80/40. The physical examination is remarkable for tenderness and positive Murphy sign. Abdominal ultrasound shows hepatomegaly and abundant free intraperitoneal fluid. Exploratory laparotomy reveals a ruptured liver abscess, which is then surgically drained. After surgery, the patient is taken to the ICU. 48-year-old man with common variable immunodeficiency presents with abdominal pain and fever. Ultrasound reveals hepatomegaly and free intraperitoneal fluid. A ruptured liver abscess is found and drained during exploratory laparotomy.
A 6-month-old male infant has a urine output of less than 0.2 mL/kg/hr shortly after undergoing major surgery. On examination, he has generalized edema. His blood pressure is 115/80 mm Hg, his pulse is 141/min, and his respirations are 18/min. His blood urea nitrogen is 33 mg/dL, and his serum creatinine is 1.3 mg/dL. Initial urinalysis shows specific gravity of 1.017. Microscopic examination of the urine sample reveals 1 WBC per high-power field (HPF), 18 RBCs per HPF, and 5 granular casts per HPF. His fractional excretion of sodium is 3.3%. 6-month-old male with decreased urine output and edema several hours after surgery. He is hypertensive and tachycardic, has a high BUN and creatinine, and urine microscopy reveals red blood cells and granular casts.
A 52-year-old African American man with a history of heavy smoking and drinking, describes progressive dysphagia that began several months ago. He first noticed difficulty swallowing meat. His trouble swallowing then progressed to include other solid foods, soft foods, and then liquids. He is able to locate the point where food is obstructed at the lower end of his sternum. He has lost a total of 25 pounds. 52-year-old man with history of smoking and heavy drinking, now with progressive dysphagia and 25-pound weight loss.
A 32-year-old woman is admitted to the ER following a car accident. She has sustained multiple injuries including upper and lower extremity fractures. She is fully awake and alert, and she reports that she was not wearing a seat belt. Her blood pressure is 134/74 mm Hg, and her pulse is 87/min. Physical examination reveals a tender abdomen with guarding and rebound in all four quadrants. She has no bowel sounds. 32-year-old unbelted driver status post car accident. Has multiple extremity fractures and severe abdominal pain with rebound and guarding.
A 21-year-old female is evaluated for progressive arthralgias and malaise. On examination she is found to have alopecia, a rash mainly distributed on the bridge of her nose and her cheeks, a delicate non-palpable purpura on her calves, and swelling and tenderness of her wrists and ankles. Her lab shows normocytic anemia, thrombocytopenia, a 4/4 positive ANA and anti-dsDNA. Her urine is positive for protein and RBC casts. 21-year-old female with progressive arthralgias, fatigue, and butterfly-shaped facial rash. Labs are significant for positive ANA and anti-double-stranded DNA, as well as proteinuria and RBC casts.
A 15-year-old girl presents to the ER with abdominal pain. The pain appeared gradually and was periumbilical at first, localizing to the right lower quadrant over hours. She has had no appetite since yesterday but denies diarrhea. She has had no sexual partners and her menses are regular. On examination, she has localized rebound tenderness over the right lower quadrant. On an abdominal ultrasound, a markedly edematous appendix is seen. 15-year-old girl with right lower quadrant abdominal pain, decreased appetite, and enlarged appendix on abdominal ultrasound.
A 63-year-old man presents with cough and shortness of breath. His past medical history is notable for heavy smoking, spinal stenosis, diabetes, hypothyroidism and mild psoriasis. He also has a family history of early onset dementia. His symptoms began about a week prior to his admission, with productive cough, purulent sputum and difficulty breathing, requiring him to use his home oxygen for the past 24 hours. He denies fever. On examination he is cyanotic, tachypneic, with a barrel shaped chest and diffuse rales over his lungs. A chest x-ray is notable for hyperinflation with no consolidation. 63-year-old heavy smoker with productive cough, shortness of breath, tachypnea, and oxygen requirement. Chest x-ray shows hyperinflation with no consolidation.
A 33-year-old male athlete presented to the ER with acute abdominal pain. Family member says the patient fell off his bike a week earlier and suffered blunt trauma to the left hemi-abdomen, and he has had mild abdominal pain since that day. The patient's history is negative for smoking, drugs, and alcohol. BP: 60/30 mmHg, HR: 140/min. The patient is pale, the physical examination of the abdomen revealed muscle contraction and resistance. Emergency ultrasound and CT scan of the abdomen reveal extended intraperitoneal hemorrhage due to spleen rupture. 33-year-old male presents with severe abdominal pain one week after a bike accident in which he sustained abdominal trauma. He is hypotensive and tachycardic, and imaging reveals a ruptured spleen and intraperitoneal hemorrhage.
An 8-year-old boy fell from his bike striking his left temple on the pavement. There was no immediate loss of consciousness, and a brief examination at the scene noted his pupils were symmetrical, reactive to the light, and he was moving all four limbs. Half an hour after the fall the child became drowsy, pale, and vomited. He was transferred to the emergency department. Upon arrival the heart rate was 52/min, blood pressure of 155/98. The Glasgow Coma Scale (GCS) was 6/15, the pupils were asymmetrical and movement of the right upper and lower extremities was impaired. The neurosurgical team advised deferring the CT scan in favor of initiating immediate treatment. 8-year-old boy with decreased level of consciousness 30 minutes after falling from his bike and hitting his head. He was not wearing a helmet. In the ER he was bradycardic and hypertensive, and the neurosurgeon strongly advised immediate treatment.
A group of 14 humanitarian service workers is preparing a trip to the Amazon Rainforest region in Brazil. All the members of the group have traveled on multiple occasions and have up-to-date vaccine certificates. Malaria Chemoprophylaxis is indicated but three of the women are in different stages of pregnancy. Group traveling to the Amazon rainforest, including 3 pregnant women. All members' immunizations are up-to-date but they require malaria prophylaxis.
A 21-year-old college student undergoes colonoscopy due to family history of multiple polyps in his older siblings. His brother underwent total proctocolectomy at age 22, and his sister underwent a total proctocolectomy at age 28, after both were found to have hundreds of colonic adenomas on colonoscopy. Both siblings are currently well without any findings of neoplasms. The patient undergoes sigmoidoscopy and is found to have dozens of small colonic polyps within rectosigmoid. Several of these are biopsied and are all benign adenomas. 21-year-old male with dozens of small polyps found on colonoscopy. Family history significant for both older siblings having total colectomies after colonoscopy revealed hundreds of adenomas.
A 31-year-old woman is seen in clinic with amenorrhea. She had menarche at age 14 and has had normal periods since then. However, her last menstrual period was 7 months ago. She also complains of an occasional milky nipple discharge. She is currently taking no mediations and would like to become pregnant soon. Examination shows a whitish nipple discharge bilaterally, but the rest of the examination is normal. Urine human chorionic gonadotropin (hCG) is negative, thyroid stimulating hormone (TSH) is normal, but prolactin is elevated. 31-year-old female with amenorrhea, milky nipple discharge, negative urine pregnancy test, and elevated prolactin level.
A 51-year-old woman is seen in clinic for advice on osteoporosis. She has a past medical history of significant hypertension and diet-controlled diabetes mellitus. She currently smokes 1 pack of cigarettes per day. She was documented by previous LH and FSH levels to be in menopause within the last year. She is concerned about breaking her hip as she gets older and is seeking advice on osteoporosis prevention. 51-year-old smoker with hypertension and diabetes, in menopause, needs recommendations for preventing osteoporosis.
A 72-year-old man complains of increasing calf pain when walking uphill. The symptoms have gradually increased over the past 3 months. The patient had an uncomplicated myocardial infarction 2 years earlier and a transient ischemic attack 6 months ago. Over the past month, his blood pressure has worsened despite previous control with diltiazem, hydrochlorothiazide, and propranolol. His is currently taking isosorbide dinitrate, hydrochlorothiazide, and aspirin. On physical examination, his blood pressure is 151/91 mm Hg, and his pulse is 67/min. There is a right carotid bruit. His lower extremities are slightly cool to the touch and have diminished pulses at the dorsalis pedis. 72-year-old man with calf pain while walking uphill. History of ischemic heart disease and worsening hypertension despite medication compliance. On physical exam he has a right carotid bruit and his lower extremities are cool, with diminished dorsalis pedis pulses.
A 44 yo male is brought to the emergency room after multiple bouts of vomiting that has a "coffee ground" appearance. His heart rate is 135 bpm and blood pressure is 70/40 mmHg. Physical exam findings include decreased mental status and cool extremities. He receives a rapid infusion of crystalloid solution followed by packed red blood cell transfusion and is admitted to the ICU for further care. A 44-year-old man with coffee-ground emesis, tachycardia, hypoxia, hypotension and cool, clammy extremities.
A 62 yo male presents with four days of non-productive cough and one day of fever. He is on immunosuppressive medications, including prednisone. He is admitted to the hospital, and his work-up includes bronchoscopy with bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL). BAL fluid examination reveals owl's eye inclusion bodies in the nuclei of infection cells. A 62-year-old immunosuppressed male with fever, cough and intranuclear inclusion bodies in bronchoalveolar lavage
A 65 yo male with no significant history of cardiovascular disease presents to the emergency room with acute onset of shortness of breath, tachypnea, and left-sided chest pain that worsens with inspiration. Of note, he underwent a right total hip replacement two weeks prior to presentation and was unable to begin physical therapy and rehabilitation for several days following the surgery due to poor pain management. Relevant physical exam findings include a respiratory rate of 35 and right calf pain. A 65-year-old male presents with dyspnea, tachypnea, chest pain on inspiration, and swelling and pain in the right calf.
An 82-year-old woman comes to the emergency department because of chest pain and shortness of breath after being awakened in the morning by stabbing substernal chest pain radiating to the left shoulder and jaw. The patient had hypertension, renal-artery stenosis with chronic renal insufficiency, hypercholesterolemia, osteoporosis and dementia. Blood pressure was 199/108 mm Hg, respiratory rate 18 bpm, oxygen saturation 98% on ambient air. The heart sounds were rapid and with no murmurs. CK-MB was 10.9 ng/ml, CK was 89 U/l, CK index was 12.2% and Troponin T was 0.40 ng/ml. An EKG showed sinus regular tachycardia of 119 bpm, with ST-segment elevations up to 3 mm in V1, V2, and V3. A chest radiograph showed low lung volumes and right basilar subsegmental atelectasis. Coronary angiography showed no stenosis or clinically significant disease. Left ventriculography revealed akinesis of the anterior wall, hypokinesis of the apical and distal inferior walls, and compensatory hyperkinesis of the basal anterior and basal inferior walls. A transthoracic echocardiogram showed severe segmental left ventricular dysfunction involving the septum, anteroseptal territory, and apex. The overall left ventricular systolic function was mildly impaired and there was mild mitral regurgitation. 82-year-old woman awakened by acute stabbing chest pain, with ST-segment elevation, hypertension, sinus tachycardia, no diseases on coronary angiography and left ventricular dysfunction on ventriculography.
A 31-year-old woman with no previous medical problems comes to the emergency room with a history of 2 weeks of joint pain and fatigue. Initially she had right ankle swelling and difficulty standing up and walking, all of which resolved after a few days. For the past several days she has had pain, swelling and stiffness in her knees, hips and right elbow. She also reports intermittent fevers ranging from 38.2 to 39.4 degrees Celsius and chest pain. Young adult woman with 2 weeks of fever and migrating joint inflammation.
A 46-year-old woman presents with a 9 month history of weight loss (20 lb), sweating, insomnia and diarrhea. She reports to have been eating more than normal and that her heart sometimes races for no reason. On physical examination her hands are warm and sweaty, her pulse is irregular at 110bpm and there is hyperreflexia and mild exophthalmia. A 46-year-old woman with sweaty hands, exophthalmia, and weight loss despite increased eating.
A 20 yo female college student with no significant past medical history presents with a chief complaint of fatigue. She reports increased sleep and appetite over the past few months as well as difficulty concentrating on her schoolwork. She no longer enjoys spending time with her friends and feels guilty for not spending more time with her family. Her physical exam and laboratory tests, including hemoglobin, hematocrit and thyroid stimulating hormone, are within normal limits. A 22 year old female presents with changes in appetite and sleeping, fatigue, diminished ability to think or concentrate, anhedonia and feelings of guilt.
A 10 yo boy with nighttime snoring, pauses in breathing, and restlessness with nighttime awakenings. No history of headache or night terrors. The boy's teacher recently contacted his parents because she was concerned about his declining grades, lack of attention, and excessive sleepiness during class. A 10-year-old boy with difficulty concentrating, daytime sleepiness, and failure to thrive. The boy sleeps restlessly, snores, sweats, breathes heavily through his mouth and gasps in his sleep.
A 10 year old child is brought to the emergency room complaining of myalgia, cough, and shortness of breath. Two weeks ago the patient was seen by his pediatrician for low-grade fever, abdominal pain, and diarrhea, diagnosed with a viral illness, and prescribed OTC medications. Three weeks ago the family returned home after a stay with relatives on a farm that raises domestic pigs for consumption. Vital signs: T: 39.5 C, BP: 90/60 HR: 120/min RR: 40/min. Physical exam findings include cyanosis, slight stiffness of the neck, and marked periorbital edema. Lab results include WBC 25,000, with 25% Eosinophils, and an unremarkable urinalysis. A 10 year old child with recent history of pork consumption presents with fever, myalgia, facial edema and eosinophilia
A 38 year old woman complains of severe premenstrual and menstrual pelvic pain, heavy, irregular periods and occasional spotting between periods. Past medical history remarkable for two years of infertility treatment and an ectopic pregnancy at age 26. A 38 year old woman with severe dysmenorrhea, menorrhagia, and menometrorrhagia. PMH of infertility treatment and ectopic pregnancy
A 56-year old Caucasian female complains of being markedly more sensitive to the cold than most people. She also gets tired easily, has decreased appetite, and has recently tried home remedies for her constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin. She moves and talks slowly. A 56-year old Caucasian female presents with sensitivity to cold, fatigue, and constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin. Hypothyroidism
A 44-year-old man was recently in an automobile accident where he sustained a skull fracture. In the emergency room, he noted clear fluid dripping from his nose. The following day he started complaining of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination. A 44-year-old man complains of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination. Bacterial Meningitis
A 5-year-old boy presents to the emergency department with complaints of progressively worsening dysphagia, drooling, fever and vocal changes. He is toxic-appearing, and leans forward while sitting on his mother's lap. He is drooling and speaks with a muffled "hot potato" voice. The parents deny the possibility of foreign body ingestion or trauma, and they report that they are delaying some of his vaccines. A 5-year-old boy presents with difficulty in breathing, stridor, drooling, fever, dysphagia and voice change. Epiglottitis
A 27-year-old woman at 11 weeks gestation in her second pregnancy is found to have a hemoglobin (Hb) of 9.0 g/dL, white blood cell count 6.3 x 109/L, platelet count 119 x 109/L, mean corpuscular volume 109 fL. Further investigations reveal mild iron deficiency. She already receives iron supplementation. The obstetrician repeats the complete blood cell count 2 weeks later. The Hb is 8.9 g/dL, WBC count 7.1 x 109/L, and platelets 108 x 109/L. She describes difficulty swallowing. A reticulocyte count is performed and found elevated at 180 x 109/L. The obstetrician requests a hematology consult. The following additional results were found: Negative DAT, normal clotting screen, elevated LDH (2000 IU/L), normal urea and electrolytes, normal alanine aminotransferase (ALT), anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, no fragments, no agglutination, polychromasia and presence of hemosiderin in the urine. A young woman in her second gestation presenting with anemia resistant to improvement by iron supplementation, elevated LDH, anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, hemosiderinuria and normal clotting screen. Paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria
Karen is a 72-year-old woman with hypertension and type 2 diabetes, who was hospitalized for cryptogenic stroke two weeks ago. At the time, computed tomography was negative for brain hemorrhage and she was given thrombolytic therapy with resolution of her symptoms. Transesophageal echocardiogram and magnetic resonance angiogram of brain and great vessels found no evidence of abnormalities. She presents currently with a blood pressure of 120/70 mm Hg, normal glucose, and normal sinus rhythm on a 12-lead electrocardiogram. She reports history of occasional palpitations, shortness of breath and chest pain lasting for a few minutes and then stopping on their own. A 72-year-old woman with history of hypertension, type 2 diabetes, cryptogenic stroke, normal EKG, normal echocardiogram, normal angiograms, and complaints of occasional shortness of breath and palpitations. Paroxysmal atrial fibrillation
A 4 year old boy presents to the emergency room with wheezing. He has had a history of allergic rhinitis, but no history of wheezing. His mother reports that 5 hours ago patient was playing in the backyard sandbox when she heard him suddenly start coughing. The coughing lasted only moments, but he has been audibly wheezing since. Mother was concerned, because his breathing has not returned to normal, so she brought him to the ED. On exam, the child is playful and well appearing. Wheezing is heard in the mid-right chest area. O2 sats are 100% on room air. A 4 year old boy presents with wheezing after playing in the backyard unobserved. Foreign Body Aspiration
A 32 year old female with no previous medical history presents to clinic to discuss lab results from her most recent pap smear. She reports no complaints and is in general good health. The results of her PAP were cytology negative, HPV positive. A 32 year old female with screening that was positive for human papilloma virus with normal Pap smears. Cervical Cancer precursor
A 65 yo African-American male with shortness of breath related to exertion that has been worsening over the past three weeks. He also has difficulty breathing when lying flat and has started using two to three extra pillows at night. Significant physical exam findings include bibasilar lung crackles, pitting ankle edema and jugular venous distension. A 65-year-old African-American male with progressive dyspnea on exertion and while lying flat; bilateral pitting lower-extremity edema. The lungs revealed bilateral basilar crackles. Congestive Heart Failure
A 66yo female with significant smoking history and chronic cough for the past two years presents with recent, progressive shortness of breath. She is in moderate respiratory distress after walking from the waiting room to the examination room. Physical exam reveals mildly distended neck veins, a barrel-shaped chest, and moderate inspiratory and expiratory wheezes. She has smoked 1 to 2 packs per days for the past 47 years. A 66-year-old female smoker presents with worsening dyspnea, productive chronic cough, moderate respiratory distress and unintentional weight loss. Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease
An 89-year-old man was brought to the emergency department by his wife and son after six months of progressive changes in cognition and personality. He began to have poor memory, difficulty expressing himself, and exhibited unusual behaviors, such as pouring milk onto the table and undressing immediately after getting dressed. He is unable to dress, bathe, use the toilet, or walk independently. On examination the patient's temperature was 36.5°C (97.7°F), the heart rate 61 bpm in an irregular rhythm, the blood pressure 144/78 mm Hg, and the respiratory rate 18 bpm. The patient was alert and oriented to self and city but not year. He frequently interrupted the examiner. He repeatedly reached out to grab things in front of him, including the examiner's tie and face. He could not spell the word "world" backward, could not follow commands involving multiple steps and was unable to perform simple calculations. His speech was fluent, but he often used similar-sounding word substitutions. He could immediately recall three out of three words but recalled none of them after 5 minutes. Examination of the cranial nerves revealed clinically significant paratonic rigidity. Myoclonic jerks were seen in the arms, with symmetrically brisk reflexes. The reflexes in the legs were normal. An 89-year-old man with progressive change in personality, poor memory, and myoclonic jerks. Creutzfeldt-Jakob disease
A 32-year-old male presents to your office complaining of diarrhea, abdominal cramping and flatulence. Stools are greasy and foul-smelling. He also has loss of appetite and malaise. He recently returned home from a hiking trip in the mountains where he drank water from natural sources. An iodine-stained stool smear revealed ellipsoidal cysts with smooth, well-defined walls and 2+ nuclei. A 32-year-old male presents with diarrhea and foul-smelling stools. Stool smear reveals protozoan parasites. Giardiasis
A 65-year-old male with a history of tuberculosis has started to complain of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his left upper lobe. The spherical mass moved in the cavity during supine and prone CT imaging. Culture of the sputum revealed an organism with septated, low-angle branching hyphae that had straight, parallel walls. A 65-year-old male complains of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his lung. Culture of the sputum revealed fungal elements. Aspergillosis / Aspergilloma
An 18-year-old male returning from a recent vacation in Asia presents to the ER with a sudden onset of high fever, chills, facial flushing, epistaxis and severe headache and joint pain. His complete blood count reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit concentration and thrombocytopenia. An 18-year-old male returned from Asia a week ago. He presents with high fever, severe headache and joint pain. His blood analysis reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit and thrombocytopenia. Dengue
A 31 yo male with no significant past medical history presents with productive cough and chest pain. He reports developing cold symptoms one week ago that were improving until two days ago, when he developed a new fever, chills, and worsening cough. He has right-sided chest pain that is aggravated by coughing. His wife also had cold symptoms a week ago but is now feeling well. Vitals signs include temperature 103.4, pulse 105, blood pressure 120/80, and respiratory rate 15. Lung exam reveals expiratory wheezing, decreased breath sounds, and egophany in the left lower lung field. A 31 year old male presents with productive cough, chest pain, fever and chills. On exam he has audible wheezing with decreased breath sounds and dullness to percussion. Community Acquired Pneumonia (CAP)
A 10-year-old boy comes to the emergency department for evaluation of right knee pain. The child's guardians stated that he had been complaining of knee pain for the past 4 days and it had been getting progressively worse. There was no history of trauma. The day before the visit the boy developed a fever, and over the past day he has become increasingly lethargic. On physical examination blood pressure was 117/75 mm Hg, HR 138 bpm, temperature 38.1 C (100.5 F), respiration 28 bpm, oxygen saturation 97%. There was edema and tenderness of the right thigh and knee, as well as effusion and extremely limited range of motion. Sensation and motor tone were normal. Plain radiography and CT showed an osteolytic lesion. 10-year-old boy with progressive right knee and left leg pain and edema, lethargy and an osteolytic lesion. No history of trauma, fever, tachycardia, or urinary incontinence. osteomyelitis
A 28 yo female G1P0A0 is admitted to the Ob/Gyn service for non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy. Past medical history is remarkable for obesity, a non-complicated appendectomy at age 8, infertility treatment for the past 3 years, and pelvic laparoscopy during which minor right Fallopian tube adhesions were cauterized. Her LMP was 8 weeks prior to admission. Beta HCG is 100 mIU. The attending physician usually treats unruptured ecoptic pregnancies laparoscopically but is concerned about the patient's obesity and history of adhesions. An obese 28 yo female with non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy and history of adhesions. ectopic pregnancy
A 15 yo girl accompanied by her mother is referred for evaluation by the school. The girl has more than expected absences in the last three month, appears to be constantly tired and sleepy in class. Her mother assures the girl is well fed, and getting the proper sleep at night but admits the girls tires easily when they go out on weekend hikes. Physical examination: BP: 90/60. HR 130/min the only remarkable findings are extremely pale skin and mucosae. Grade 3/6 systolic murmur. Lab tests report Hb: 4.2 g/dL, MCV 61.8 fL, serum iron < 1.8 umol/L and ferritin of 2 ng/mL. Fecal occult blood is negative. A 15 yo girl with fatigue, pale skin, low hemoglobin and ferritin. Iron-Deficiency Anemia
A previously healthy 8-year-old boy presents with a complaint of right lower extremity pain and fever. He reports limping for the past two days. The parents report no previous trauma, but do remember a tick bite during a summer visit to Maryland several months ago. They do not remember observing erythema migrans. On examination, the right knee is tender and swollen. Peripheral WBC count and SRP are slightly elevated. An 8-year-old boy presents with a swollen right knee, lower extremity pain and fever. The parents report no history of trauma. The parents noticed a tick bite several months earlier. Lyme arthritis
A 4-year-old girl presents with persistent fever for the past week. The parents report a spike at 104°F. The parents brought the child to the emergency room when they noticed erythematous rash on the girl's trunk. Physical examination reveals strawberry red tongue, red and cracked lips, and swollen red hands. The whites of both eyes are red with no discharge. A 4-year-old girl with persistent high fever, skin rash, strawberry tongue, swollen red hands, and bilateral nonexudative conjunctivitis. Kawasaki disease
A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain and bruising on the inside and outside of the elbow, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. On the x-ray, the ulna has dislocated posteriorly from the trochlea of the humerus. The radius has dislocated from the capitulum of the humerus. A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. The x-ray, shows posterior elbow dislocation. elbow dislocation
A 44 yo male is brought to the emergency room after multiple bouts of vomiting that has a "coffee ground" appearance. His heart rate is 135 bpm and blood pressure is 70/40 mmHg. Physical exam findings include decreased mental status and cool extremities. He receives a rapid infusion of crystalloid solution followed by packed red blood cell transfusion and is admitted to the ICU for further care. A 44-year-old man with coffee-ground emesis, tachycardia, hypoxia, hypotension and cool, clammy extremities.
A 62 yo male presents with four days of non-productive cough and one day of fever. He is on immunosuppressive medications, including prednisone. He is admitted to the hospital, and his work-up includes bronchoscopy with bronchoalveolar lavage (BAL). BAL fluid examination reveals owl's eye inclusion bodies in the nuclei of infection cells. A 62-year-old immunosuppressed male with fever, cough and intranuclear inclusion bodies in bronchoalveolar lavage
A 65 yo male with no significant history of cardiovascular disease presents to the emergency room with acute onset of shortness of breath, tachypnea, and left-sided chest pain that worsens with inspiration. Of note, he underwent a right total hip replacement two weeks prior to presentation and was unable to begin physical therapy and rehabilitation for several days following the surgery due to poor pain management. Relevant physical exam findings include a respiratory rate of 35 and right calf pain. A 65-year-old male presents with dyspnea, tachypnea, chest pain on inspiration, and swelling and pain in the right calf.
An 82-year-old woman comes to the emergency department because of chest pain and shortness of breath after being awakened in the morning by stabbing substernal chest pain radiating to the left shoulder and jaw. The patient had hypertension, renal-artery stenosis with chronic renal insufficiency, hypercholesterolemia, osteoporosis and dementia. Blood pressure was 199/108 mm Hg, respiratory rate 18 bpm, oxygen saturation 98% on ambient air. The heart sounds were rapid and with no murmurs. CK-MB was 10.9 ng/ml, CK was 89 U/l, CK index was 12.2% and Troponin T was 0.40 ng/ml. An EKG showed sinus regular tachycardia of 119 bpm, with ST-segment elevations up to 3 mm in V1, V2, and V3. A chest radiograph showed low lung volumes and right basilar subsegmental atelectasis. Coronary angiography showed no stenosis or clinically significant disease. Left ventriculography revealed akinesis of the anterior wall, hypokinesis of the apical and distal inferior walls, and compensatory hyperkinesis of the basal anterior and basal inferior walls. A transthoracic echocardiogram showed severe segmental left ventricular dysfunction involving the septum, anteroseptal territory, and apex. The overall left ventricular systolic function was mildly impaired and there was mild mitral regurgitation. 82-year-old woman awakened by acute stabbing chest pain, with ST-segment elevation, hypertension, sinus tachycardia, no diseases on coronary angiography and left ventricular dysfunction on ventriculography.
A 31-year-old woman with no previous medical problems comes to the emergency room with a history of 2 weeks of joint pain and fatigue. Initially she had right ankle swelling and difficulty standing up and walking, all of which resolved after a few days. For the past several days she has had pain, swelling and stiffness in her knees, hips and right elbow. She also reports intermittent fevers ranging from 38.2 to 39.4 degrees Celsius and chest pain. Young adult woman with 2 weeks of fever and migrating joint inflammation.
A 46-year-old woman presents with a 9 month history of weight loss (20 lb), sweating, insomnia and diarrhea. She reports to have been eating more than normal and that her heart sometimes races for no reason. On physical examination her hands are warm and sweaty, her pulse is irregular at 110bpm and there is hyperreflexia and mild exophthalmia. A 46-year-old woman with sweaty hands, exophthalmia, and weight loss despite increased eating.
A 20 yo female college student with no significant past medical history presents with a chief complaint of fatigue. She reports increased sleep and appetite over the past few months as well as difficulty concentrating on her schoolwork. She no longer enjoys spending time with her friends and feels guilty for not spending more time with her family. Her physical exam and laboratory tests, including hemoglobin, hematocrit and thyroid stimulating hormone, are within normal limits. A 22 year old female presents with changes in appetite and sleeping, fatigue, diminished ability to think or concentrate, anhedonia and feelings of guilt.
A 10 yo boy with nighttime snoring, pauses in breathing, and restlessness with nighttime awakenings. No history of headache or night terrors. The boy's teacher recently contacted his parents because she was concerned about his declining grades, lack of attention, and excessive sleepiness during class. A 10-year-old boy with difficulty concentrating, daytime sleepiness, and failure to thrive. The boy sleeps restlessly, snores, sweats, breathes heavily through his mouth and gasps in his sleep.
A 10 year old child is brought to the emergency room complaining of myalgia, cough, and shortness of breath. Two weeks ago the patient was seen by his pediatrician for low-grade fever, abdominal pain, and diarrhea, diagnosed with a viral illness, and prescribed OTC medications. Three weeks ago the family returned home after a stay with relatives on a farm that raises domestic pigs for consumption. Vital signs: T: 39.5 C, BP: 90/60 HR: 120/min RR: 40/min. Physical exam findings include cyanosis, slight stiffness of the neck, and marked periorbital edema. Lab results include WBC 25,000, with 25% Eosinophils, and an unremarkable urinalysis. A 10 year old child with recent history of pork consumption presents with fever, myalgia, facial edema and eosinophilia
A 38 year old woman complains of severe premenstrual and menstrual pelvic pain, heavy, irregular periods and occasional spotting between periods. Past medical history remarkable for two years of infertility treatment and an ectopic pregnancy at age 26. A 38 year old woman with severe dysmenorrhea, menorrhagia, and menometrorrhagia. PMH of infertility treatment and ectopic pregnancy
A 56-year old Caucasian female complains of being markedly more sensitive to the cold than most people. She also gets tired easily, has decreased appetite, and has recently tried home remedies for her constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin. She moves and talks slowly. A 56-year old Caucasian female presents with sensitivity to cold, fatigue, and constipation. Physical examination reveals hyporeflexia with delayed relaxation of knee and ankle reflexes, and very dry skin.
A 44-year-old man was recently in an automobile accident where he sustained a skull fracture. In the emergency room, he noted clear fluid dripping from his nose. The following day he started complaining of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination. A 44-year-old man complains of severe headache and fever. Nuchal rigidity was found on physical examination.
A 5-year-old boy presents to the emergency department with complaints of progressively worsening dysphagia, drooling, fever and vocal changes. He is toxic-appearing, and leans forward while sitting on his mother's lap. He is drooling and speaks with a muffled "hot potato" voice. The parents deny the possibility of foreign body ingestion or trauma, and they report that they are delaying some of his vaccines. A 5-year-old boy presents with difficulty in breathing, stridor, drooling, fever, dysphagia and voice change.
A 27-year-old woman at 11 weeks gestation in her second pregnancy is found to have a hemoglobin (Hb) of 9.0 g/dL, white blood cell count 6.3 x 109/L, platelet count 119 x 109/L, mean corpuscular volume 109 fL. Further investigations reveal mild iron deficiency. She already receives iron supplementation. The obstetrician repeats the complete blood cell count 2 weeks later. The Hb is 8.9 g/dL, WBC count 7.1 x 109/L, and platelets 108 x 109/L. She describes difficulty swallowing. A reticulocyte count is performed and found elevated at 180 x 109/L. The obstetrician requests a hematology consult. The following additional results were found: Negative DAT, normal clotting screen, elevated LDH (2000 IU/L), normal urea and electrolytes, normal alanine aminotransferase (ALT), anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, no fragments, no agglutination, polychromasia and presence of hemosiderin in the urine. A young woman in her second gestation presenting with anemia resistant to improvement by iron supplementation, elevated LDH, anisocytosis, poikilocytosis, hemosiderinuria and normal clotting screen.
Karen is a 72-year-old woman with hypertension and type 2 diabetes, who was hospitalized for cryptogenic stroke two weeks ago. At the time, computed tomography was negative for brain hemorrhage and she was given thrombolytic therapy with resolution of her symptoms. Transesophageal echocardiogram and magnetic resonance angiogram of brain and great vessels found no evidence of abnormalities. She presents currently with a blood pressure of 120/70 mm Hg, normal glucose, and normal sinus rhythm on a 12-lead electrocardiogram. She reports history of occasional palpitations, shortness of breath and chest pain lasting for a few minutes and then stopping on their own. A 72-year-old woman with history of hypertension, type 2 diabetes, cryptogenic stroke, normal EKG, normal echocardiogram, normal angiograms, and complaints of occasional shortness of breath and palpitations.
A 4 year old boy presents to the emergency room with wheezing. He has had a history of allergic rhinitis, but no history of wheezing. His mother reports that 5 hours ago patient was playing in the backyard sandbox when she heard him suddenly start coughing. The coughing lasted only moments, but he has been audibly wheezing since. Mother was concerned, because his breathing has not returned to normal, so she brought him to the ED. On exam, the child is playful and well appearing. Wheezing is heard in the mid-right chest area. O2 sats are 100% on room air. A 4 year old boy presents with wheezing after playing in the backyard unobserved.
A 32 year old female with no previous medical history presents to clinic to discuss lab results from her most recent pap smear. She reports no complaints and is in general good health. The results of her PAP were cytology negative, HPV positive. A 32 year old female with screening that was positive for human papilloma virus with normal Pap smears.
A 65 yo African-American male with shortness of breath related to exertion that has been worsening over the past three weeks. He also has difficulty breathing when lying flat and has started using two to three extra pillows at night. Significant physical exam findings include bibasilar lung crackles, pitting ankle edema and jugular venous distension. A 65-year-old African-American male with progressive dyspnea on exertion and while lying flat; bilateral pitting lower-extremity edema. The lungs revealed bilateral basilar crackles.
A 66yo female with significant smoking history and chronic cough for the past two years presents with recent, progressive shortness of breath. She is in moderate respiratory distress after walking from the waiting room to the examination room. Physical exam reveals mildly distended neck veins, a barrel-shaped chest, and moderate inspiratory and expiratory wheezes. She has smoked 1 to 2 packs per days for the past 47 years. A 66-year-old female smoker presents with worsening dyspnea, productive chronic cough, moderate respiratory distress and unintentional weight loss.
An 89-year-old man was brought to the emergency department by his wife and son after six months of progressive changes in cognition and personality. He began to have poor memory, difficulty expressing himself, and exhibited unusual behaviors, such as pouring milk onto the table and undressing immediately after getting dressed. He is unable to dress, bathe, use the toilet, or walk independently. On examination the patient's temperature was 36.5°C (97.7°F), the heart rate 61 bpm in an irregular rhythm, the blood pressure 144/78 mm Hg, and the respiratory rate 18 bpm. The patient was alert and oriented to self and city but not year. He frequently interrupted the examiner. He repeatedly reached out to grab things in front of him, including the examiner's tie and face. He could not spell the word "world" backward, could not follow commands involving multiple steps and was unable to perform simple calculations. His speech was fluent, but he often used similar-sounding word substitutions. He could immediately recall three out of three words but recalled none of them after 5 minutes. Examination of the cranial nerves revealed clinically significant paratonic rigidity. Myoclonic jerks were seen in the arms, with symmetrically brisk reflexes. The reflexes in the legs were normal. An 89-year-old man with progressive change in personality, poor memory, and myoclonic jerks.
A 32-year-old male presents to your office complaining of diarrhea, abdominal cramping and flatulence. Stools are greasy and foul-smelling. He also has loss of appetite and malaise. He recently returned home from a hiking trip in the mountains where he drank water from natural sources. An iodine-stained stool smear revealed ellipsoidal cysts with smooth, well-defined walls and 2+ nuclei. A 32-year-old male presents with diarrhea and foul-smelling stools. Stool smear reveals protozoan parasites.
A 65-year-old male with a history of tuberculosis has started to complain of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his left upper lobe. The spherical mass moved in the cavity during supine and prone CT imaging. Culture of the sputum revealed an organism with septated, low-angle branching hyphae that had straight, parallel walls. A 65-year-old male complains of productive cough with tinges of blood. Chest X-ray reveals a round opaque mass within a cavity in his lung. Culture of the sputum revealed fungal elements.
An 18-year-old male returning from a recent vacation in Asia presents to the ER with a sudden onset of high fever, chills, facial flushing, epistaxis and severe headache and joint pain. His complete blood count reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit concentration and thrombocytopenia. An 18-year-old male returned from Asia a week ago. He presents with high fever, severe headache and joint pain. His blood analysis reveals leukopenia, increased hematocrit and thrombocytopenia.
A 31 yo male with no significant past medical history presents with productive cough and chest pain. He reports developing cold symptoms one week ago that were improving until two days ago, when he developed a new fever, chills, and worsening cough. He has right-sided chest pain that is aggravated by coughing. His wife also had cold symptoms a week ago but is now feeling well. Vitals signs include temperature 103.4, pulse 105, blood pressure 120/80, and respiratory rate 15. Lung exam reveals expiratory wheezing, decreased breath sounds, and egophany in the left lower lung field. A 31 year old male presents with productive cough, chest pain, fever and chills. On exam he has audible wheezing with decreased breath sounds and dullness to percussion.
A 10-year-old boy comes to the emergency department for evaluation of right knee pain. The child's guardians stated that he had been complaining of knee pain for the past 4 days and it had been getting progressively worse. There was no history of trauma. The day before the visit the boy developed a fever, and over the past day he has become increasingly lethargic. On physical examination blood pressure was 117/75 mm Hg, HR 138 bpm, temperature 38.1 C (100.5 F), respiration 28 bpm, oxygen saturation 97%. There was edema and tenderness of the right thigh and knee, as well as effusion and extremely limited range of motion. Sensation and motor tone were normal. Plain radiography and CT showed an osteolytic lesion. 10-year-old boy with progressive right knee and left leg pain and edema, lethargy and an osteolytic lesion. No history of trauma, fever, tachycardia, or urinary incontinence.
A 28 yo female G1P0A0 is admitted to the Ob/Gyn service for non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy. Past medical history is remarkable for obesity, a non-complicated appendectomy at age 8, infertility treatment for the past 3 years, and pelvic laparoscopy during which minor right Fallopian tube adhesions were cauterized. Her LMP was 8 weeks prior to admission. Beta HCG is 100 mIU. The attending physician usually treats unruptured ecoptic pregnancies laparoscopically but is concerned about the patient's obesity and history of adhesions. An obese 28 yo female with non-ruptured ectopic pregnancy and history of adhesions.
A 15 yo girl accompanied by her mother is referred for evaluation by the school. The girl has more than expected absences in the last three month, appears to be constantly tired and sleepy in class. Her mother assures the girl is well fed, and getting the proper sleep at night but admits the girls tires easily when they go out on weekend hikes. Physical examination: BP: 90/60. HR 130/min the only remarkable findings are extremely pale skin and mucosae. Grade 3/6 systolic murmur. Lab tests report Hb: 4.2 g/dL, MCV 61.8 fL, serum iron < 1.8 umol/L and ferritin of 2 ng/mL. Fecal occult blood is negative. A 15 yo girl with fatigue, pale skin, low hemoglobin and ferritin.
A previously healthy 8-year-old boy presents with a complaint of right lower extremity pain and fever. He reports limping for the past two days. The parents report no previous trauma, but do remember a tick bite during a summer visit to Maryland several months ago. They do not remember observing erythema migrans. On examination, the right knee is tender and swollen. Peripheral WBC count and SRP are slightly elevated. An 8-year-old boy presents with a swollen right knee, lower extremity pain and fever. The parents report no history of trauma. The parents noticed a tick bite several months earlier.
A 4-year-old girl presents with persistent fever for the past week. The parents report a spike at 104°F. The parents brought the child to the emergency room when they noticed erythematous rash on the girl's trunk. Physical examination reveals strawberry red tongue, red and cracked lips, and swollen red hands. The whites of both eyes are red with no discharge. A 4-year-old girl with persistent high fever, skin rash, strawberry tongue, swollen red hands, and bilateral nonexudative conjunctivitis.
A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain and bruising on the inside and outside of the elbow, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. On the x-ray, the ulna has dislocated posteriorly from the trochlea of the humerus. The radius has dislocated from the capitulum of the humerus. A 47 year old male who fell on his outstretched left arm presents with pain, swelling, and inability to bend the arm. The x-ray, shows posterior elbow dislocation.
78 M transferred to nursing home for rehab after CABG. Reportedly readmitted with a small NQWMI. Yesterday, he was noted to have a melanotic stool and then today he had approximately 9 loose BM w/ some melena and some frank blood just prior to transfer, unclear quantity. A 78 year old male presents with frequent stools and melena. 78 M w/ pmh of CABG in early [**Month (only) 3**] at [**Hospital6 4406**] (transferred to nursing home for rehab on [**12-8**] after several falls out of bed.) He was then readmitted to [**Hospital6 1749**] on [**3120-12-11**] after developing acute pulmonary edema/CHF/unresponsiveness?. There was a question whether he had a small MI; he reportedly had a small NQWMI. He improved with diuresis and was not intubated. . Yesterday, he was noted to have a melanotic stool earlier this evening and then approximately 9 loose BM w/ some melena and some frank blood just prior to transfer, unclear quantity.
An elderly female with past medical history of hypertension, severe aortic stenosis, hyperlipidemia, and right hip arthroplasty. Presents after feeling a snap of her right leg and falling to the ground. No head trauma or loss of consciousness. An elderly female with past medical history of right hip arthroplasty presents after feeling a snap of her right leg and falling to the ground. Ms [**Known patient lastname 241**] is a [**Age over 90 2398**] year old woman with past medical history significant for hypertension, severe aortic stenosis, hyperlipidemia, arthroplasty. . Per the patient, she was standing and felt a snap of her right leg and fell to the ground. No head trauma or LOC. She was evaluated by orthopedics and transferred to medicine for optimization of her cardiac status. Review of systems: Ear, Nose, Throat: Dry mouth Cardiovascular: Edema, Orthopnea Respiratory: Dyspnea Flowsheet Data as of [**3294-3-6**] 10:33 PM Vital Signs Hemodynamic monitoring Fluid Balance 24 hours Since [**96**] AM Tmax: 37.5 C (99.5) Tcurrent: 37.5 C (99.5) HR: 102 (93 - 102) bpm BP: 117/54(70) {117/54(70) - 117/54(70)} mmHg RR: 24 (15 - 24) insp/min SpO2: 100% Heart rhythm: ST (Sinus Tachycardia) . -- Clarify She appears comfortable with adequate pain control with prn morphine. Given her tight valvular stenosis, she is high risk for general anesthesia. - would start standing tylenol 1g q8 - continue morphine IV prn for breakthrough - plan for OR tomorrow am per ortho pending optimization of her cardiac function, and improvement in renal function . # CAD: No clear documentation, however given age calcific atherosclerosis is highly likely -- continue statin -- Hold beta blocker for now -- hold aspirin in perioperative period . # ATRIAL FIBRILLATION: In setting of acute pain and peri-op. Will need to monitor as pt with high CHADS score, however in periop period would not be able to have systemic anticoagulation -- Rate control with beta blocker once stable -- If unstable, would use esmolol first, cardiovert last option. . # HTN: Better controlled on floor. Good BP control essential for preventing flash pulmonary edema in setting of AS. - continue metoprolol, as above - continue to monitor BP and consider adding another [**Doctor Last Name **] such as amlodipine 5mg daily if BP sustains above SBP 150s . # Hyperlipidemia - continue simvastatin 40mg PO daily . # FEN/GI: Low sodium diet, replete lytes PRN . # CODE: Confirmed DNR/DNI
A 75F with a PMHx significant for severe PVD, CAD, DM, and CKD presented after being found down unresponsive at home. She was found to be hypoglycemic to 29 with hypotension and bradycardia. Her hypotension and confusion improved with hydration. She had a positive UA which eventually grew klebsiella. She had temp 96.3, respiratory rate 22, BP 102/26, a leukocytosis to 18 and a creatinine of 6 (baseline 2). Pt has blood cultures positive for group A streptococcus. On the day of transfer her blood pressure dropped to the 60s. She was anuric throughout the day. She received 80mg IV solumedrol this morning in the setting of low BPs and rare eos in urine. On arrival to the MICU pt was awake but drowsy. On ROS, pt denies pain, lightheadedness, headache, neck pain, sore throat, recent illness or sick contacts, cough, shortness of breath, chest discomfort, heartburn, abd pain, n/v, diarrhea, constipation, dysuria. Is a poor historian regarding how long she has had a rash on her legs. A 75F found to be hypoglycemic with hypotension and bradycardia. She had UA positive for klebsiella. She had a leukocytosis to 18 and a creatinine of 6. Pt has blood cultures positive for group A streptococcus. On the day of transfer her blood pressure dropped to the 60s. She was anuric throughout the day, awake but drowsy. This morning she had temp 96.3, respiratory rate 22, BP 102/26. Pt is a 75F with a PMHx significant for severe PVD, CAD, DM, and CKD who presented to [**Hospital1 **]-[**Location (un) 1375**] on [**6-25**] after being found down unresponsive at home. She was found to be hypoglycemic to 29 with hypotension and bradycardia. Her hypotension and confusion improved with hydration. She had a positive UA which eventually grew klebsiella, treated initially with levofloxacin. She had a leukocytosis to 18 and a creatinine of 6 up from presumed prior baseline of ~2. On morning of transfer, pt had blood cultures result 3/3 bottles positive for GAS, her antibiotics were switched to vancomycin which was then changed to ceftriaxone. Her blood pressure dropped to the 60s. She was given a bolus of bicarb and transfered to their ICU. After an additional bolus of 500cc she was started on levophed. She was anuric throughout the day. She had a midline placed on right side. She received 80mg IV solumedrol this morning in the setting of low BPs and rare eos in urine. On arrival to the MICU pt was awake but drowsy. She was receiving levophed throughout her transfer. Arrival VS: 96.3 68 102/26 22 97% 2L NC on 0.04mcg/kg/min levophed. On ROS, pt denies pain, lightheadedness, headache, neck pain, sore throat, recent illness or sick contacts, cough, shortness of breath, chest discomfort, heartburn, abd pain, n/v, diarrhea, constipation, dysuria. Is a poor historian regarding how long she has had a rash on her legs. States she has not felt ill and she was brought to the hospital because her daughter came home and found her sleeping. Does complain of feeling very thirsty."
An 87 yo woman with h/o osteoporosis, multiple recent falls, CAD, who presents from nursing home with C2 fracture. The patient was in her usual state of health at her nursing home until yesterday morning when she sustained a fall when trying to get up to go to the bathroom. The fall was not witnessed, but the patient reportedly did not lose consciousness. The patient complained of neck and rib pain. She was taken to OSH, where she was found to have a comminuted fracture of C2. In the ED, the patient's VS were T 99.1, BP 106/42, P 101, R 24. She had an ECG which showed sinus tachycardia and ST depressions in V3 and V4. CT head was negative for ICH. An 87 yo woman with h/o osteoporosis, DM2, dementia, depression, and anxiety presents s/p fall with evidence of C2 fracture, chest pain, tachycardia, tachypnea, and low blood pressure. The patient is an 87 yo woman with h/o osteoporosis, multiple recent falls, CAD, who presents from nursing home with C2 fracture and evidence of pulmonary emoblus. The patient was in her usual state of health at her nursing home until yesterday morning when she sustained a fall when trying to get up to go to the bathroom. The fall was not witnessed, but the patient reportedly did not lose consciousness. At 3:30 that afternoon, the patient complained of neck and rib pain. She was taken to OSH, where she was found to have a comminuted fracture of C2. She was transferred to [**Hospital1 1**] for further evaluation. Of note, the patient was recently treated for CDiff infection at her nursing facility, per discussion with her daughter. . In the ED, the patient's VS were T 99.1, BP 106/42, P 101, R 24. She had an ECG which showed sinus tachycardia and ST depressions in V3 and V4. CT head was negative for ICH. She was seen by Trauma surgery, who recommended stabalization with a cervical collar for the next six to eight weeks, but they deemed that she is not an operable candidate.
An 82 man with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, status-post bioprosthetic atrial valve replacement for atrial stenosis, atrial fibrillation with cardioversion, right nephrectomy for renal cell carcinoma, colon cancer status-post colectomy, presents with 9 day history of productive cough, fever and dyspnea. An 82 man with multiple chronic conditions and previous surgeries presents with 9 day history of productive cough, fever and dyspnea. An 82 M with COPD, s/p bioprosthetic AVR for AS, afib s/p CV, right nephrectomy for RCC, colon ca s/p colectomy who presents with 9 day hostory of productive cough and fevers.light of stairs baseline. dyspnea and productive cough of several weeks. Otherwise patient is without any complaints In the ED, initial vs were: 80, sbp 100, mid 90s on 6L/NC. Last vital signs prior to ER transfer were 98.1, 83, 116/40, 20, 95% on 3L/NC. Patient looked comnfortable. 90% room air, INR 8, ABG, ARF, 2 liters ivf. guiac + brown, got levo, ceftriaxone. Physical Examination General Appearance: No acute distress Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic Cardiovascular: (PMI Normal), (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal), (Murmur: Systolic) Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Present), (Left DP pulse: Present) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Crackles : RLL, Wheezes : diffuse) Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present Extremities: Right lower extremity edema: Absent, Left lower extremity edema: Absent Skin: Warm Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): x3, Movement: Purposeful, Tone: Normal
A 94 year old female with hx recent PE/DVT, atrial fibrillation, CAD presents with fever and abdominal pain. Earlier, she presented with back pain and shortness of breath. She was found to have bilateral PE's and new afib and started on coumadin. Her HCT dropped slightly, requiring blood transfusion, with guaic positive stools. She was discharged and returned with abdominal cramping and black stools. EGD showed a small gastric and duodenal ulcer (healing), esophageal stricture, no active bleeding. She also had an abdominal CT demonstrating a distended gallbladder with gallstones and biliary obstruction with several CBD stones. A 94 year old female with hx recent PE/DVT, atrial fibrillation, CAD presents with fever and abdominal pain. An abdominal CT demonstrates a distended gallbladder with gallstones and biliary obstruction with several CBD stones. This is a [**Age over 90 **] year old female with hx recent PE/DVT, atrial fibrillation, CAD who is transfered from [**Hospital3 915**] Hospital for ERCP. She has had multiple admissions to [**Hospital3 915**] this past month, most recently on [**2963-11-24**]. In early [**Month (only) 776**], she presented with back pain and shortness of breath. She was found to have bilateral PE's and new afib and started on coumadin. Her HCT dropped slightly, requiring blood transfusion, with guaic positive stools. She was discharged and returned with abdominal cramping and black stools. She was found to have a HCT drop from 32 to 21. She was given vit K, given a blood transfusion and started on protonix. She received an IVF filter and EGD. EGD showed a small gastric and duodenal ulcer (healing), esophageal stricture, no active bleeding. She also had an abdominal CT demonstrating a distended gallbladder with gallstones and biliary obstruction with several CBD stones. Since 12 AM Tmax: 38 C (100.4 Tcurrent: 37.4 C (99.4 HR: 92 (83 - 94) bpm BP: 89/32(54) {89/32(54) - 94/37(60)} mmHg RR: 23 (23 - 33) insp/min SpO2: 100% Heart rhythm: SR (Sinus Rhythm)
This is a 41-year-old male patient with medical history of alcohol abuse, cholelithiasis, hypertension, obesity who presented to his local hospital with hematemasis. On Friday evening he had several episodes of vomiting of bright and dark red material. In the emergency department, initial vs were: T 98.6 P66 BP145/89 R16 O2 sat 98% RA. He was started on a protonix gtt and octreotide gtt given his elevated liver function tests. Lab tests show elevated lipase, pancytopenia and coagulopathy. He had a right upper abdominal quadrant ultrasound which demonstrated gallstones and sludge and ascites. As such given new ascites and abdominal pain he was given levofloxacin 750mg IV and flagyl 500mg IV reportedly for spontaneous bacterial peritonitis prophylaxis. On the floor, he reports that he had two episodes of vomiting of dark red emesis. Per his nurse it was about 75ml and was gastrocult positive. He has right upper abdominal quadrant pain radiating to his back. He also reports slow increase in abdominal girth with more acute distention and lower extremity swelling over the two days prior to admission. The patient denies fever, chills, night sweats, headache, sinus tenderness, rhinorrhea or congestion. Denied cough, shortness of breath. He also denied chest pain or tightness. A 41-year-old male patient with medical history of alcohol abuse, cholelithiasis, hypertension, obesity who presented to his local hospital with hematemasis, abdominal pain radiating to the back and elevated lipase. Signs of ascites, pancytopenia and coagulopathy. Mr. [**Known patient lastname 7952**] is a 41 yo M with PMH ETOH abuse, cholelithiasis, HTN, obesity who presented to [**Hospital3 **] with hematemasis. He reports that for the past 6 years he has been drinking [**2-9**] of a 1.7L bottle of vodka daily. On Friday evening he had several episodes of vomiting of bright and dark red material for which he presented to [**Hospital1 **]. He had an NG tube which reportedly failed to clear with lavage and patient self d/c'd the NGT because he was vomiting around the tube. He was given 4mg IV morphine for abdominal pain, ativan 2mg IV for withdrawal, protonix 40mg IV, zofran 8mg IV, octreotide 50mcg IV, and 1 unit of platelets. In the ED, initial vs were: T 98.6 P66 BP145/89 R16 O2 sat 98% RA. He was started on a protonix gtt and octreotide gtt given his elevated LFT's. He was also given a bananna bag. He had a RUQ ultrasound which demonstrated gallstones and sludge and per ED resident report ascites. As such given new ascites and abdominal pain he was given levofloxacin 750mg IV and flagyl 500mg IV reportedly for SBP prophylaxis. He was evaluted by GI in the ED. . On the floor, he reports that he had two episodes of vomiting of dark red emesis. Per his nurse it was about 75ml and was gastrocult positive. He otherwise endorese RUQ pain radiating to his back. He also reports slow increase in abdominal girth with more acute distention and lower extremity swelling over the two days prior to admission. Physical Examination Vitals: BP:153/92 P:64 R: 20 O2: 97% RA General: Alert, oriented, no acute distress, no asterixis HEENT: Sclera icteric, dry mucous membranes Neck: supple, obese, JVP not elevated Lungs: bibasilar crackles, no wheezes CV: Regular rate and rhythm, [**3-16**] soft nonradiating systolic murmur Abdomen: obese/distended, RUQ and epigastric tenderness to palpation, normoactive bowel sounds, no rebound or guarding. Ext: warm, well perfused, 1+ pitting edema bilaterally, 2+ pulses Labs WBC 2.5 Hct 36.2 Plt 28 Cr 0.5 Glucose 111 Other labs: PT / PTT / INR:19.1/31.6/1.7, ALT / AST:37/165, Alk Phos / T Bili:130/6.9, Amylase / Lipase:145/288, Albumin:2.5 g/dL, LDH:278 IU/L, Ca++:7.9 mg/dL, Mg++:1.7 mg/dL, PO4:3.0 mg/dL
A G2P0010 26 yo F, now estimated to 10 weeks pregnant, with 4yr hx of IDDM. Last menstrual period is not known but was sometime three months ago. Five days ago, the patient began feeling achy and congested. She had received a flu shot about 1 week prior. She continued to feel poorly and developed hyperemesis. She was seen in the ED (but not admitted), where she was given IVF, Reglan and Tylenol and she was found to have a positive pregnancy test. Today, she returned to the ED with worsening of symptoms. She was admitted to the OB service and given IVF and Reglan. Of note, her labwork demonstrates a blood glucose of 160, bicarbonate of 11, beta-hCG of 3373 and ketones in her urine. Her family noted that she was breathing rapidly and was quite somnolent. She appears to be in respiratory distress. A 26 year-old diabetic woman, estimated to 10 weeks pregnant, presents with hyperemesis. Her labwork demonstrates a blood glucose of 160, bicarbonate of 11, beta-hCG of 3373 and ketones in her urine. Ms. [**Known patient lastname **] is a G2P0010 26 yo F, now estimated to 10 weeks pregnant. Pt has 4yr hx of IDDM. LMP is not known but was sometime in [**Month (only) **]. On [**3243-11-10**], the patient began feeling achy and congested. She had received a flu shot about 1 week prior. She continued to feel poorly on [**3243-11-11**], and developed hyperemesis. She was seen in the ED (but not admitted) at [**Hospital3 **], where she was given IVF, Reglan and Tylenol and she was found to have a positive pregnancy test. Today, she returned to the ED with worsening of symptoms. She was admitted to the OB service and given IVF and Reglan. Of note, her labwork demonstrates a blood glucose of 160, bicarbonate of 11, beta-hCG of 3373 and ketones in her urine. Her family noted that she was breathing rapidly and was quite somnolent. She appears to be in respiratory distress. . The falling beta-HCG and trans-abdominal ultrasound indicate intra-uterine fetal demise. Medications on Admission: Lantus 65 units qAM Novolog SSI Cortef 3mg qAM, 1mg qHS . Meds on Transfer: Levophed Dopamine Solumedrol 80mg IV Amiodarone load Insulin in D10
This is a 24 and 2/7 weeks, 678 gm male, born to a 34-year-old G2, P0 to 3 woman. Prenatal screens were O positive, antibody negative, hepatitis B surface antigen negative, RPR nonreactive, rubella immune, and GBS unknown. This was an IVF pregnancy, notable for bleeding in the first trimester. The mother presented to the Hospital on the morning of delivery with premature rupture of membranes. Betamethasone was given approximately 18 hours prior to delivery. The mother was also started on ampicillin, gentamycin, and magnesium sulfate. Mother's labor progressed despite magnesium and she developed fever and chills. Maximum temperature was 101.2 degrees. Because of progressive labor and concerns for chorioamnionitis, the decision was made to deliver the infants. Delivery was by cesarean section. The infant was intubated in the Delivery Room and Apgars were 5 at one and 8 at five minutes. Examination was notable for an extreme pre-term infant, intubated. Weight was 678 gm. Chest x-ray shows respiratory immaturity and diffuse bilateral opacities within the lungs, left greater than right, with increased lung volumes. Infant with respiratory distress syndrome and extreme prematurity. Chest x-ray shows diffuse bilateral opacities within the lungs, with increased lung volumes. Infant is a 24 [**1-31**] week, 678 gm male triplet II who was admitted to the NICU for management of extreme prematurity. Infant was born to a 34 y.o. G2P0 now 3 mother. Prenatal screens: O+, antibody negative, HBsAg negative, RPR NR, RI, GBS unknown. IVF pregnancy notable for bleeding in the first trimester, cerclage placement at 19 weeks, and premature rupture of membranes on [**3435-11-28**] am. Mother presented to [**Hospital1 53**]. Betamethasone given [**11-28**] at 0640. Also started on ampicillin, gentamicin, and magnesium sulfate. Mother's labor progressed despite magnesium and she developed chills and a fever (Tm 101.2). Due to progressive labor and concerns for infection, decision made to deliver infants. Delivery by Cesarean section. Infant intubated in the Delivery Room and Apgars were 5 at one and 8 at five minutes. Infant transported to NICU. Exam: VS per CareView, of note has required several boluses of NS for low BP. Exam notes recorded on newborn examination form. Growth measurements: Wt 678 = 25%. -- Resp: Infant placed on SIMV. Rec'd 1 dose of surfactant. CXR FINDINGS: There are diffuse bilateral opacities within the lungs, left greater than right, with increased lung volumes. No pleural effusion or pneumothorax. An endotracheal tube is seen with tip approximately one vertebral body above the carina. An umbilical vein catheter is seen with tip in the superior vena cava and an umbilical artery catheter is seen with tip in the mid-thoracic region. The imaged portions of the abdomen show a few [**Last Name (un) 36399**]-filled loops of bowel within the left abdomen. No abnormal soft tissue mass or calcifications. No free interperitoneal air. The imaged bony structures are unremarkable.
A 55y/o F with sarcoidosis, COPD, idiopathic cardiomyopathy with EF 40% and diastolic dysfunction, varices s/p TIPS and hypothyroidism presenting today with confusion. She was brought to the ED by her husband for evaluation after he noted worsening asterixis. While in the waiting room the pt became more combative and then unresponsive. In the ED: VS - Temp 97.9F, HR 115, BP 122/80, R 18, O2-sat 98% 2L NC. She was unresponsive but able to protect her airway and so not intubated. She vomited x1 and received Zofran as well as 1.5 L NS. Labs were significant for K 5.5, BUN 46, Cr 2.2 (up from baseline of 0.8), and ammonia of 280. Stool was Guaiac negative. A urinalysis and CXR were done and are pending, and a FAST revealed hepatosplenomegaly but no intraperitoneal fluid. A 55-year-old woman with sarcoidosis, presenting today with confusion and worsening asterixis. In the waiting room, the pt became more combative and then unresponsive. Ammonia level 280 on admission. The patient is a 55-year-old woman with hepatic sarcoidosis and regenerative hyperplasia s/p TIPS [**10/3245**] placed [**1-27**] variceal bleeding and portal hypertensive gastropathy s/p TIPS re-do with angioplasty and portal vein embolectomy, who was brought to the ED by her husband for evaluation after he noted worsening asterixis. While in the waiting room the pt became more combative and then unresponsive. In the ED: VS - Temp 97.9F, HR 115, BP 122/80, R 18, O2-sat 98% 2L NC. She was unresponsive but able to protect her airway and so not intubated. She vomited x1 and received Zofran as well as 1.5 L NS. Labs were significant for K 5.5, BUN 46, Cr 2.2 (up from baseline of 0.8), and ammonia of 280. Stool was Guaiac negative. A urinalysis and CXR were done and are pending, and a FAST revealed hepatosplenomegaly but no intraperitoneal fluid. On arrival to the ICU the pt had another episode of emesis. NGT was placed to suction and 1.5L bilious material was drained. Allergies: Cipro (Oral) (Ciprofloxacin Hcl) Hives; Doxycycline Hives; hallucin Paxil (Oral) (Paroxetine Hcl) hair loss; Quinine Rash; Compazine (Injection) (Prochlorperazine Edisylate) muscle spasm; Levaquin (Oral) (Levofloxacin) tendinitis of t Lithium Hives;
A 80yo male with dementia and past history of CABG, two caths this year patent LIMA, totally occluded SVG to RPDA, SVG to OM2, s/p BMS to LCX, presents with increasing chest pain and nausea over the past few days. The patient has history of repeated episodes of recurrent chest pain with relief with morphine. Pt is on ASA, Statins, Imdur, and Heparin. Last month’s cath showed patent BMS in LCX and no new lesions. According to the family, the patient has increasing episodes of chest pain with minimal exertion in the last two weeks. 80 yo male with demantia and past medical history of CABG with repeated episodes of chest pain. Admitted for severe chest pain episode. Mr. [**Name13 (STitle) 5827**] is an 80yo M with dementia, CAD s/p CABG in [**3420**] (LIMA-LAD, SVG to OM2, SVG to RPDA), then s/p CABG redo in [**3426**], then s/p 2 caths this year with patent LIMA, totally occluded SVG to RPDA, SVG to OM2, s/p BMS to LCX on [**1-26**] who presented to [**Hospital3 53**] Hospital with increasing chest pain and nausea over the past few days. . Per report, patient has presented several times since last cathed for recurrent angina. Admitted to [**Hospital3 **] on [**3436-4-2**] with recurrent chest pain. Ruled out for MI. Last episode of chest pressure was the morning of transfer, associated with dry heaves and belching relieved with morphine. Pt was continued on ASA, Plavix, Statin, BBker, Imdur and placed on Heparin gtt. Cath last [**Month (only) **] here at [**Hospital1 5**] showed a patent BMS in LCX and no new lesions. According to the family he usually has angina once every day or two, but for the past 2 weeks he has been having angina with any minimal exertion (eg putting on his shirt), and waking him several times per night.
66 yo female pedestrian struck by auto. Unconscious and unresponsive at scene. Multiple fractures and complication secondary to the primary injury. S/p embolization of the avulsed second branch of brachial artery, complicated by exp lap secondary to suspicion of abdominal compartment syndrome. Not much of the response after weaning the sedation with CT of the head showing extensive interparenchymal hemorrhages throughout. 66 yo female pedestrian struck by auto. Unconscious and unresponsive at scene. Multiple fractures and head CT showing extensive interparenchymal hemorrhages. 66 yo female pedestrian struck by auto. Unconscious and unresponsive at scene. Multiple fractures and complication secondary to the primary injury. S/p embolization of the avulsed second branch of brachial artery, complicated by exp lap secondary to suspicion of abdominal compartment syndrome. Not much of the response after weaning the sedation but with minimal improvement with CT of the head showing with extensive interparenchymal hemorrhages throughout Tmax: 34.4 C (93.9 T current: 34.4 C (93.9 HR: 71 (71 - 88) bpm BP: 171/82(120) {158/74(113) - 171/83(122)} mmHg RR: 24 (10 - 24) insp/min SPO2: 99% Heart rhythm: SR (Sinus Rhythm)
A 43 year old woman with history of transverse myelitis leading to paraplegia, depression, frequent pressure ulcers, presenting with chills and reporting she felt "as if dying". Upon presentation, she denied any shortness of breath, nausea, vomiting, but did report diarrhea with two loose bowel movements per day. Patient reported that she had a fallout with her VNA and has not had any professional wound care. Patient is agitated, with rigors, complaining of feeling cold and back pain. Patient rolled and found to have a stage IV decubitus ulcer on coccyx and buttocks, heels. Admission labs significant for thrombocytosis, elevated lactate, and prolonged PT. A 43 year old woman with history of transverse myelitis leading to paraplegia, depression, frequent pressure ulcers, presenting with chills, agitation, rigors, and back pain. Patient has stage IV decubitus ulcers on coccyx and buttocks, heels. Admission labs significant for thrombocytosis, elevated lactate, and prolonged PT. Ms [**Known patient lastname 21112**] is a 43 year old woman with history of transverse myelitis leading to paraplegia, depression, frequent pressure ulcers, presenting with chills and reporting she felt "as if dying". Upon presentation, she denied any shortness of breath, nausea, vomiting, but did report diarrhea with two loose bowel movements per day. Patient reported that she had a fallout with her VNA and has not had any professional wound care since early [**Month (only) 51**]. Patient has a long history of psychiatric and behavioral problems. [**Name (NI) **] [**Name2 (NI) **] review, patient was dismissed from the [**Company 110**] practice due to abusive behavior against staff. She does not have a primary care provider at this time. In the ED: Temp 98.9 HR: 90 BP: 109/62 RR: 16 O2 Sat: 97% RA. Patient initially thought to be agitated yelling her EMS transporters were "white devils". Patient kept in observation area, although with rigors, complaining of feeling cold and back pain. Patient rolled and found to have a stage IV decubitus ulcer on coccyx and buttocks, heels. ================== ADMISSION LABS ================== [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD WBC-10.3 RBC-4.98 Hgb-8.1* Hct-30.7* MCV-62* MCH-16.2*# MCHC-26.3* RDW-17.5* Plt Ct-914* [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD Neuts-89.0* Bands-0 Lymphs-9.9* Monos-0.8* Eos-0.3 Baso-0.1 [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD PT-15.6* PTT-32.8 INR(PT)-1.4* [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD Glucose-99 UreaN-10 Creat-0.6 Na-135 K-4.9 Cl-102 HCO3-18* AnGap-20 [**3266-8-26**] 01:50PM BLOOD Calcium-8.5 Phos-3.2 Mg-2.3 [**3266-8-26**] 04:00PM BLOOD Lipase-17 [**3266-8-26**] 01:56PM BLOOD Lactate-6.3* [**3266-8-26**] 04:12PM BLOOD Lactate-2.9* [**3266-8-26**] 06:17PM BLOOD Lactate-1.6
A 52 year-old woman with chronic obstructive pulmonary disease and breast cancer who presented to an outside hospital with shortness of breath and back pain for several weeks. Had been seen by primary care provider for the back pain and treated with pain medications. Subsequently developed rash that was thought to be zoster. In the last few days, oxygen requirement increased and she had cough, fevers and sore throat. Noted oxygen saturation of 79% with ambulation at home. At outside hospital she was diagnosed with "multi-focal pneumonia." In the process of obtaining a computerized tomography scan, contrast infiltrated her arm with skin blistering and swelling. She was treated with ceftriaxone and transferred to current hospital. A 52 year-old woman with history of COPD and breast cancer who presents with SOB, hypoxia, cough, fevers and sore throat for several weeks. A 52 year old woman with COPD and breast cancer who presented to an OSH with SOB and back pain for several weeks. Had been seen by PCP for the back pain and treated with pain meds. Subsequently developed rash that was thought to be zoster. In the last few days, increased O2 requirement (2 liters at baseline --> 4 liters), cough, fevers and sore throat. Noted sat of 79% with ambulation at home. At OSH, diagnosed with "multi-focal pneumonia." In the process of obtaining a CT scan, had contrast infiltrate her arm with skin blistering and swelling. Treated with ceftriaxone and transferred to [**Hospital1 1**]. Patient admitted from: Transfer from other hospital History obtained from Patient, Medical records Physical Examination General Appearance: Well nourished, No(t) Anxious, sleepy Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL, No(t) Sclera edema Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic Cardiovascular: (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal), No(t) S3, No(t) S4, (Murmur: No(t) Systolic) Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Not assessed), (Left DP pulse: Not assessed) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: No(t) Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Wheezes : expiratory, Diminished: ), scoliotic, can feel ribs on the back on the right move with breathing Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present Extremities: Right: Trace, Left: Trace, No(t) Cyanosis, Clubbing Musculoskeletal: No(t) Unable to stand Skin: Not assessed, No(t) Jaundice, resolving zoster rash on right lateral chest, right arm is wrapped Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): person/place/time but sleepy, Movement: Not assessed, Tone: Not assessed
A 67 y.o. M with end stage COPD on home oxygen, tracheobronchomalacia s/p Y-stent, h/o RUL resection for squamous cell carcinoma with Cyberknife treatment. Patient had Y-stent placed complicated by cough and copious secretions requiring multiple therapeutic aspirations. Last bronchoscopy was at OSH, where patient had copious secretions that were aspirated. Pt reports compliance with Mucomyst nebs and Mucinex. Patient reports decreaed appetitie, 50 lb wt loss in 6 months. Decreased activity tolerance. Smokes 5 cig/day. PET scan revealed FDG avid soft tissue mass adjacent to lung resection site with some FDG avid nodes concerning for recurrence. On arrival, vitals were T98.6 HR86 BP106/78 O289. Pt denied chest pain, palpitations, trauma, F/C, N/V/D. Pt. presents with worsening SOB with R shoulder pain and weakness. 67 y.o. male smoker with end stage COPD on home oxygen, tracheobronchomalacia, s/p RUL resection for squamous cell carcinoma. Y-stent placement was complicated by cough and copious secretions requiring multiple therapeutic aspirations. Patient reports decreased appetite, 50 lb wt loss in 6 months. Decreased activity tolerance. PET scan revealed some FDG avid nodes concerning for recurrence. Pt. presents with worsening SOB with R shoulder pain and weakness. Mr. [**Known patient lastname 3887**] is a 67 y.o. M with end stage COPD on home O2 3 L NC, tracheobronchomalacia s/p Y-stent, s/p RUL resection for squamous cell carcinoma with Cyberknife treatment in [**2764**]. Patient had Y-stent placed in [**2769-1-1**] complicated by cough and copious secretions requiring multiple therapeutic aspirations. Last bronchoscopy was [**5-/2769**] at OSH, where patient had copious secretions that were aspirated. Pt reports compliance with Mucomyst nebs and Mucinex. He wears O2 "almost" 24 hours/day, but always at night. He does not wear his CPAP. Endorses inability to expectorate secretions and having "full feeling" for [**1-7**] weeks. Decreaed appetitie, 50 lb wt loss in 6 months. Decreased activity tolerance. Smokes 5 cig/day. PET scan in [**6-12**] revealed FDG avid soft tissue mass adjacent to RUL resection site with some FDG avid nodes concerning for recurrence. On arrival to [**Hospital1 17**], vitals were T98.6 HR86 BP106/78 O289. Pt denied chest pain, palpitations, trauma, F/C, N/V/D. R shoulder full PROM, limited abduction on active ROM.
A 90+ year old woman who was recently hospitalized for legionella PNA, and has been continuing her recovery at home with her son. She had been doing fairly well for the last few days except for some waxing and waning confusion, and perhaps intermittent dysarthria. The son was getting ready for work at 1:15am today, as per his usual routine. He looked in on the patient at that time; she appeared to be sleeping comfortably in bed, on her back. Soon thereafter, he heard her walking to the bathroom. At 1:40am, he heard a loud crash coming from the bathroom. He found the patient on the floor of the bathroom, making non-verbal utterances and with minimal movement of the right side. A 90+ year old woman who was recently hospitalized for legionella PNA, with confusion and dysarthria the last few days. Found down in the bathroom this morning, making non-verbal utterances and with minimal movement of the right side. The patient is a [**Age over 90 **] year old woman who was recently hospitalized for legionella PNA, and has been continuing her recovery at home with her son. She had been doing fairly well for the last few days except for some waxing and [**Doctor Last Name 279**] confusion, and perhaps intermittent dysarthria. The son was getting ready for work at 1:15am today, as per his usual routine. He looked in on the patient at that time; she appeared to be sleeping comfortably in bed, on her back. Soon thereafter, he heard her walking to the bathroom. At 1:40am, he heard a loud crash coming from the bathroom. He found the patient on the floor of the bathroom, making non-verbal utterances and with minimal movement of the right side. The glass holder which held the toothbrushes was shattered on the floor. The son called EMS. HEENT: Eyes closed, non-responsive to verbal stimuli, non-verbal, grimaces on sternal rub Cranial Nerves: Pupils equally round and reactive to light, 3 to 2 mm bilaterally. Eyes closed, left gaze preference, normal doll's, corneal intact, R facial weakness, tongue was midline Motor: spontaneous movement L side; triple flexion on R side. No anti-gravity movement. Sensation: Winces to noxious stimuli on the right. Withdraws to noxious stimuli on the left Upgoing toe on R Coordination: unable to test Gait: unable to test
This is a 76-year-old female with personal history of diastolic congestive heart failure, atrial fibrillation on Coumadin, presenting with low hematocrit and shortness of breath. Her hematocrit dropped from 28 to 16.9 over the past 6 weeks with progressive shortness of breath, worse with exertion over the past two weeks. She reports orthopnea. She denies fevers, chills, chest pain, palpitaitons, cough, abdominal pain, constipation or diahrrea, melena, blood in her stool, dysuria or rash. Her electrocardiogram present no significant change from previous. Her Guaiac was reported as being positive. 76-year-old female with personal history of diastolic congestive heart failure, atrial fibrillation on Coumadin, presenting with low hematocrit and dyspnea. This is a 76-year-old female with pmh of diastolic CHF, atrial fibrillation on coumadin, presenting with Hct 16.9 and shortness of breath. She had routine labs drawn yesterday at her PCP's office. Once her hematocrit came she was called and instructed to come to the ED. She is also reporting progressive shortness of breath worse with exertion over the past two weeks. She denies fevers, chills, chest pain, palpitaitons, cough, abdominal pain, constipation or diahrrea, melena, blood in her stool, dysuria, rash. She reports orthopnea. In the ED: vitals were 98.4 131/49, 60 24 100% 2L. ekg with NSR, twi in V1, no significant change from previous. Repeat CBC showed Hct 16.1 with haptoglobin < 20, and elevated LDH to 315. In addition, her guaiac was reported as being positive. Past medical history: Hypertension Atrial flutter/fibrillation, s/p cardioversion [**2797-1-27**] Diastolic heart failure Hysterectomy Bilateral hip replacements Social History: Married for 53 years with four children. She is retired from the airport. She does not smoke or drink. Occupation: retired from airport Drugs: denies Tobacco: denies any history Alcohol: denies
A 40-year-old woman with a history of alcoholism complicated by Delirium Tremens and seizures 2 years ago, polysubstance abuse ncluding IV heroin, cocaine, crack (last use 2 years ago), heroin inhalation (last use 2 days ago), hep C, presents for voluntary admission for detox. The patient would like to undergo detoxification so she can take care of her children. She also complains of abdominal pain in lower quadrants, radiating to the back since yesterday. She says the pain has worsened since yesterday and is not related to food intake. She also complains of nausea, vomitting (bilious but nonbloody), and diarrhea (no black or red stools). She stopped her methadone 1 week ago in an effort to quit drug abuse. She reports dyspnea on exertion, orthopnea. Also describes weight gain. Labs are significant for elevated lipase. A 40-year-old woman with a history of alcoholism complicated by Delirium Tremens and seizures 2 years ago, polysubstance abuse, hep C, presents with abdominal pain in lower quadrants, radiating to the back, nausea, vomitting and diarrhea. Labs are significant for elevated lipase. 40 year old woman with a h/o alcoholism c/b DTs/seizures 2 years ago, polysubstance abuse including IV heroin, cocaine, crack (last use 2 years ago), heroin inhalation (last use 2 days ago), hep C, presents for voluntary admission for detox. The patient would like to undergo detoxification so she can take care of her children. She also complains of abdominal pain, [**12-24**], lower quadrants, radiating to the back since yesterday. She cannot describe any relationship with food as she has not eaten anything. She says the pain has worsened since yesterday. She also complains of nausea, vomitting (bilious but nonbloody), and diarrhea (no black or red stools). Her last drink was 9am on [**3154-2-15**]. Recently stopped her methadone 1 week ago in an effort to quit drug abuse. . In the ED she was 98.6 101 149/96 20 96. She was [**Doctor Last Name 2062**] 16-25 on CIWA. ROS: (+) Reports DOE, orthopnea. Also describes weight gain since given birth to her child 17 months ago, she attributes this to her recent pregnancy. She complains of tremors and also complains of a moderate headache that's been stable. . (-) Denies CP, fevers, chills, or cough, palpitations, edema, joint pains, rashes, AVH, SI, or HI. Past Medical History: -Alcoholism (drinks baseline 1 pint of liquor/day, past week drinking 1 liter of vodka/day) -Polysubstance abuse - including cocaine, IV heroin, and crack 2 years ago, snorting heroin 2 days ago. -Hep C, never treated, unknown severity, genotype, etc -Infectious endocarditis in her 20s, 6 wks of abx no surgeries -No h/o STDs, HIV neg 3 weeks ago -Hep B immunized Family History: Alcoholism in mother, father, and sister. Father also used cocaine and sister also used ecstasy. Occupation: Formerly worked at Investment Firm Quality Control Dept Physical Examination Vitals: T: 99.6 BP: 152/96 P: 99 R: 27 O2: 99%RA General: Alert, oriented x3, anxious, labile with at times inappropriate laughter mixed with anxiety, obese woman. HEENT: Sclera anicteric, MMM, oropharynx clear Neck: supple, JVP difficult to assess given habitus Lungs: Clear to auscultation bilaterally, no wheezes, rales, ronchi CV: Tachycardic, regular rhythm, normal S1 + S2, no murmurs, rubs, gallops Abdomen: soft, diffuse tenderness to palpation, obese, non-distended, bowel sounds present, no rebound tenderness or guarding, no organomegaly. During the exam she complains of severe tenderness but a few minutes later is laughing and sitting comfortably in bed. Ext: warm, well perfused, 2+ pulses, no clubbing, cyanosis or edema Labs PT / PTT / INR:13.7/29.4/1.2, ALT / AST:106/249, Alk Phos / T Bili:145/3.0, Amylase / Lipase:135/221, Differential-Neuts:57.3 %, Lymph:34.1 %, Mono:7.0 %, Eos:0.8 %, Lactic Acid:1.8 mmol/L, Albumin:4.1 g/dL, LDH:329 IU/L, Ca++:8.2 mg/dL, Mg++:1.7 mg/dL, PO4:2.5 mg/dL
78 year old female with PMHx HTN, dCHF, Diabetes, CKD, Atrial fibrillation on coumadin, ischemic stroke, admitted after presenting to cardiology clinic today with confusion and Somnolence. Of note, she was recently discharged after presyncope/falls. At that time, lasix was stopped and atenolol was switched to metoprolol as there was concern that blunting of tachycardia could be contributing to falls. She was discharged to rehab (previously living at home). Per report from the ER, patient has had confusion at home for 3 weeks, though no family accompanies her to corroborate this story, and patient denies this. The patient is not sure why she is in the hospital. She saw her cardiologist today, who referred her to the ER after she appeared to be dehydrated, somnolent, and confused. The patient denies headache, blurry vision, numbness, tingling or weakness. No CP. +SOB, worsening DOE. No nausea, vomiting. 78 year old female with PMHx HTN, dCHF, Diabetes, CKD, Atrial fibrillation on coumadin, ischemic stroke, admitted after presenting with confusion and somnolence. She was recently discharged after presyncope/falls. Patient has had confusion at home for 3 weeks. The patient denies headache, blurry vision, numbness, tingling or weakness, nausea or vomiting. 78 year old female with PMHx HTN, dCHF, Diabetes, CKD, Atrial fibrillation on coumadin, ischemic stroke, admitted after presenting to cardiology clinic today with confusion and Somnolence. Of note, she was recently discharged at the beginning of [**2876-4-14**] after presyncope/falls. At that time, lasix was stopped and atenolol was switched to metoprolol as there was concern that blunting of tachycardia could be contributing to falls. She was discharged to rehab (previously living at home). Per report from the ER, patient has had confusion at home x 3 weeks, though no family accompanies her to corroborate this story, and patient denies this. The patient is not sure why she is in the hospital. She saw her cardiologist today, who referred her to the ER after she appeared to be dehydrated, somnolent, and confused. The patient denies headache, blurry Vision, numbness, tingling or weakness. No CP. +SOB, worsening DOE. No nausea, vomiting. Physical Exam: GENERAL: Intubated, NAD HEENT: Normocephalic, atraumatic. No scleral icterus. MMM, OP clear. CARDIAC: irregularly irregular. Normal S1, S2. No murmurs, rubs or [**Last Name (un) 597**]. LUNGS: CTAB ABDOMEN: Soft, NT, ND. +BS EXTREMITIES: 1+ edema NEUROLOGIC: Mental status: Intubated, off sedation, minimal arousal to voice/stimulation. Not following commands. Cranial nerves: Pupils sluggishly reactive, both post-surgical, R 4->3, L 3.5->3. Gaze midline and conjugate, face appears symmetric. Motor: Withdraws LUE and LLE weakly, no response RUE, triple flexion RLE. Sensory: withdraws to noxious stimulation weakly as above, L>R Coordination: unable to assess Gait: unable to assess
A 87 year old female NH resident with a history of chronic atrial fibrillation, hypertension and hypothyroidism who presents wit abdominal pain. She had been in her usual state of health until 5 days ago when she suddenly began to have abdominal pain. Her abdominal pain was initially intermittent lasting for a few hours at at time. No clear correlation with food. Yesterday, she noticed that her pain was much more severe and more localized to the right. This was accompanied by nausea and vomitting. She vomitted twice, with clear liquid emesis and was sent to a hospital. At the hospital, she was noted to have elevated amylase/lipase to 538 and 516 with elevated bili to 4.1 and AST/ALT to 198/115 and was given ciprofloxacin, flagyl and 500cc NS and was transferred to the emergency department. At the emergency department her vital signs were TM 97.9 HR 83 BP 157/92 RR 18 sat 97% RA. A 87 yo female reports several days abdominal pain, worse yesterday, severe and more localized to the right, accompanied by nausea and vomitting. Labs show elevated bilirubin, transaminitis, amylase and lipase. This is a 87 year old female NH resident with a history of chronic atrial fibrillation, hypertension and hypothyroidism who presents to the [**Hospital Unit Name 10**]. She had been in her usual state of health until 5 days ago when she suddenly began to have abdominal pain. Her abdominal pain was initially intermittent lasting for a few hours at at time. No clear correlation with food. Yesterday, she noticed that her pain was much more severe, [**3301-9-5**] in severity and more localized to the right. This was accompanied by nausea and vomitting. She vomitted twice, with clear liquid emesis and was sent to [**Hospital3 **]. At [**Hospital1 **], she was noted to have elevated amylase/lipase to 538 and 516 with elevated bili to 4.1 and AST/ALT to 198/115 and was given ciprofloxacin, flagyl and 500cc NS and was transferred to the [**Hospital1 1**] emergency department. . At [**Hospital1 1**] EDVS 97.9 HR 83 157/92 RR 18 97% RA. Elderly F, oriented X 2, NAD, flat jvp, CTA decreased b/b, s1 s2 [**Last Name (un) **], decreased BS, + t at ruq, no edema
A 63 yo man with h/o biphenotypic ALL, now Day + 32 from allogeneic SCT, who presents with one week of worsening SOB and two days of a clear productive cough. The patient states his SOB occured when lying flat, but not with activity. Also admitted to chest pressure which would come and go in his left chest no related to the SOB. Sleeps with 3 pillows (no change from baseline), denies PND; admits to a slight increase in lower extremity edema. Admits to low grade fevers to the 99's and crampy abdominal pain. Denies chills, night sweats, vomiting, or diarrhea. Patient also has a history of CMV infection, aspergillus and Leggionare's disease and is on posaconazole. His CXR showed an opacification of the left basilar lobe and also right upper lobe concerning for pneumonia as well as a small loculated right pleural effusion. A 63 year-old male with biphenotypic ALL, Day +32 after BMT, h/o CMV infection, aspergillus and Leggionare's disease, presents with acute onset of hypoxia accompanied by fever and two days of productive cough. His CXR showed an opacification of the left basilar lobe and also right upper lobe concerning for pneumonia. Mr. [**Known patient lastname 4075**] is a 63 yo man with h/o biphenotypic ALL, now Day + 32 from allogeneic SCT, who presents to clinc with one week of worsening SOB and two days of a clear productive cough. The patient states his SOB occured when lying flat, but not with activity. Also admitted to chest pressure which would come and go in his left chest no related to the SOB. Sleeps with 3 pillows (no change from baseline), denies PND; admits to a slight increase in lower extremity edema. Admits to low grade fevers to the 99's and crampy abdominal pain. Denies chills, night sweats, vomiting, or diarrhea. Assessment and Plan Assesment: This is a 63 year-old male with a history of h/o biphenotypic ALL, now Day + 32 from allogeneic SCT, who presents with hypoxia, one week of worsening SOB, and two days of productive cough. Plan: # Hypoxia: The patient developed acute onset of hypoxia accompanied by fever and a one day cough with sputum production. Given that the patient is about 1 month s/p allogenic SCT the differential is broad and would include bacterial pneumonia, viral pneumonia (CMV, flu), and opportunistic infections including fungal infections. Patient also has a history of CMV infection, aspergillus and Leggionare's disease and is on posaconazole. His CXR showed an opacification of the left basilar lobe and also right upper lobe concerning for pneumonia as well as a small loculated right pleural effusion. Also in the differential is noninfectious causes such as PE, CHF, or MI. US were negative for clot and his first set of CE were negative.
94M with CAD s/p 4v-CABG, CHF, CRI presented with vfib arrest. Initial labs significant for K 2.7. EKG showed sinus rhythm, HR 80 with LAD, prolonged PR, TD 0.5 to 1mm in V4-V6. Echo showed Mildly depressed global left ventricular function, mild to moderate aortic regurgitation and mild mitral regurgitation. 94 M with CAD s/p 4v-CABG, CHF, CRI presented with vfib arrest. 94 M with CAD s/p 4V-CABG [**3420**] and CRI had been doing well until this AM when he was out walking with his wife. [**Name (NI) **] abruptly syncopized and a bystander started CPR quickly. The local fire department delivered two shocks without success. Then EMS came and gave two more shocks and he went back into sinus. It is unclear whether he regained consciousness. He was intubated then brought to [**Hospital1 5**] ED. . In the ED, his intial SBP was reported to be 110. Labs show K 2.7 and Hct 25. He was given 40mEq of KCL. On repeat labs, his K normalized and his Hct was 33 without any blood. It is unclear whether one of the labs was erroneous. the vitals were recorded as: T=34.8, HR 62, 132/74, 18, 100% on AC 18x500, FiO2 100%. EKG: Sinus at 80 BPM with LAD, prolonged PR, TD 0.5 to 1mm in V4-V6 . ECHO: The left atrium and right atrium are normal in cavity size. There is mild symmetric left ventricular hypertrophy with normal cavity size. There is mild global left ventricular hypokinesis (LVEF = 45-50 %). The right ventricular free wall is hypertrophied. Right ventricular chamber size is normal. with normal free wall contractility. The aortic root is mildly dilated at the sinus level. The ascending aorta is moderately dilated. The aortic valve leaflets (3) are mildly thickened but aortic stenosis is not present. Mild to moderate ([**1-13**]+) aortic regurgitation is seen. The mitral valve leaflets are mildly thickened. There is no mitral valve prolapse. Mild (1+) mitral regurgitation is seen. The tricuspid valve leaflets are mildly thickened. The estimated pulmonary artery systolic pressure is normal. There is a trivial/physiologic pericardial effusion. IMPRESSION: Mildly depressed global left ventricular function. Mild to moderate aortic regurgitation. Mild mitral regurgitation.
85M dementia, colon cancer and recent colectomy with primary reanastomosis p/w melena. HCT 30 to 23 but hemodynamically stable. NGL negative. Exam notable for Tm 99 BP 128/50 HR 70 RR 16 with sat 100 on RA. WD man, NAD. Chest clear, JVP 8cm. RR s1s2. Soft abdomen, well healed surgical scar. No edema or cord. Labs notable for WBC 7K, HCT 24, K+ 4.0, Cr 0.7. 85 yo M with PMH of colon CA s/p resection now presenting with black stools and HCT drop. 85y/o m w/ hx AD, diverticulosis, recently dx colon ca s.p hemicolectomy p/w dark stools and dropping Hct (30 -->26-->23). NG lavage was negative in ED, however, pt with duodenal ulcer on EGD [**7-2**]. Possibly recent PUD vs anastomotic site vs [**1-26**] colon ca vs diverticulosis. Review of systems: Constitutional: No(t) Fever Cardiovascular: No(t) Chest pain, No(t) Palpitations Respiratory: No(t) Cough, No(t) Dyspnea Gastrointestinal: No(t) Abdominal pain, No(t) Nausea, No(t) Emesis, No(t) Diarrhea, No(t) Constipation Since 12 AM Tmax: 37.3 C (99.2 Tcurrent: 37.3 C (99.2 HR: 69 (64 - 78) bpm BP: 150/73(91) {128/39(65) - 150/99(103)} mmHg RR: 16 (16 - 24) insp/min SpO2: 100% Heart rhythm: SR (Sinus Rhythm) O2 Delivery Device: None SpO2: 100% ABG: //// Physical Examination General Appearance: No acute distress, Thin Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL, No(t) Conjunctiva pale Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic Lymphatic: Cervical WNL, Supraclavicular WNL Cardiovascular: (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal), RRR Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Present), (Left DP pulse: Present) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Clear : ) Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present, No(t) Tender: , healing colectomy scar, no erythema, tenderness, bleeding, oozing. Extremities: Right: Absent, Left: Absent Skin: Not assessed Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): only new year and thought he was at [**Hospital1 947**], Alzheimer's: pt with baseline dementia. Pt oriented to self, but not time or place. Movement: Purposeful, Tone: Normal Labs / Radiology WBC 9.7 Hct 24.0 Plt 593 Other labs: PT / PTT / INR:14.4/27.2/1.3"
51 year-old man with multiple sclerosis, quadriparesis, hypertension, restrictive lung disease, chronic constipation and small bowel obstruction after ileostomy, multiple urinary tract infections (also after placement of suprapubic tube), presents with small bowel obstruction and urinary tract infection. Admitted today as his home health aide noticed his urine output was low, 75cc overnight when he usually has about 1 liter overnight. Over the past two weeks he has had mild earaches, a sorethroat as well as some rhinorrhea. He denies any abdominal pain, has not sujectively noticed any change in abdominal distention. In the Emergency Department, he was noted to be severely dehydrated on exam, and creatinine level was 1.4 up from 0.6. 51 years-old male with multiple sclerosis and quadriplegia who presents with small bowel obstruction and low urinary output. This is a 51 year-old M w/ a h/o MS, quadraparesis, HTN, restrictive lung disease, chronic constipation and SBOs s/p ileostomy, multiple UTIs (also s/p suprapubic tube) presents with SBO and UTI. Of note he was just recently discharged from the [**Hospital1 52**] on [**10-2**] for an admission for a UTI (negative cultures) treated with cipro, shingles treated w/ acyclovir and SBO evaluated by surgery but managed conservatively. He returns today as his home health aide had noticed his Urine output was low, 75cc overnight when he usually has about 1 liter of UOP overnight. His ostomy output has been high. He has not noticed any symptoms. Over the past two weeks he has had mild earaches, a sorethroat as well as some rhinorrhea. He has not noticed any watery / itchy eyes. He has not sure if he has had a change in his ostomy output or suprapubic output. He has not noticed any visual changes, he has not noticed any new neurologic si/sx. He denies any abdominal pain, has not sujectively noticed any change in abdominal distention. He denies any pain in regards to his zoster (now or when diagnosed). Denies CP, has an occasional cough that is not worsening. . In the ED, he was noted to be severely dehydrated on exam. His BP nadir was 79/43 and HR peak was 97. T 99 (he usually "runs low"), new ARF 1.4 up from 0.6.
A 64 yo female with with history of atrial fibrillation, Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease, hypertension, hyperlipidemia, repair of an atrial septum defect which was complicated by sternal wound infection and post-operative atrial fibrillation treated with amiodarone, was initially admitted through the Emergency Department with shortness of breath and back pain, and was noted to have atrial fibrillation with rapid ventricular response. A computed tomography angiography demonstrated diffuse left anterior descending artery and post-obstructive pneumonia concerning for malignancy. For her atrial fibrillation, she was started on diltiazem. For the pneumonia, she was treated with antibiotics. She was then transferred to the floor later that same night on metoprolol 50 mg tid. While on the floor, she had a bronchoscopy performed which showed external compression of her left mainstem bronchus, and she had a biopsy via fine-needle aspiration, which showed large cell carcinoma. She denies chest pain, shortness of breath and tachypnea. She does note some diaphoresis and occasional palpitations. An elderly female with history of atrial fibrillation, Chronic Obstructive Pulmonary Disease, hypertension, hyperlipidemia and previous repair of atrial septum defect, presenting with shortness of breath and atrial fibrillation resistant to medication. A 64 yo F w/PMHx sx for AF, COPD, HTN, hyperlipidemia who initially had an open ASD repair c/b sternal wound infection and post-operative AF in [**11-15**] treated with amiodarone. On [**2-20**], she was initially admitted through the ED with SOB and back pain, and was noted to have atrial fibrillation with RVR. A CTA demonstrating diffuse LAD and post-obstructive PNA concerning for malignancy. For her atrial fibrillation, she was started on diltiazem gtt, for which she was transferred to the [**Hospital Unit Name 42**] for monitoring. The atrial fibrillation was thought to be in the setting of a post-obstructive pneumonia, for which she was treated with antibiotics. She was then transferred to the floor later that same night on metoprolol 50 mg tid. While on the floor, she had a bronchoscopy performed which showed external compression of her left mainstem bronchus, and she had a biopsy/FNA performed, which showed large cell carcinoma. She was then readmitted to the [**Hospital Unit Name 42**] yesterday with atrial fibrillation with HR 130s, and was started on a diltiazem gtt. . In the [**Hospital Unit Name 42**], she was started on po diltiazem, which was rapidly uptitrated to 60 mg qid. She was called out this morning. Tonight, at 8:30 pm, she was noted to have HR 160s, w/EKG c/w AF with RVR, for which she received metoprolol 5 mg IV x2, followed by diltiazem 10 mg IV x2 without conversion. She denies chest pain, SOB, tachypnea. She does note some diaphoresis and occasional palpitations.
The patient is a 79 yoF w/ a h/o CAD s/p RCA stenting, diastolic CHF, 1+ MR, HTN, Hyperlipidemia, previous smoking history, and atrial fibrillation who presents for direct admission from home for progressive shortness of breath. According to Pt, her primary complaint is not shortness of breath, but cough X 1 week which has been rarely productive of white sputum. She denies associated fevers, chills, nausea, vomiting, pleuritic pain, weight gain, or dietary indiscretion. She also reports a sore throat over the past 3 days. She recently underwent thoracentesis for a moderate size pleueral effusion. Cytology of the effusion was negative for malignant cells. Pt denies recent palpitations, and reports that she has been compliant with all medications. She admits to recent fatigue and 2 pillow orthopnea which has been present for months. Current etiology considerations include CHF vs intrinsic pulmonary disease (infiltrative) vs embolic disease. In order to optimize cardic function with atrial kick, pt underwent cardioversion and became hypotensive with a junctional rhythm requiring intubation. She was placed on dobutamine. Off of dobutamine, cardiac monitoring demonstrated a long QTc of 700 and an atrial escape rhythm. A 79 year old female wit history of CAD, diastolic CHF, HTN, Hyperlipidemia, previous smoking history, and atrial fibrillation who presents for direct admission from home for progressive shortness of breath. Patient denies recent palpitations, and reports that she has been compliant with all medications. She admits to recent fatigue and 2 pillow orthopnea which has been present for months. Patient underwent cardioversion and became hypotensive with a junctional rhythm requiring intubation. She was placed on dobutamine. Off of dobutamine, cardiac monitoring demonstrated a long QTc and an atrial escape rhythm. Briefly 79 yo F w/ a h/o CAD s/p RCA stenting BMS to mRCA [**3421**] and pLAD [**3423**], diastolic CHF (2 pillow orthopnea), 1+ MR, HTN, Hyperlipidemia, previous smoking history, and atrial fibrillation initially p/w cough, dyspnea. . Briefly, pt's symptoms began [**Month (only) 760**]. At that time pt was admitted with GI bleed, transfused and discharged without resolution of symptoms. Furthur workup noted bilateral atrial thrombi and anticoagulation was reinitiated. CTA did not show PE but was concern for small peripheral emboli as cause of dyspnea. Pt was had multiple PFTs, echos, CT scans and CXRs without definitive cause of dyspnea. Most recent PFTs on [**3432-12-27**] c/w restrictive ventilatory defect and low DLCO suspicious for interstitial pulmonary process (worsening). She has been followed by cardiology and pulmonology and is being treated for dCHF and reactive airway disease. . On current admission pt presented with cough, thought to be URI, rather than worsening of chronic dyspnea. Current etiology considerations include CHF vs intrinsic pulmonary disease (infiltrative) vs embolic disease. In order to optimize cardic function with atrial kick, pt was pretreated with Sotolol and underwent TEE and cardioversion of afib on [**3433-1-11**]. After cardioversion, patient developed junctional HR to 45bpm with SBPs in 80s. She was placed on dobutamine and HR increased to 80s (sinus vs antrial escape rhythm). Off of dobutamine, HR and BP decreased with EKG demonstrated QTc of 700.
A 96 y/o female found unresponsive on ground at nursing home. Pt was in dining room and found by staff. Unresponsive for 1 min after found. Pt cannot recollect events preceding fall but with some c/o HA and some neck/shoulder discomfort. NCHCT showed ~9mm L parietal SDH. C-spine negative. Imaging: CT head w/o contrast Acute left subdural hematoma measuring 1.5 cm maximal dimensions with leftward subfalcine herniation of 8 mm, downward transtentorial herniation with obliteration of the left suprasellar cistern, and uncal herniation. No fx, destructive infiltrative lesion involving the skull base. A 96 y/o female found unresponsive on ground at nursing home pressents with headache, herniation, and some neck/shoulder discomfort. CT head shows acute left subdural hematoma. 96F found unresponsive on ground at nursing home. Pt was in dining room and found by staff. Unresponsive for 1 min after found. Pt cannot recollect events preceding fall but with some c/o HA and some neck/shoulder discomfort. Taken to [**Hospital1 1218**] where NCHCT preformed at 18:32 showed ~9mm L parietal SDH. C-spine negative. Family / Social history: dementia, HTN, afib, CAD SURGICAL Hx: unknown . SOCIAL Hx: Daughter serves as HCP; Pt currently DNR/DNI except for elective procedure (****SEE CLARIFICATIOIN BELOW****). . ALLERGIES: NKDA Physical Examination General Appearance: No acute distress, Thin Eyes / Conjunctiva: PERRL, Conjunctiva pale Head, Ears, Nose, Throat: Normocephalic, Poor dentition Lymphatic: Cervical WNL, Supraclavicular WNL Cardiovascular: (S1: Normal), (S2: Normal) Peripheral Vascular: (Right radial pulse: Present), (Left radial pulse: Present), (Right DP pulse: Diminished), (Left DP pulse: Diminished) Respiratory / Chest: (Expansion: Symmetric), (Breath Sounds: Clear : bialterally) Abdominal: Soft, Non-tender, Bowel sounds present Extremities: Right: Absent, Left: Absent Skin: Warm Neurologic: Attentive, Follows simple commands, Responds to: Verbal stimuli, Oriented (to): A+O x 2, Movement: Not assessed, Tone: Not assessed Imaging: CT head w/o contrast Acute left subdural hematoma measuring 1.5 cm maximal dimensions with leftward subfalcine herniation of 8 mm, downward transtentorial herniation with obliteration of the left suprasellar cistern, and uncal herniation. No fx, destructive infiltrative lesion involving the skull base
This 84-year-old man with a history of coronary artery disease presents with 2 days of melena and black colored emesis. Stools becoming less dark, but he had increased lethargy and presented to the emergency department today. Initial systolic blood pressure recorded in the 60s, but all in 110-120s after that. In the ED, he had gastric lavage with coffee ground emesis that cleared with 600 cc of flushing. During the lavage he had chest pressure with mild ST depression V3-V5 that resolved spontaneously. Patient is on ASPIRIN 81 mg Tablet by mouth daily. An 84-year-old man with a previous history of coronary artery disease, presenting with 2 days of melena and black colored emesis. 84 year-old man with CAD s/p CABG, DM, HTN, presented with 2 days of black stools and coffee ground emesis. Pt reports of woke up 2am on [**10-19**] and had black soft/loose BM, followed by nausea and and vomiting blackish liquid. He felt better but continued to have three more black stools over the next two days. He vomited a total of [**1-20**] times before presenting to the hospital. He has been feeling lethargic and lightheaded and called the ambulence at the advice of his son. His stools were lightening in color prior arriving. He has not been using any new medications and has not had a prior GIB. . In the ED, initial VS: 98.7 88 65/47 98%/RA. He was BIBEMS with SBPs 110-120s and has had similarly stable blood pressures since arrival. He had an NG lavage with coffee ground emesis that cleared with 600 cc of flushing. During the lavage he had chest pressure and an EKG showed STD in V2-4. He did not have radiation, pain, or diaphoresis. Home medications: ALLOPURINOL 300 mg Tablet by mouth daily GLIPIZIDE 5 mg Extended Rel by mouth daily LOSARTAN [COZAAR] 100 mg by mouth daily METFORMIN 500 mg by mouth daily METOPROLOL TARTRATE 50 mg by mouth daily PIOGLITAZONE [ACTOS] 15 mg by mouth daily SIMVASTATIN 80 mg Tablet by mouth daily ASPIRIN 81 mg Tablet by mouth daily Past medical history: Coronary artery disease s/p triple-vessel coronary artery bypass in [**7-/2899**] Hypertension Peripheral arterial disease Hypercholesterolemia Diabetes Osteoarthritis Gout Anemia Baseline 32-35 with unrevealing w/u by heme Right hernia repair in [**2877**] Appendectomy in [**2841**] Prostate disease N/C Occupation: Retired trial lawyer Drugs: Denies Tobacco: Denies Alcohol: Occasional
This is a 54 year old male patient with an idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis, who called today with worsening dyspnea for 3 days. He had been in unusual state of good health at baseline respiratory status (using 4L nasal canula at rest and 6L with exertion) when 3 days prior to admission, he hugged his cousin who has rats for pets and also the heat came up from the basement of his house. He feels that with these two events, his breathing became acutely worse and he is concerned for allergen exposure. He denies any sick contacts, fevers, chills, rhinorrhea. He did receive flu and pneumovax vaccines. He has had a recent admission last month with progressive dyspnea on exertion. The computed tomography revealed increased ground glass opacity in lower lobes superimposed on pulmonary fibrosis with elevated eosinophils peripherally (12%). A bronchoalveolar lavage was also positive for eosinophils. He was started on high dose steroids (prednisone 60mg) with plan for close outpatient follow up for eosinophilic lung disease. He was discharged on 2-3L nasal canula. He then represented to the emergency department for spontaneous pneumomediastinum of unclear etiology. On day of current admission, the patient called his pulmonologist complaining of worsening shortness of breath since Saturday. Yesterday he was at pulmonary rehab and desaturated to the 70s on 6L with minimal exertion, and he is currently on 4L nasal canula at rest. No sick contacts recently. He was asked to go to ED. In the ED, initial vs were: 98.3, 96, 144/97, 24, 97% 6L NC. This is a 54 year old male patient with an idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis presenting an acute dyspnea on exertion, secondary to superimposed pneumonia on patient with no pulmonary reserve. Appears he has been experiencing worsening dyspnea with increased O2 requirement for the last several weeks. 54 y/o M w/IPF, called today with worsening dyspnea x 3 days. He had been in unusal state of health at baseline resp status (using 4L NC at rest and 6L NC with exertion) when 3 days PTA, he hugged his cousin who has rats for pets and also the heat came up from the basement of his house. He feels that with these two events, he breathing became acutely worse and is concerned for allergen exposure. He denies any sick contacts, fevers, chills, worsening [** 2169**]/productive [** 2169**], rhinorrhea. He did receive flu and pneumovax. . He has had a recent admissions in [**11-26**] with progressive DOE. CT revealed increased ground glass opacity in LL superimposed on pulmonary fibrosis with elevated eosinophils peripherally (12%). A BAL was also positive for eosinophils. He was started on high dose steroids (prednisone 60mg) [**2739-2-16**] with plan for close outpatient follow up for eosinophilic lung disease. He was discharged on [**2-20**] on 2-3L NC. He then represented to [**Hospital1 1**] on [**12-12**] for spontaneous pneumomediastinum of unclear etiology. . On day of admission, Pt called pulmonologist (Dr. [**First Name (STitle) **] c/o worsening shortness of breath since Saturday [**3-23**]. Yesterday he was at pulmonary rehab and desaturated to the 70s on 6L with minimal exertion, and he is currently on 4L NC at rest. No sick contacts recently and [**Name2 (NI) 2169**] has not changed. He was asked to go to ED given concern for either acute exacerbation of underlying IPF vs superimposed infection vs pneumothorax. . In the ED, initial vs were: 98.3, 96, 144/97, 24, 97% 6L NC.
85 y/o F with PMHx of HTN, HL, h/o breast CA and 3cm renal pelvis transitional cell tumor who presented for nephrectomy. Her post op course was complicated by agitation thought due to narcotics. Today, she was restarted on her home meds and while on telemetry, pt was noted to be bradycardic to 40s. Pt was triggered for SBP of 70 and HR of 40 during which she remained asymptomatic. She was given 1L IVF and her HR/BP trended back up to baseline. However, there was a second event an hour later when she sat up and became bradycardic in the 30s with associated hypotension. Second episode occurred with position change and again, pt developped junctional rhythm in 30s. An 85 year-old woman on verapamil presents with junctional heart rhythm in 30s with associated hypotension. 85 y/o F with PMHx of HTN, HL, h/o breast CA and 3cm renal pelvis transitional cell tumor who presented for nephrectomy on [**2575-8-15**]. Her post op course was complicated by agitation thought due to narcotics. Today, she was restarted on her home meds and while on telemetry, pt was noted to be bradycardic to 40s. Pt was triggered for SBP of 70 and HR of 40 during which she remained asymptomatic. She was given 1L IVF and her HR/BP trended back up to baseline. However, there was a second event an hour later when she sat up and became bradycardic in the 30s with associated hypotension. Second episode occurred with position change and again, pt developped junctional rhythm in 30s. home meds: Verapamil 240mg daily Lisinopril 5mg Rosuvastatin 10mg Meclizine 25 TID PRN Imipramine 25 QHS Colace 100mg Loratidine 10mg daily Physical Examination T: 98 BP: 111/47 P: 74 R: 16 O2: 98% on 2L NC General: oriented to person only, NAD, comfortable HEENT: Sclera anicteric, dry MM, oropharynx clear Neck: supple, unable to appreciate JVP due to habitus Lungs: poor effort but [**Month (only) 199**] BS at bases and some audible airway secretion in upper airways CV: Regular rate and rhythm, no m/r/g, diff to auscult [**2-13**] habitus Abdomen: diffusely tender, bowel sounds present, multiple surgical incisions, clean dry and intact, abd binder in place GU: foley in place Ext: cool, no edema, 1+ pulses, pneumoboots in place
